THE DEERSLAYER.
CHAPTER I.
I hear thee babbling to the vale
Of sunshine and of flowers,
But unto me thou bring'st a tale
Of visionary hours.
Wordsworth
.
The
discovery mentioned at the close of the preceding
chapter, was of great moment in the eyes of Deerslayer and
his friend. In the first place, there was the danger, almost
the certainty, that Hutter and Hurry would make a fresh
attempt on this camp, should they awake and ascertain its
position. Then there was the increased risk of landing to
bring off Hist; and there were the general uncertainty and
additional hazards that must follow from the circumstance
that their enemies had begun to change their positions. As
the Delaware was aware that the hour was near when he
ought to repair to the rendezvous, he no longer thought of
trophies torn from his foes; and one of the first things
arranged
between him and his associate, was to permit the two
others to sleep on, lest they should disturb the execution of
their plans, by substituting some of their own. The ark
moved slowly, and it would have taken fully a quarter of an
hour to reach the point, at the rate at which they were going;
thus affording time for a little forethought. The Indians, in
the wish to conceal their fire from those who were thought
to be still in the castle, had placed it so near the southern
side of the point, as to render it extremely difficult to shut it
in by the bushes, though Deerslayer varied the direction of
the scow, both to the right and to the left, in the hope of
being
able to effect that object.
There's one advantage, Judith, in finding that fire so
near the water, he said, while executing these little man
uvres
;
since it shows the Mingos believe we are in the hut,
and our coming on 'em, from this quarter, will be an
onlooked
for event. But 'tis lucky Harry March and your
father
are asleep, else we should have 'em prowling after scalps
ag'in. Ha! therethe bushes are beginning to shut in the
fireand now it can't be seen at all!
Deerslayer waited a little to make certain that he had at
last gained the desired position, when he gave the signal
agreed on, and Chingachgook let go the grapnel, and
lowered
the sail.
The situation in which the ark now lay had its advantages,
and its disadvantages. The fire had been hid by sheering
towards the shore, and the latter was nearer perhaps than
was desirable. Still, the water was known to be very deep
further off in the lake, and anchoring in deep water, under
the circumstances in which the party was placed, was to be
avoided, if possible. It was also believed no raft could be
within miles; and, though the trees in the darkness appeared
almost to overhang the scow, it would not be easy to get off
to her, without using a boat. The intense darkness that
prevailed
so close in with the forest, too, served as an effectual
screen; and so long as care was had not to make a noise,
there was little or no danger of being detected. All these
things Deerslayer pointed out to Judith, instructing her as
to the course she was to follow in the event of an alarm;
for it was thought to the last degree inexpedient to arouse
the sleepers, unless it might be in the greatest emergency.
And now, Judith, as we understand one another, it is
time the Sarpent and I had taken to the canoe, the hunter
concluded. The star has not risen yet, it's true; but it
soon must, though none of us are likely to be any the wiser
for it, to-night, on account of the clouds. Howsever, Hist
has a ready mind, and she's one of them that doesn't always
need to have a thing afore her, to see it. I'll warrant you
she'll not be either two minutes, or two feet, out of the way,
unless them jealous vagabonds, the Mingos, have taken the
alarm, and put her as a stool-pigeon to catch us; or have
hid her away, in order to prepare her mind for a Huron
instead
of a Mohican husband.
Deerslayer, interrupted the girl, earnestly; this is a
most dangerous service; why do
you
go on it, at all?
Anan!Why you know, gal, we go to bring off Hist,
the Sarpent's betrothedthe maid he means to marry, as
soon as we get back to the tribe.
That is all right for the Indianbut
you
do not mean to
marry Hist,
you
are not betrothed, and why should
two
risk their lives and liberties, to do that which one can just
as well perform?
Ah!now I understand you, Judithyes, now I begin
to take the idee. You think as Hist is the Sarpent's
betrothed
,
as they call it, and not mine, it's altogether his
affair
;
and as one man can paddle a canoe, he ought to be
left to go after his gal alone! But you forget this is our
ar'n'd here, on the lake, and it would not tell well to forget
an ar'n'd just as the pinch came. Then, if love does count
for so much with some people, particularly with young
women
,
fri'ndship counts for something, too, with other some.
I dares to say, the Delaware can paddle a canoe by
himself
,
and can bring off Hist by himself, and perhaps he would
like that quite as well, as to have me with him; but he
couldn't sarcumvent sarcumventions, or stir up an
ambushment
,
or fight with the savages, and get his sweetheart at
the same time, as well by himself as if he had a fri'nd with
him, to depend on, even if that fri'nd is no better than
myself
.
NonoJudith, you wouldn't desart one that counted
on you, at such a moment, and you can't, in reason, expect
me to do it.
I fearI believe you are right, Deerslayer; and yet I
wish you were not to go! Promise me one thing, at least,
and that is, not to trust yourself among the savages, or to do
anything more than to save the girl. That will be enough
for once, and with that you ought to be satisfied.
Lord bless you! gal; one would think it was Hetty
that's talking, and not the quick-witted, and wonderful
Judith
Hutter! But fright makes the wise, silly, and the strong,
weak. Yes, I've seen proofs of that, time and ag'in! Well,
it's kind, and soft-hearted in you, Judith, to feel this consarn
for a fellow creatur', and I shall always say that you are
kind and of true feelings, let them that envy your good
looks, tell as many idle stories of you as they may.
Deerslayer! hastily said the girl, interrupting him,
though nearly choked by her own emotions; do you
believe
all you hear about a poor, motherless girl? Is the
foul tongue of Hurry Harry to blast my life!
Not it, Judithnot it. I've told Hurry it wasn't
manful
to backbite them he couldn't win by fair means; and
that even an Indian is always tender, touching a young
woman's
good name.
If I had a brother, he wouldn't dare to do it! exclaimed
Judith, with eyes flashing fire. But, finding me without
any protector but an old man, whose ears are getting to be
as dull as his feelings, he has his way as he pleases!
Not exactly that, Judith; no, not exactly that, neither!
No
man, brother or stranger, would stand by and see as fair
a gal as yourself hunted down, without saying a word in her
behalf. Hurry's in 'arnest in wanting to make you his
wife, and the little he does let out ag'in you, comes more
from jealousy, like, than from any thing else. Smile on him
when he awakes, and squeeze his hand only half as hard as
you squeezed mine a bit ago, and my life on it, the poor
fellow
will forget every thing but your comeliness. Hot words
don't always come from the heart, but oftener from the
stomach, than anywhere else. Try him, Judith, when he
wakes, and see the vartue of a smile.
Deerslayer laughed, in his own manner, as he concluded,
and then he intimated to the patient-looking, but really
impatient
Chingachgook, his readiness to proceed. As the
young man entered the canoe, the girl stood immoveable as
stone, lost in the musings that the language and manner of
the other were likely to produce. The simplicity of the
hunter had completely put her at fault; for, in her narrow
sphere, Judith was an expert manager of the other sex;
though in the present instance she was far more actuated by
impulses, in all she had said and done, than by calculation.
We shall not deny that some of Judith's reflections were
bitter, though the sequel of the tale must be referred to, in
order to explain how merited, or how keen were her
sufferings
.
Chingachgook, and his pale-face friend, set forth on their
hazardous and delicate enterprise, with a coolness and
method
that would have done credit to men who were on their
twentieth, instead of being on their first, war-path. As suited
his relation to the pretty fugitive, in whose service they were
engaged, the Indian took his place in the head of the canoe;
while Deerslayer guided its movements in the stern. By
this arrangement, the former would be the first to land, and
of course the first to meet his mistress. The latter had taken
his post, without comment, but in secret influenced by the
reflection that one who had so much at stake as the Indian,
might not possibly guide the canoe with the same steadiness
and intelligence, as another who had more command of his
feelings. From the instant they left the side of the ark, the
movements of the two adventurers were like the manuvres
of highly-drilled soldiers, who for the first time were called
on to meet the enemy in the field. As yet, Chingachgook
had never fired a shot in anger, and the
debt
of his
companion
in warfare, is known to the reader. It is true, the
Indian had been hanging about his enemy's camp for a few
hours, on his first arrival, and he had even once entered it,
as related in the last chapter, but no consequences had
followed
either experiment. Now, it was certain that an
important
result was to be effected, or a mortifying failure was
to ensue. The rescue, or the continued captivity of Hist,
depended on the enterprise. In a word, it was virtually the
maiden expedition of these two ambitious young forest
soldiers
;
and while one of them set forth, impelled by
sentiments
that usually carry men so far, both had all their
feelings
of pride and manhood enlisted in their success.
Instead of steering in a direct line to the point, then
distant
from the ark less than a quarter of a mile, Deerslayer
laid the head of his canoe diagonally towards the centre of
the lake, with a view to obtain a position, from which he
might approach the shore, having his enemies in his front
only. The spot where Hetty had landed, and where Hist
had promised to meet them, moreover, was on the upper side
of the projection, rather than on the lower; and to reach it,
would have required the adventurers to double nearly the
whole point, close in with the shore, had not this
preliminary
step been taken. So well was the necessity for this
measure understood, that Chingachgook quietly paddled on,
although it was adopted without consulting him, and
apparently
was taking him in a direction nearly opposite to that
one might think he most wished to go. A few minutes
sufficed
,
however, to carry the canoe the necessary distance,
when both the young men ceased paddling as it were by
instinctive consent, and the boat became stationary.
The darkness increased rather than diminished, but it
was still possible, from the place where the adventurers lay,
to distinguish the outlines of the mountains. In vain did
the Delaware turn his head eastward, to catch a glimpse of
the promised star; for, notwithstanding the clouds broke a
little near the horizon, in that quarter of the heavens, the
curtain continued so far drawn as effectually to conceal all
behind it. In front, as was known by the formation of land
above and behind it, lay the point, at a distance of about a
thousand feet. No signs of the castle could be seen, nor
could any movement in that quarter of the lake reach the
ear. The latter circumstance might have been equally
owing to the distance, which was several miles, or to the
fact that nothing was in motion. As for the ark, though
scarcely farther from the canoe than the point, it lay so
completely buried in the shadows of the shore, that it would
not have been visible even had there been many degrees
more of light than actually existed.
The adventurers now held a conference in low voices,
consulting together as to the probable time. Deerslayer
thought it wanted yet some minutes to the rising of the star,
while the impatience of the chief caused him to fancy the
night further advanced, and to believe that his betrothed
was already waiting his appearance on the shore. As might
have been expected, the opinion of the latter prevailed, and
his friend disposed himself to steer for the place of
rendezvous
.
The utmost skill and precaution now became
necessary
in the management of the canoe. The paddles were
lifted, and returned to the water in a noiseless manner; and
when within a hundred yards of the beach, Chingachgook
took in his, altogether, laying his hand on his rifle in its
stead. As they got still more within the belt of darkness
that girded the woods, it was seen that they were steering
too far north, and the course was altered accordingly. The
canoe now seemed to move by instinct, so cautious and
deliberate
were all its motions. Still it continued to advance,
until its bows grated on the gravel of the beach, at the
precise
spot where Hetty had landed, and whence her voice
had issued, the previous night, as the ark was passing.
There was, as usual, a narrow strand, but bushes fringed
the woods, and in most places overhung the water.
Chingachgook stepped upon the beach, and cautiously
examined it, for some distance, on each side of the canoe.
In order to do this, he was often obliged to wade to his
knees in the lake, but no Hist rewarded his search. When
he returned, he found his friend also on the shore. They
next conferred in whispers, the Indian apprehending that
they must have mistaken the place of rendezvous. But
Deerslayer thought it was probable they had mistaken the
hour. While he was yet speaking, he grasped the arm of
the Delaware, caused him to turn his head in the direction
of the lake, and pointed towards the summits of the eastern
mountains. The clouds had broken a little, apparently
behind
rather than above the hills, and the selected star was
glittering among the branches of a pine. This was every
way a flattering omen, and the young men leaned on their
rifles, listening intently for the sound of approaching
footsteps
.
Voices they often heard, and mingled with them
were the suppressed cries of children, and the low but sweet
laugh of Indian women. As the native Americans are
habitually
cautious, and seldom break out in loud
conversation
,
the adventurers knew by these facts, that they must
be very near the encampment. It was easy to perceive that
there was a fire within the woods, by the manner in which
some of the upper branches of the trees were illuminated,
but it was not possible, where they stood, to ascertain
exactly
how near it was to themselves. Once or twice, it
seemed as if stragglers from around the fire, were
approaching
the place of rendezvous; but these sounds were either
altogether illusion, or those who had drawn near, returned
again without coming to the shore. A quarter of an hour
was passed in this state of intense expectation and anxiety,
when Deerslayer proposed that they should circle the point
in the canoe; and by getting a position close in, where the
camp could be seen, reconnoitre the Indians, and thus
enable
themselves to form some plausible conjectures for the
non-appearance of Hist. The Delaware, however,
resolutely
refused to quit the spot, reasonably enough offering
as a reason, the disappointment of the girl, should she arrive
in his absence. Deerslayer felt for his friend's concern,
and offered to make the circuit of the point by himself,
leaving
the latter concealed in the bushes to await the occurrence
of any fortunate event that might favour his views. With
this understanding, then, the parties separated.
As soon as Deerslayer was at his post again, in the stern
of the canoe, he left the shore with the same precautions, and
in the same noiseless manner, as he had approached it. On
this occasion he did not go far from the land, the bushes
affording a sufficient cover, by keeping as close in as
possible
.
Indeed, it would not have been easy to devise any
means more favourable to reconnoitring round an Indian
camp, than those afforded by the actual state of things.
The formation of the point permitted the place to be circled
on three of its sides, and the progress of the boat was so
noiseless as to remove any apprehensions from an alarm
through sound. The most practised and guarded foot might
stir a bunch of leaves, or snap a dried stick, in the dark,
but a bark canoe could be made to float over the surface of
smooth water, almost with the instinctive readiness, and
certainly
with the noiseless movements, of an aquatic bird.
Deerslayer had got nearly in a line between the camp
and the ark, before he caught a glimpse of the fire. This
came upon him suddenly, and a little unexpectedly, at first
causing an alarm, lest he had incautiously ventured within
the circle of light it cast. But, perceiving at a second
glance, that he was certainly safe from detection, so long as
the Indians kept near the centre of the illumination, he
brought the canoe to a state of rest, in the most favourable
position he could find, and commenced his observations.
We have written much, but in vain, concerning this
extraordinary
being, if the reader requires now to be told,
that, untutored as he was in the learning of the world, and
simple as he ever showed himself to be in all matters
touching
the subtleties of conventional taste, he was a man of
strong, native, poetical feeling. He loved the woods for
their freshness, their sublime solitudes, their vastness, and
the impress that they everywhere bore of the divine hand
Vol. II.2
of their creator. He seldom moved through them, without
pausing to dwell on some peculiar beauty that gave him
pleasure, though seldom attempting to investigate the causes;
and never did a day pass without his communing in spirit,
and this, too, without the aid of forms or language, with the
infinite source of all he saw, felt, and beheld. Thus
constituted
,
in a moral sense, and of a steadiness that no
danger
could appal, or any crisis disturb, it is not surprising
that the hunter felt a pleasure at looking on the scene he
now beheld, that momentarily caused him to forget the
object
of his visit. This will more fully appear when we
describe
the scene.
The canoe lay in front of a natural vista, not only through
the bushes that lined the shore, but of the trees also, that
afforded a clear view of the camp. It was by means of this
same opening that the light had been first seen from the ark.
In consequence of their recent change of ground, the
Indians
had not yet retired to their huts, but had been delayed
by their preparations, which included lodging as well as
food. A large fire had been made, as much to answer the
purpose of torches, as for the use of their simple cookery;
and at this precise moment it was blazing high and bright,
having recently received a large supply of dried brush.
The effect was to illuminate the arches of the forest, and to
render the whole area occupied by the camp as light as if
hundreds of tapers were burning. Most of the toil had
ceased, and even the hungriest child had satisfied its
appetite
.
In a word, the time was that moment of relaxation
and general indolence which is apt to succeed a hearty
meal, and when the labours of the day have ended. The
hunters and the fishermen had been equally successful; and
food, that one great requisite of savage life, being abundant,
every other care appeared to have subsided in the sense of
enjoyment dependent on this all-important fact.
Deerslayer saw at a glance that many of the warriors
were absent. His acquaintance, Rivenoak, however, was
present, being seated in the foreground of a picture that
Salvator
Rosa would have delighted to draw, his swarthy
features
illuminated as much by pleasure, as by the torch-like
flame, while he showed another of the tribe one of the
elephants
that had caused so much sensation among his people.
A boy was looking over his shoulder, in dull curiosity,
completing
the group. More in the back-ground, eight or ten
warriors lay half recumbent on the ground, or sat with their
backs inclining against trees, so many types of indolent
repose
.
Their arms were near them all, sometimes leaning
against the same trees as themselves, or were lying across
their bodies, in careless preparation. But the group that
most attracted the attention of Deerslayer was that composed
of the women and children. All the females appeared to be
collected together, and, almost as a matter of course, their
young were near them. The former laughed and chatted,
in their rebuked and quiet manner, though one who knew
the habits of the people might have detected that every thing
was not going on in its usual train. Most of the young
women
seemed to be light-hearted enough; but one old hag was
seated apart, with a watchful, soured aspect, which, the hunter
at once knew, betokened that some duty of an unpleasant
character had been assigned her by the chiefs. What that
duty was, he had no means of knowing; but he felt satisfied
it must be, in some measure, connected with her own sex,
the aged among the women generally being chosen for
such offices, and no other.
As a matter of course, Deerslayer looked eagerly and
anxiously for the form of Hist. She was nowhere visible,
though the light penetrated to considerable distances, in all
directions around the fire. Once, or twice, he started, as he
thought he recognized her laugh; but his ears were deceived
by the soft melody that is so common to the Indian female
voice. At length the old woman spoke loud and angrily,
and then he caught a glimpse of one or two dark figures, in
the back-ground of trees, which turned as if obedient to the
rebuke, and walked more within the circle of the light. A
young warrior's form first came fairly into view; then
followed two youthful females, one of whom proved to be the
Delaware girl. Deerslayer now comprehended it all. Hist
was watched, possibly by her young companion, certainly
by the old woman. The youth was probably some suitor of
either her, or her companion; but even his discretion was
distrusted under the influence of his admiration. The known
vicinity of those who might be supposed to be her friends,
and the arrival of a strange red-man on the lake, had induced
more than the usual care, and the girl had not been able to
slip away from those who watched her, in order to keep her
appointment. Deerslayer traced her uneasiness, by her
attempting
,
once or twice, to look up through the branches of
the trees, as if endeavouring to get glimpses of the star she
had herself named, as the sign for meeting. All was vain,
however, and after strolling about the camp a little longer,
in affected indifference, the two girls quitted their male escort,
and took seats among their own sex. As soon as this was
done, the old sentinel changed her place to one more
agreeable
to herself, a certain proof that she had hitherto been
exclusively on watch.
Deerslayer now felt greatly at a loss how to proceed. He
well knew that Chingachgook could never be persuaded to
return
to the ark, without making some desperate effort for the
recovery of his mistress, and his own generous feelings well
disposed him to aid in such an undertaking. He thought he
saw the signs of an intention among the females to retire for
the night; and should he remain, and the fire continue to
give out its light, he might discover the particular hut, or
arbour, under which Hist reposed; a circumstance that
would be of infinite use, in their future proceedings. Should
he remain, however, much longer where he was, there was
great danger that the impatience of his friend, would drive
him into some act of imprudence. At each instant, indeed,
he expected to see the swarthy form of the Delaware,
appearing
in the back-ground, like the tiger prowling around the
fold. Taking all things into consideration, therefore, he
came to the conclusion it would be better to rejoin his friend,
and endeavour to temper his impetuosity by some of his
own coolness and discretion. It required but a minute or
two to put this plan in execution, the canoe returning to
the strand some ten or fifteen minutes after it had left it.
Contrary to his expectations, perhaps, Deerslayer found the
Indian at his post, from which he had not stirred, fearful that
his betrothed might arrive during his absence. A conference
followed, in which Chingachgook was made acquainted with
the state of things in the camp. When Hist named the
point as the place of meeting, it was with the expectation of
making her escape from the old position, and of repairing to
a spot that she expected to find without any occupants; but
the sudden change of localities had disconcerted all her
plans. A much greater degree of vigilance than had been
previously required, was now necessary; and the
circumstance
that an aged woman was on watch, also denoted
some special grounds of alarm. All these considerations,
and many more that will readily suggest themselves to the
reader, were briefly discussed, before the young men came
to any decision. The occasion, however, being one that
required acts instead of words, the course to be pursued was
soon chosen.
Disposing of the canoe in such a manner that Hist must
see it, should she come to the place of meeting previously to
their return, the young men looked to their arms, and
prepared
to enter the wood. The whole projection into the lake
contained about two acres of land; and the part that formed
the point, and on which the camp was placed, did not
compose
a surface of more than half that size. It was
principally
covered with oaks, which, as is usual in the American
forests, grew to a great height without throwing out a
branch, and then arched in a dense and rich foliage.
Beneath
,
except the fringe of thick bushes along the shore, there
was very little underbrush; though, in consequence of their
shape, the trees were closer together than is common in
regions
where the axe has been freely used, resembling tall,
straight, rustic columns, upholding the usual canopy of
leaves. The surface of the land was tolerably even, but it
had a small rise near its centre, which divided it into a
northern and southern half. On the latter the Hurons had
built their fire, profiting by the formation to conceal it from
their enemies, who, it will be remembered, were supposed to
be in the castle, which bore northerly. A brook also came
brawling down the sides of the adjacent hills, and found its
way into the lake, on the southern side of the point. It had
cut for itself a deep passage through some of the higher
portions
of the ground, and, in later days, when this spot has
become subjected to the uses of civilization, by its windings
and shaded banks, it has become no mean accessory in
contributing
to the beauty of the place. This brook lay west of
the encampment, and its waters found their way into the
great reservoir of that region on the same side, and quite
near to the spot chosen for the fire. All these peculiarities,
2*
so far as circumstances allowed, had been noted by
Deerslayer
,
and explained to his friend.
The reader will understand that the little rise in the
ground, that lay behind the Indian encampment, greatly
favoured
the secret advance of the two adventurers. It
prevented
the light of the fire diffusing itself on the ground
directly in the rear, although the land fell away towards the
water, so as to leave what might be termed the left, or eastern
flank of the position, unprotected by this covering. We have
said unprotected, though that is not properly the word,
since the knoll behind the huts and the fire, offered a cover
for those who were now stealthily approaching, rather than
any protection to the Indians. Deerslayer did not break
through the fringe of bushes immediately abreast of the
canoe, which might have brought him too suddenly within
the influence of the light, since the hillock did not extend to the
water; but he followed the beach northerly until he had got
nearly on the opposite side of the tongue of land, which
brought him under the shelter of the low acclivity, and
consequently
more in shadow.
As soon as the friends emerged from the bushes, they
stopped to reconnoitre. The fire was still blazing, behind
the little ridge, casting its light upward, into the tops of the
trees, producing an effect that was more pleasing than
advantageous
.
Still the glare had its uses; for, while the
back-ground was in obscurity, the fore-ground was in strong
light; exposing the savages and concealing their foes.
Profiting
by the latter circumstance, the young men advanced
cautiously towards the ridge, Deerslayer in front, for he
insisted
on this arrangement, lest the Delaware should be led
by his feelings into some indiscretion. It required but a
moment
to reach the foot of the little ascent, and then
commenced
the most critical part of the enterprise. Moving
with exceeding caution, and trailing his rifle, both to keep
its barrel out of view, and in readiness for service, the hunter
put foot before foot, until he had got sufficiently high to
overlook
the summit, his own head being alone brought into the
light. Chingachgook was at his side, and both paused to
take another close examination of the camp. In order,
however
,
to protect themselves against any straggler in the rear,
they placed their bodies against the trunk of an oak,
standing
on the side next the fire.
The view that Deerslayer now obtained of the camp, was
exactly the reverse of that he had perceived from the water.
The dim figures which he had formerly discovered must have
been on the summit of the ridge, a few feet in advance of
the spot where he was now posted. The fire was still
blazing
brightly, and around it were seated on logs, thirteen
warriors, which accounted for all whom he had seen from
the canoe. They were conversing, with much earnestness
among themselves, the image of the elephant passing from
hand to hand. The first burst of savage wonder had abated,
and the question now under discussion, was the probable
existence, the history and the habits of so extraordinary an
animal. We have not leisure to record the opinions of
these rude men on a subject so consonant to their lives and
experience; but little is hazarded in saying that they were
quite as plausible, and far more ingenious, than half the
conjectures that precede the demonstrations of science.
However much they may have been at fault, as to their
conclusions and inferences, it is certain that they discussed
the questions with a zealous and most undivided attention.
For the time being, all else was forgotten, and our
adventurers
could not have approached at a more fortunate
instant
.
The females were collected near each other, much as
Deerslayer had last seen them, nearly in a line between the
place where he now stood and the fire. The distance from
the oak against which the young men leaned, and the
warriors
,
was about thirty yards; the women may have been
half that number of yards nigher. The latter, indeed, were
so near as to make the utmost circumspection, as to motion
and noise, indispensable. Although they conversed in their
low, soft voices, it was possible, in the profound stillness of
the woods, even to catch passages of the discourse; and the
light-hearted laugh that escaped the girls, might
occasionally
have reached the canoe. Deerslayer felt the tremour that
passed through the frame of his friend, when the latter first
caught the sweet sounds that issued from the plump, pretty
lips of Hist. He even laid a hand on the shoulder of the
Indian, as a sort of admonition to command himself. As
the conversation grew more earnest, each leaned forward to
listen.
The Hurons have more curious beasts than that, said
one of the girls, contemptuously, for, like the men, they
conversed
of the elephant and his qualities. The Delawares
will think this creature wonderful, but to-morrow, no Huron
tongue will talk of it. Our young men will find him, if the
animal dares to come near our wigwams!
This was in fact addressed to Wah-tal-Wah, though she
who spoke uttered her words with an assumed diffidence
and humility, that prevented her looking at the other.
The Delawares are so far from letting such creatures
come into their country, returned Hist, that no one has
even seen their images there! Their young men would
frighten away the
images
as well as the
beasts
.
The Delaware young men!the nation is women,
even the deer walk when they hear their hunters coming!
Who has ever heard the name of a young Delaware
warrior
?
This was said in good-humour, and with a laugh; but it
was also said, bitingly. That Hist so felt it, was apparent
by the spirit betrayed in her answer.
Who has ever heard the name of a young Delaware!
she repeated earnestly. Tamenund, himself, though now
as old as the pines on the hill, or as the eagles in the air,
was once young; his name was heard from the great salt
lake, to the sweet waters of the west. What is the family
of Uncas? Where is another as great, though the pale-faces
have ploughed up its graves, and trodden on its bones? Do
the eagles fly as high, is the deer as swift, or the panther as
brave? Is there no young warrior of that race? Let the
Huron maidens open their eyes wider, and they may see
one called Chingachgook, who is as stately as a young ash,
and as tough as the hickory.
As the girl used her figurative language, and told her
companions to open their eyes, and they would see the
Delaware, Deerslayer thrust his fingers into the sides of his
friend, and indulged in a fit of his hearty, benevolent
laughter
.
The other smiled; but the language of the speaker
was too flattering, and the tones of her voice too sweet for
him to be led away, by any accidental coincidence,
however
ludicrous. The speech of Hist produced a retort, and
the dispute, though conducted in good-humour, and without
any of the coarse violence of tone and gesture that often
impairs the charms of the sex in what is called civilized
life, grew warm and slightly clamorous. In the midst of
this scene, the Delaware caused his friend to stoop, so as
completely to conceal himself, and then he made a noise so
closely resembling the little chirrup of the smallest species
of the American squirrel, that Deerslayer himself, though
he had heard the imitation a hundred times, actually thought
it came from one of the little animals, skipping about, over
his head. The sound is so familiar in the woods, that none
of the Hurons paid it the least attention. Hist, however,
instantly ceased talking, and sate motionless. Still, she had
sufficient self-command to abstain from turning her head.
She had heard the signal, by which her lover so often
called her from the wigwam, to the stolen interview, and it
came over her senses and her heart, as the serenade affects
the maiden in the land of song.
From that moment, Chingachgook felt certain that his
presence was known. This was effecting much, and he
could now hope for a bolder line of conduct on the part of
his mistress, than she might dare to adopt under an
uncertainty
of his situation. It left no doubt of her endeavouring
to aid him in his effort to release her. Deerslayer arose, as
soon as the signal was given, and though he had never held
that sweet communion which is known only to lovers, he
was not slow to detect the great change that had come over
the manner of the girl. She still affected to dispute, though
it was no longer with spirit and ingenuity, but what she
said was uttered more as a lure to draw her antagonists on
to an easy conquest, than with any hopes of succeeding
herself. Once or twice, it is true, her native readiness
suggested a retort, or an argument that raised a laugh, and
gave her a momentary advantage; but these little sallies,
the offspring of mother-wit, served the better to conceal her
real feelings, and to give to the triumph of the other party,
a more natural air than it might have possessed without
them. At length the disputants became wearied, and they
rose in a body, as if about to separate. It was now that Hist,
for the first time, ventured to turn her face in the direction
whence the signal had come. In doing this, her movements
were natural but guarded, and she stretched her arm and
yawned, as if overcome with a desire to sleep. The chirrup
was again heard, and the girl felt satisfied as to the position
of her lover, though the strong light in which she herself
was placed, and the comparative darkness in which the
adventurers
stood, prevented her from seeing their heads, the
only portions of their forms that appeared above the ridge
at all. The tree against which they were posted, had a
dark shadow cast upon it by the intervention of an
enormous
pine that grew between it and the fire, a circumstance
which alone would have rendered objects within its cloud
invisible
at any distance. This Deerslayer well knew, and it
was one of the reasons why he had selected this particular tree.
The moment was near when it became necessary for
Hist to act. She was to sleep in a small hut, or bower,
that had been built near the spot where she stood, and her
companion was the aged hag, already mentioned. Once
within the hut, with this sleepless old woman stretched across
the entrance, as was her nightly practice, the hope of escape
was nearly destroyed, and she might, at any moment, be
summoned to her bed. Luckily, at this instant, one of the
warriors called to the old woman by name, and bade her
bring him water to drink. There was a delicious spring on
the northern side of the point, and the hag took a gourd
from a branch, and summoning Hist to her side, she moved
towards the summit of the ridge, intending to descend and
cross the point to the natural fountain. All this was seen
and understood by the adventurers, and they fell back into
the obscurity, concealing their persons by trees, until the two
females had passed them. In walking, Hist was held tightly
by the hand. As she moved by the tree, that hid
Chingachgook
and his friend, the former felt for his tomahawk,
with the intention to bury it in the brain of the woman.
But the other saw the hazard of such a measure, since a
single scream might bring all the warriors upon them, and
he was averse to the act on considerations of humanity.
His hand, therefore, prevented the blow. Still as the two
moved past, the chirrup was repeated, and the Huron woman
stopped and faced the tree whence the sounds seemed to
proceed, standing, at the moment, within six feet of her
enemies
.
She expressed her surprise that a squirrel should be
in motion at so late an hour, and said it boded evil. Hist
answered that she had heard the same squirrel three times
within the last twenty minutes, and that she supposed it was
waiting to obtain some of the crums left from the late
supper. This explanation appeared satisfactory, and they
moved towards the spring, the men following stealthily and
closely. The gourd was filled, and the old woman was
hurrying back, her hand still grasping the wrist of the girl,
when she was suddenly seized so violently by the throat,
as to cause her to release her captive, and to prevent her
making any other sound than a sort of gurgling, suffocating
noise. The Serpent passed his arm round the waist of his
mistress, and dashed through the bushes with her, on the
north side of the point. Here he immediately turned along
the beach, and ran towards the canoe. A more direct course
could have been taken, but it might have led to a discovery
of the place of embarking.
Deerslayer kept playing on the throat of the old woman,
like the keys of an organ, occasionally allowing her to
breathe, and then compressing his fingers again, nearly to
strangling. The brief intervals for breath, however, were
well improved, and the hag succeeded in letting out a
screech or two that served to alarm the camp. The tramp
of the warriors, as they sprang from the fire, was plainly
audible; and, at the next moment, three or four of them
appeared on the top of the ridge, drawn against the
background
of light, resembling the dim shadows of the
phantasmagoria
.
It was now quite time for the hunter to retreat.
Tripping up the heels of his captive, and giving her throat
a parting squeeze, quite as much in resentment at her
indomitable
efforts to sound the alarm, as from any policy, he
left her on her back, and moved towards the bushes; his rifle
at a poise, and his head over his shoulders, like a lion at
bay.
CHAPTER II.
There, ye wise saints, behold your light, your star,
Ye
would
be dupes and victims, and ye
are
.
Is it enough? or, must I, while a thrill
Lives in your sapient bosoms, cheat you still?
Moore
.
The
fire, the canoe, and the spring, near which
Deerslayer
commenced his retreat, would have stood in the
angles
of a triangle of tolerably equal sides. The distance
from the fire to the boat was a little less than the distance
from the fire to the spring, while the distance from the
spring to the boat, was about equal to that between the two
points first named. This, however, was in straight lines
a means of escape to which the fugitives could not resort.
They were obliged to have recourse to a
dtour
in order to
get the cover of the bushes, and to follow the curvature of
the beach. Under these disadvantages, then, the hunter
commenced his retreatdisadvantages that he felt to be so
much the greater, from his knowledge of the habits of all
Indians, who rarely fail in cases of sudden alarm, more
especially
when in the midst of cover, immediately to throw
out flankers, with a view to meet their foes at all points, and
if possible to turn their rear. That some such course was
now adopted, he believed from the tramp of feet, which not
only camp up the ascent, as related, but were also heard,
under the faint impulse, diverging not only towards the hill
in the rear, but towards the extermity of the point, in a
direction
opposite to that he was about to take himself.
Promptitude consequently became a matter of the last
importance
,
as the parties might meet on the strand, before the
fugitive could reach the canoe.
Notwithstanding the pressing nature of the emergency,
Deerslayer hesitated a single instant, ere he plunged into
the bushes that lined the shore. His feelings had been
awakened by the whole scene, and a sternness of purpose
had come over him, to which he was ordinarily a stranger.
Four dark figures loomed on the ridge, drawn against the
brightness of the fire, and an enemy might have been
sacrificed
at a glance. The Indians had paused to gaze into the
gloom, in search of the screeching hag; and with many a
man less given to reflection than that of the hunter, the
death of one of them would have been certain. Luckily,
he was more prudent. Although the rifle dropped a little
towards the foremost of his pursuers, he did not aim or fire,
but disappeared in the cover. To gain the beach, and to
follow it round to the place where Chingachgook was
already
in the canoe, with Hist, anxiously waiting his
appearance
,
occupied but a moment. Laying his rifle in the
bottom
of the canoe, Deerslayer stooped to give the latter a
vigorous shove from the shore, when a powerful Indian
leaped through the bushes, alighting like a panther on his
back. Every thing was now suspended by a hair; a false
step ruining all. With a generosity that would have
rendered
a Roman illustrious throughout all timebut which,
in the career of one so simple and humble, would have been
for ever lost to the world, but for this unpretending legend,
Deerslayer threw all his force into a desperate effort, shoved
the canoe off with a power that sent it a hundred feet from
the shore as it might be in an instant, and fell forward into
the lake, himself, face downward; his assailant necessarily
following him.
Although the water was deep within a few yards of the
beach, it was not more than breast-high as close in as the spot
where the two combatants fell. Still this was quite
sufficient
to destroy one who had sunk under the great
disadvantages
in which Deerslayer was placed. His hands were free,
however, and the savage was compelled to relinquish his hug
to keep his own face above the surface. For half a minute
there was a desperate struggle, like the floundering of an
alligator that has just seized some powerful prey, and then
both stood erect, grasping each other's arms, in order to
prevent
the use of the deadly knife in the darkness. What
might have been the issue of this severe personal struggle
cannot be known, for half-a-dozen savages came leaping into
the water to the aid of their friend, and Deerslayer yielded
himself a prisoner with a dignity that was as remarkable as
his self-devotion.
Vol. II.3
To quit the lake and lead their new captive to the fire,
occupied the Indians but another minute. So much engaged
were they all with the struggle and its consequences that the
canoe was unseen, though it still lay so near the shore as to
render every syllable that was uttered perfectly intelligible
to the Delaware and his betrothed; and the whole party left
the spot, some continuing the pursuit after Hist, along the
beach, though most proceeded to the light. Here
Deerslayer's
antagonist so far recovered his breath and his
recollection
,
for he had been throttled nearly to strangulation, as to
relate the manner in which the girl had got off. It was now
too late to assail the other fugitives, for no sooner was his
friend led into the bushes than the Delaware placed his
paddle
into the water, and the light canoe glided noiselessly
away, holding its course towards the centre of the lake,
until
safe from shot, after which it sought the ark.
When Deerslayer reached the fire, he found himself
surrounded
by no less than eight grim savages, among whom
was his old acquaintance Rivenoak. As soon as the latter
caught a glimpse of the captive's countenance, he spoke
apart to his companions, and a low but general exclamation
of pleasure and surprise escaped them. They knew that
the conqueror of their late friend, he who had fallen on the
opposite side of the lake, was in their hands, and subject to
their mercy or vengeance. There was no little admiration
mingled in the ferocious looks that were thrown on the
prisoner
,
an admiration that was as much excited by his present
composure as by his past deeds. This scene may be said
to have been the commencement of the great and terrible
reputation that Deerslayer, or Hawkeye, as he was
afterwards
called, enjoyed among all the tribes of New York and
Canada; a reputation that was certainly more limited in its
territorial and numerical extent, than those which are
possessed
in civilized life, but which was compensated for what
it wanted in these particulars, perhaps, by its greater justice,
and the total absence of mystification and management.
The arms of Deerslayer were not pinioned, and he was
left the free use of his hands, his knife having been first
removed. The only precaution that was taken to secure
his person was untiring watchfulness, and a strong rope of
bark that passed from ancle to ancle, not so much to prevent
his walking as to place an obstacle in the way of his
attempting
to escape by any sudden leap. Even this extra
provision
against flight was not made until the captive had been
brought to the light and his character ascertained. It was,
in fact, a compliment to his prowess, and he felt proud of
the distinction. That he might be bound when the warriors
slept he thought probable, but to be bound in the moment of
capture, showed that he was already, and thus early,
attaining
a name. While the young Indians were fastening the
rope, he wondered if Chingachgook would have been treated
in the same manner, had he too fallen into the hands of the
enemy. Nor did the reputation of the young pale-face rest
altogether on his success in the previous combat, or in his
discriminating and cool manner of managing the late
negotiation
;
for it had received a great accession by the
occurrences
of the night. Ignorant of the movements of the ark,
and of the accident that had brought their fire into view, the
Iroquois attributed the discovery of their new camp to the
vigilance of so shrewd a foe. The manner in which he
ventured
upon the point, the abstraction or escape of Hist, and
most of all the self-devotion of the prisoner, united to the
readiness with which he had sent the canoe adrift, were so
many important links in the chain of facts on which his
growing fame was founded. Many of these circumstances
had been seen, some had been explained, and all were
understood
.
While this admiration, and these honours were so
unreservedly
bestowed on Deerslayer, he did not escape some
of the penalties of his situation. He was permitted to seat
himself on the end of a log, near the fire, in order to dry
his clothes, his late adversary standing opposite, now
holding
articles of his own scanty vestments to the heat, and
now feeling his throat, on which the marks of his enemy's
fingers were still quite visible. The rest of the warriors
consulted together, near at hand, all those who had been out
having returned to report that no signs of any other
prowlers
near the camp were to be found. In this state of things,
the old woman, whose name was Shebear, in plain English,
approached Deerslayer, with her fists clenched and her eyes
flashing fire. Hitherto she had been occupied with
screaming
,
an employment at which she had played her part with
no small degree of success, but having succeeded in
effectually
alarming all within reach of a pair of lungs that had
been strengthened by long practice, she next turned her
attention
to the injuries her own person had sustained in the
struggle. These were in no manner material, though they
were of a nature to arouse all the fury of a woman who had
long ceased to attract by means of the gentler qualities, and
who was much disposed to revenge the hardships she had
so long endured, as the neglected wife and mother of
savages
,
on all who came within her power. If Deerslayer
had not permanently injured her, he had temporarily caused
her to suffer, and she was not a person to overlook a wrong
of this nature on account of its motive.
Skunk of the pale-faces, commenced this exasperated
and semi-poetic fury, shaking her fist under the nose of the
impassable hunter, you are not even a woman. Your
friends, the Delawares, are only women, and you are their
sheep. Your own people will not own you, and no tribe of
red
men
would have you in their wigwams; you skulk
among petticoated warriors.
You
slay our brave friend who
has left us? nohis great soul scorned to fight you, and
left his body rather than have the shame of slaying
you!
But the blood that you spilt when the spirit was not looking
on, has not sunk into the ground. It must be buried in
your groans  what music do I hear? Those are not the
wailings of a red man!  no red warrior groans so much
like a hog. They come from a pale-face throata Yengeese
bosom, and sound as pleasant as girls singing.  Dog
skunkwood-chuckmink  hedge-hogpigtoad
spider
Yengee
Here the old woman having expended her breath, and
exhausted her epithets, was fain to pause a moment, though
both her fists were shook in the prisoner's face, and the
whole of her wrinkled countenance was filled with fierce
resentment. Deerslayer looked upon these impotent
attempts
to arouse him, as indifferently as a gentleman in our
own state of society regards the vituperative terms of a
blackguard: the one party feeling that the tongue of an
old woman could never injure a warrior, and the other
knowing that mendacity and vulgarity can only permanent
ly affect those who resort to their use; but he was spared
any further attack at present, by the interposition of
Rivenoak
,
who shoved aside the hag, bidding her quit the spot,
and prepared to take his seat at the side of his prisoner.
The old woman withdrew, but the hunter well understood
that he was to be the subject of all her means of annoyance,
if not of positive injury, so long as he remained in the
power of his enemies; for nothing rankles so deeply as
the consciousness that an attempt to irritate has been met
by contempt, a feeling that is usually the most passive of
any that is harboured in the human breast. Rivenoak
quietly
took the seat we have mentioned, and, after a short
pause, he commenced a dialogue, which we translate as
usual, for the benefit of those readers who have not studied
the North American languages.
My pale-face friend is very welcome, said the Indian,
with a familiar nod, and a smile so covert that it required
all Deerslayer's vigilance to detect, and not a little of his
philosophy to detect unmoved; he is welcome. The
Hurons
keep a hot fire to dry the white man's clothes by.
I thank you, Huron, or Mingo, as I most like to call
you, returned the other; I thank you for the welcome,
and I thank you for the fire. Each is good in its way, and
the last is very good, when one has been in a spring as cold
as the Glimmerglass. Even Huron warmth may be
pleasant
,
at such a time, to a man with a Delaware heart.
The pale-facebut my brother has a name? So great
a warrior would not have lived without a name?
Mingo, said the hunter, a little of the weakness of
human
nature exhibiting itself in the glance of his eye, and
the colour on his cheek,Mingo,
your
brave called me
Hawkeye, I suppose on account of a quick and sartain aim,
when he was lying with his head in my lap, afore his spirit
started for the happy hunting-grounds.
'T is a good name! The hawk is sure of his blow.
Hawkeye is not a woman; why does he live with the
Delawares
?
I understand you, Mingo, but we look on all that as a
sarcumvention of some of your subtle devils, and deny the
charge. Providence placed me among the Delawares young;
and, 'bating what Christian usages demand of my colour
and gifts, I hope to live and die in their tribe. Still, I do
3*
not mean to throw away altogether my nat
y
ve rights, and
shall strive to do a pale-face's duty in red-skin society.
Good; a Huron is a red-skin, as well as a Delaware.
Hawkeye is more of a Huron than of a woman.
I suppose you know, Mingo, your own meaning; if you
don't, I make no question 't is well known to Satan. But
if you wish to get any thing out of me, speak plainer, for
bargains cannot be made blindfolded, or tongue-tied.
Good; Hawkeye has not a forked tongue, and he likes
to say what he thinks. He is an acquaintance of the
Muskrat
,this
was a name by which all the Indians designated
Hutter,and he has lived in his wigwam; but he is not a
friend. He wants no scalps, like a miserable Indian, but
fights like a stout-hearted pale-face. The Muskrat is neither
white, nor red; neither a beast, nor a fish. He is a
water-snake
;
sometimes in the spring and sometimes on the land.
He looks for scalps, like an outcast. Hawkeye can go back
and tell him how he has outwitted the Hurons, how he has
escaped; and when his eyes are in a fog, when he can't see
as far as from his cabin to the woods, then Hawkeye can
open the door for the Hurons. And how will the plunder be
divided? Why, Hawkeye will carry away the most, and
the Hurons will take what he may choose to leave behind
him. The scalps can go to Canada, for a pale-face has no
satisfaction in
them
.
Well, well, Rivenoak,for so I hear 'em tarm you,
this is plain English enough, though spoken in Iroquois. I
understand all you mean, now, and must say it out-devils
even Mingo deviltry! No doubt, 't would be easy enough
to go back and tell the Muskrat that I had got away from
you, and gain some credit, too, by the expl'ite.
Good; that is what I want the pale-face to do.
Yes  yes  that's plain enough. I know what you
want me to do, without more words. When inside the house,
and eating the Muskrat's bread, and laughing and talking
with his pretty darters, I might put his eyes into so thick a
fog, that he couldn't even see the door, much less the land.
Good! Hawkeye should have been born a Huron! His
blood is not more than half white!
There you're out, Huron; yes, there you're as much
out, as if you mistook a wolf for a catamount. I'm white
in blood, heart, natur', and gifts, though a little red-skin in
feelin's and habits. But when old Hutter's eyes are well
be-fogged, and his pretty darters, perhaps, in a deep sleep,
and Hurry Harry, the Great Pine, as you Indians tarm him,
is dreaming of any thing but mischief, and all suppose
Hawkeye is acting as a faithful sentinel, all I have to do is,
to set a torch somewhere in sight for a signal, open the door,
and let in the Hurons, to knock 'em all on the head.
Surely my brother is mistaken; he
cannot
be white!
He is worthy to be a great chief among the Hurons!
That is true enough, I dares to say, if he could do all
this. Now, harkee, Huron, and for once hear a few honest
words from the mouth of a plain man. I am a Christian
born, and them that come of such a stock, and that listen
to the words that were spoken to their fathers, and will be
spoken to their children, until 'arth, and all it holds perishes,
can never lend themselves to such wickedness.
Sarcumventions
in war may be, and
are
, lawful; but sarcumventions,
and deceit, and treachery, among fri'nds, are fit only for the
pale-face devils. I know that there are white men enough
to give you this wrong idee of our natur', but such are
ontrue
to their blood and gifts, and ought to be, if they are not,
outcasts and vagabonds. No upright pale-face could do
what you wish, and to be as plain with you as I wish to be,
in my judgment, no upright Delaware, either; with a Mingo
it may be different.
The Huron listened to this rebuke with obvious disgust;
but he had his ends in view, and was too wily to lose all
chance of effecting them, by a precipitate avowal of
resentment
.
Affecting to smile, he seemed to listen eagerly, and
he then pondered on what he had heard.
Does Hawkeye love the Muskrat? he abruptly
demanded
;
or does he love his daughters?
Neither, Mingo. Old Tom is not a man to gain my
love; and, as for the darters, they are comely enough to
gain the liking of any young man; but there's reason ag'in
any very great love for either. Hetty is a good soul, but
natur' has laid a heavy hand on her mind, poor thing!
And the Wild Rose! exclaimed the Huron  for the
fame of Judith's beauty had spread among those who could
travel the wilderness, as well as the highway, by means of
old eagle's nests, rocks, and riven trees, known to them by
report and tradition, as well as among the white borderers
And the Wild Rose; is she not sweet enough to be put in
the bosom of my brother?
Deerslayer had far too much of the innate gentleman to
insinuate aught against the fair fame of one who, by nature
and position, was so helpless; and as he did not choose to
utter untruth, he preferred being silent. The Huron
mistook
the motive, and supposed that disappointed affection
lay at the bottom of his reserve. Still bent on corrupting
or bribing his captive, in order to obtain possession of the
treasures with which his imagination filled the castle, he
persevered in his attack.
Hawkeye is talking with a friend, he continued. He
knows that Rivenoak is a man of his word, for they have
traded together, and trade opens the soul. My friend has
come here, on account of a little string held by a girl, that
can pull the whole body of the stoutest warrior?
You are nearer the truth, now, Huron, than you 've
been afore, since we began to talk. This is true. But
one end of that string was not fast to my heart, nor did the
Wild Rose hold the other.
This is wonderful! Does my brother love in his head,
and not in his heart? And can the Feeble-Mind pull so
hard against so stout a warrior?
There it is ag'in; sometimes right, and sometimes
wrong! The string you mean, is fast to the heart of a
great Delaware; one of Mohican stock in fact, living among
the Delawares since the disparsion of his own people, and
of the family of UncasChingachgook by name, or Great
Sarpent. He has come here, led by the string, and I 've
followed, or rather come afore, for I got here first, pulled
by nothing stronger than fri'ndship; which is strong enough
for such as are not niggardly of their feelin's, and are
willing
to live a little for their fellow-creatur's, as well as for
themselves.
But a string has two endsone is fast to the mind of
a Mohican, and the other?
Why the other was here close to the fire, half an hour
since. Wah-ta!-Wah held it in her hand, if she didn't hold
it to her heart.
I understand what you mean, my brother, returned
the Indian, gravely, for the first time catching a direct clue
to the adventures of the evening. The Great Serpent,
being strongest, pulled the hardest, and Hist was forced to
leave us.
I don't think there was much pulling about it,
answered
the other, laughing, always in his silent manner, with
as much heartiness as if he were not a captive, and in
danger
of torture or death. I don't think there was much
pulling about it; no, I don't. Lord help you, Huron! he
likes the gal, and the gal likes him, and it surpassed Huron
sarcumventions to keep two young people apart, when there
was so strong a feelin' to bring 'em together.
And Hawkeye and Chingachgook came into our camp
on this errand, only?
That's a question that'll answer itself, Mingo! Yes,
if a question could talk, it would answer itself, to your
parfect
satisfaction. For what else should we come? And yet,
it is'nt exactly so, neither; for we didn't come into your
camp at all, but only as far as that pine, there, that you see
on the other side of the ridge, where we stood watching
your movements and conduct, as long as we liked. When
we were ready, the Sarpent gave his signal, and then all
went just as it should, down to the moment when yonder
vagabond leaped upon my back. Sartain; we came for
that, and for no other purpose, and we got what we came
for; there's no use in pretending otherwise. Hist is off
with a man who's the next thing to her husband, and come
what will to me,
that
's one good thing detarmined.
What sign or signal told the young maiden that her
lover was nigh? asked the old Huron, with more curiosity
than it was usual for him to betray.
Deerslayer laughed again, and seemed to enjoy the
success
of the exploit with as much glee, as if he had not been
its victim.
Your squirrels are great gadabouts, Mingo! he cried,
still laughingyes, they 're sartainly great gadabouts!
When other folks' squirrels are at home and asleep, yourn
keep in motion among the trees, and chirrup and sing, in a
way that even a Delaware gal can understand their music!
Well, there's four-legged squirrels, and there's two-legged
squirrels, and give me the last, when there's a good tight
string atween two hearts. If one brings 'em together, t'other
tells when to pull hardest!
The Huron looked vexed, though he succeeded in
suppressing
any violent exhibition of resentment. He soon
quitted his prisoner, and joining the rest of his warriors, he
communicated the substance of what he had learned. As
in his own case admiration was mingled with anger, at the
boldness and success of their enemies. Three or four of
them ascended the little acclivity and gazed at the tree where
it was understood the adventurers had posted themselves,
and one even descended to it, and examined for foot-prints
around its roots, in order to make sure that the statement
was true. The result confirmed the story of the captive,
and they all returned to the fire with increased wonder and
respect. The messenger, who had arrived with some
communication
from the party above, while the two adventurers
were watching the camp, was now dispatched with some
answer, and doubtless bore with him the intelligence of all
that had happened.
Down to this moment, the young Indian who had been
seen walking in company with Hist and another female, had
made no advances to any communication with Deerslayer.
He had held himself aloof from his friends even, passing
near the bevy of younger women who were clustering
together, apart as usual, and conversed in low tones on the
subject of the escape of their late companion. Perhaps it
would be true to say, that these last were pleased as well as
vexed at what had just occurred. Their female sympathies
were with the lovers, while their pride was bound up in the
success of their own tribe. It is possible, too, that the
superior personal advantages of Hist rendered her dangerous
to some of the younger part of the group, and they were not
sorry to find she was no longer in the way of their own
ascendency
.
On the whole, however, the better feeling was
most prevalent; for neither the wild condition in which they
lived, the clannish prejudices of tribes, nor their hard fortunes
as Indian women, could entirely conquer the
inextinguishable
leaning of their sex to the affections. One of the
girls even laughed at the disconsolate look of the swain who
might fancy himself deserted, a circumstance that seemed
suddenly to arouse his energies, and induced him to move
towards the log, on which the prisoner was still seated,
drying his clothes.
This is Catamount! said the Indian, striking his hand
boastfully on his naked breast as he uttered the words, in a
manner to show how much weight he expected them to
carry.
This is Hawkeye, quietly returned Deerslayer,
adopting
the name by which he knew he would be known in
future
,
among all the tribes of the Iroquois. My sight is
keen: is my brother's leap long?
From here to the Delaware villages. Hawkeye has
stolen my wife: he must bring her back, or his scalp will
hang on a pole, and dry in my wigwam.
Hawkeye has stolen nothing, Huron. He doesn't come
of a thieving breed, nor has he theiving gifts. Your wife,
as you call Wah-ta!-Wah, will never be the wife of any
red-skin of the Canadas; her mind is in the cabin of a
Delaware
,
and her body has gone to find it. The catamount
is act
y
ve, I know; but its legs can't keep pace with a
woman's
wishes.
The Serpent of the Delawares is a dog: he is a poor
bull-pout, that keeps in the water; he is afraid to stand on
the hard earth, like a brave Indian!
Well, well, Huron, that's pretty impudent, considering
it's not an hour since the Sarpent stood within a hundred
feet of you, and would have tried the toughness of your skin
with a rifle-bullet, when I pointed you out to him, hadn't I
laid the weight of a little judgment on his hand. You may
take in timersome gals in the settlements, with your
catamount
whine; but the ears of a man can tell truth from
ontruth.
Hist laughs at him! She sees he is lame, and a poor
hunter, and he has never been on a war-path. She will
take a man for a husband, and not a fool.
How do you know that, Catamount? how do you know
that? returned Deerslayer, laughing. She has gone into
the lake, you see, and maybe she prefers a trout to a
mongrel
cat. As for war-paths, neither the Sarpent nor I have
much exper'ence, we are ready to own; but if you don't
call this one, you must tarm it, what the gals in the
settlements
tarm it, the high road to matrimony. Take my
advice
,
Catamount, and s'arch for a wife among the Huron
young women; you'll never get one, with a willing mind,
from among the Delawares.
Catamount's hand felt for his tomahawk, and when the
fingers reached the handle, they worked convulsively, as if
their owner hesitated between policy and resentment. At
this critical moment Rivenoak approached, and, by a gesture
of authority, induced the young man to retire, assuming his
former position, himself, on the log, at the side of
Deerslayer
.
Here he continued silent for a little time,
maintaining
the grave reserve of an Indian chief.
Hawkeye is right, the Iroquois at length began; his
sight is so strong that he can see truth in a dark night, and
our eyes have been blinded. He is owl, darkness hiding
nothing from him. He ought not to strike his friends. He
is right.
I 'm glad you think so, Mingo, returned the other, for
a traitor, in my judgment, is worse than a coward. I care
as little for the Muskrat, as one pale-face ought to care for
another; but I care too much for him, to ambush him in the
way you wished. In short, according to my idees, any
sarcumventions
,
except open-war sarcumventions, are ag'in
both law, and what we whites call `gospel,' too.
My pale-face brother is right; he is no Indian, to forget
his Manitou and his colour. The Hurons know that they
have a great warrior for their prisoner, and they will treat
him as one. If he is to be tortured, his torments shall be
such as no common man can bear; and if he is to be treated
as a friend, it will be the friendship of chiefs.
As the Huron uttered this extraordinary assurance of
consideration, his eye furtively glanced at the countenance
of his listener, in order to discover how he stood the
compliment
;
though his gravity and apparent sincerity would
have prevented any man but one practised in artifices, from
detecting his motives. Deerslayer belonged to the class of
the unsuspicious; and acquainted with the Indian notions
of what constituted respect, in matters connected with the
treatment of captives, he felt his blood chill at the
announcement
,
even while he maintained an aspect so steeled that his
quick-sighted enemy could discover in it no signs of
weakness
.
God has put me in your hands, Huron, the captive at
length answered, and I suppose you will act your will on
me. I shall not boast of what I can do, under torment, for
I've never been tried, and no man can say till he has been;
but I'll do my endivours not to disgrace the people among
whom I got my training. Howsever, I wish you now to
bear witness, that I'm altogether of white blood, and, in a
nat'ral way, of white gifts, too; so, should I be overcome
and forget myself, I hope you'll lay the fault where it
properly
belongs; and in no manner put it on the Delawares,
or their allies and friends the Mohicans. We're all created
with more or less weakness, and I'm afeard it's a
pale-face's
to give in under great bodily torment, when a red-skin
will sing his songs, and boast of his deeds in the very teeth
of his foes!
We shall see. Hawkeye has a good countenance, and
he is toughBut why should he be tormented, when the
Hurons love him? He is not born their enemy; and the
death of one warrior will not cast a cloud between them for
ever.
So much the better, Huron; so much the better. Still
I don't wish to owe any thing to a mistake about each other's
meaning. It is so much the better that you bear no malice
for the loss of a warrior who fell in war; and yet it is ontrue
that there is no inmitylawful inmity I mean, atween us.
So far as I have red-skin feelin's at all, I've Delaware
feelin's
;
and I leave you to judge for yourself, how far they are
likely to be fri'ndly to the Mingos
Deerslayer ceased, for a sort of spectre stood before him,
that put a sudden stop to his words, and, indeed, caused him
for a moment, to doubt the fidelity of his boasted vision.
Hetty Hutter was standing at the side of the fire, as quietly
as if she belonged to the tribe.
As the hunter and the Indian sat watching the emotions
that were betrayed in each other's countenance, the girl had
approached unnoticed, doubtless ascending from the beach
on the southern side of the point, or that next to the spot
where the ark had anchored, and had advanced to the fire
with the fearlessness that belonged to her simplicity, and
Vol. II.4
which was certainly justified by the treatment formerly
received
from the Indians. As soon as Rivenoak perceived
the girl, she was recognised, and calling to two or three of
the younger warriors, the chief sent them out to reconnoitre,
lest her appearance should be the forerunner of another
attack
.
He then motioned to Hetty to draw near.
I hope your visit is a sign that the Sarpent and Hist are
in safety, Hetty, said Deerslayer, as soon as the girl had
complied with the Huron's request. I don't think you'd
come ashore ag'in, on the ar'n'd that brought you here
afore.
Judith told me to come this time, Deerslayer, Hetty
replied; she paddled me ashore herself, in a canoe, as
soon as the Serpent had shown her Hist, and told his
story. How handsome Hist is to-night, Deerslayer, and
how much happier she looks than when she was with the
Hurons!
That's natur', gal; yes, that may be set down as human
natur'. She's with her betrothed, and no longer fears a
Mingo husband. In my judgment, Judith, herself, would
lose most of her beauty if she thought she was to bestow it
all on a Mingo! Content is a great fortifier of good looks;
and I'll warrant you, Hist is contented enough, now she is
out of the hands of these miscreants, and with her chosen
warrior! Did you say that your sister told you to come
ashorewhy should Judith do that?
She bid me come to see you, and to try and persuade
the savages to take more elephants to let you off; but I've
brought the Bible with me
that
will do more than all the
elephants in father's chest!
And your father, good little Hettyand Hurry; did
they know of your ar'n'd?
Nothing. Both are asleep; and Judith and the Serpent
thought it best they should not be woke, lest they might
want to come again after scalps, when Hist had told them
how few warriors, and how many women and children ther
were in the camp. Judith would give me no peace, till I
had come ashore, to see what had happened to you.
Well, that's remarkable, as consarns Judith! Why
should she feel so much unsartainty about me? Ay, I see
how it is, now; yes, I see into the whole matter, now. You
must understand, Hetty, that your sister is oneasy lest Harry
March should wake, and come blundering here into the
hands of the inimy ag'in, under some idee that, being a
travelling comrade, he ought help me in this matter! Hurry
is a blunderer, I will allow; but I don't think he'd risk as
much for my sake, as he would for his own.
Judith don't care for Hurry, though Hurry cares for
her, replied Hetty, innocently, but quite positively.
I've heard you say as much as that afore; yes, I've
heard that from you, afore, gal; and yet it isn't true. One
don't live in a tribe, not to see something of the way in which
liking works in a woman's heart. Though no way given
to marrying myself, I've been a looker-on among the
Delawares
,
and this is a matter in which pale-face and red-skin
gifts are all as one the same. When the feelin' begins,
the young woman is thoughtful, and has no eyes or ears
onless
for the warrior that has taken her fancy; then follows
melancholy and sighing, and such sort of actions; after
which, especially if matters don't come to plain discourse,
she often flies round to backbiting and fault-finding, blaming
the youth for the very things she likes best in him. Some
young creatur's are forward in this way of showing their
love, and I'm of opinion, Judith is one of 'em. Now, I've
heard her as much as deny that Hurry was good-looking;
and the young woman who could do
that,
must be far gone
indeed.
The young woman who liked Hurry would own that he
is handsome.
I
think Hurry
very
handsome, Deerslayer,
and I'm sure everybody must think so, that has eyes.
Judith
don't like Harry March, and that's the reason she finds
fault with him.
`Wellwellmy good little Hetty, have it your own
way. If we should talk from now till winter, each would
think as at present; and there's no use in words. I must
believe that Judith is much wrapped up in Hurry, and that,
sooner or later, she'll have him; and this, too, all the more
from the manner in which she abuses him; and I dare to
say, you think just the contrary. But mind what I now tell
you, gal, and pretend not to know it, continued this being,
who was so obtuse on a point on which men are usually
quick enough to make discoveries, and so acute in matters
that would baffle the observation of much the greater portion
of mankind; I see how it is, with these vagabonds.
Rivenoak
has left us, you see, and is talking yonder with his
young men; and though too far to be
heard,
I can
see
what
he is telling them. Their orders is to watch your
movements
,
and to find where the canoe is to meet you, to take
you back to the ark, and then to seize all and what they
can. I'm sorry Judith sent you, for I suppose she wants
you to go back ag'in.
All that's settled, Deerslayer, returned the girl, in a
low, confidential, and meaning manner; and you may
trust me to out-wit the best Indian of them all. I know I
am feeble-minded, but I've got
some
sense, and you 'll see
how I'll use it, in getting back, when my errand is done!
Ahs! me, poor girl; I'm afeard all that's easier said
than done. They 're a venomous set of ript
y
les, and their
p'ison's none the milder for the loss of Hist. Well, I'm
glad the Sarpent was the one to get off with the gal; for
now there'll be two happy, at least; whereas, had
he
fallen
into the hands of the Mingos, there'd been two miserable,
and another far from feelin' as a man likes to feel.
Now you put me in mind of a part of my errand, that I
had almost forgotten, Deerslayer. Judith told me to ask
you what you thought the Hurons would do with you if you
couldn't be bought off, and what
she
had best do to serve
you. Yes, this was the most important part of the errand
what she had best do in order to serve you.
That's as
you
think, Hetty; but it's no matter. Young
women are apt to lay most stress on what most touches their
feelin's; but no matter; have it your own way, so you be
but careful not to let the vagabonds get the mastery of a
canoe. When you get back to the ark, tell'em to keep
close, and to keep moving too, most especially at night.
Many hours can't go by without the troops on the river
hearing of this party, and then your fri'nds may look for
relief. 'Tis but a day's march from the nearest garrison,
and true soldiers will never lie idle with the foe in their
neighbourhood
.
This is my advice, and you may say to your
father and Hurry that scalp-hunting will be a poor business
now, as the Mingos are up and awake, and nothing can
save 'em 'till the troops come, except keeping a good belt of
water atween 'em and the savages.
What shall I tell Judith about you, Deerslayer? I know
she will send me back again, if I don't bring her the truth
about
you
.
Then tell her the
truth
. I see no reason Judith Hutter
shouldn't hear the
truth
about me as well as a
lie
. I'm a
capt
y
ve in Indian hands, and Providence only knows what
will come of it! Hark'ee, Hettydropping his voice and
speaking still more confidentially, you
are
a little
weak-minded
,
it must be allowed, but you know something of
Indians
.
Here I am in their hands, after having slain one of
their stoutest warriors, and they've been endivouring to work
upon me, through fear of consequences, to betray your
father
and all in the ark. I understand the blackguards as
well as if they'd told it all out plainly with their tongues.
They hold up avarice afore me on one side, and fear on
t'other, and think honesty will give way atween 'em both.
But let your father and Hurry know 'tis all useless; as for
the Sarpent,
he
knows it already.
But what shall I tell
Judith?
She will certainly send
me back if I don't satisfy her mind.
Well, tell Judith the same. No doubt the savages will
try the torments to make me give in and to revenge the loss
of their warrior, but I must hold out ag'in nat'ral weakness
in the best manner I can. You may tell Judith to feel no
consarn on my accountit will come hard I know, seeing
that a white man's gifts don't run to boasting and singing
under torment, for he generally feels smallest when he
suffers
mostbut you may tell her not to have any consarn.
I think I shall make out to stand it; and she may rely on
this, let me give in as much as I may, and prove completely
that I am white, by wailings, and howlings, and even tears,
yet I'll never fall so far as to betray my fri'nds. When it
gets to burning holes in the flesh with heated ramrods, and
to hacking the body, and tearing the hair out by the roots,
natur' may get the upperhand, so far as groans and
complaints
are consarned, but there the triumph of the
vagabonds
will end; nothing short of God's abandoning him to
the devils, can make an honest man ontrue to his colour and
duty.
4*
Hetty listened with great attention, and her mild but
speaking
countenance manifested a strong sympathy in the
anticipated
agony of the supposititious sufferer. At first she
seemed at a loss how to act; then, taking a hand of
Deerslayer's, she affectionately recommended to him to
borrow
her Bible, and to read in it while the savages were
inflicting
their torments. When the other honestly admitted
that it exceeded his power to read, she even volunteered to
remain with him, and to perform this holy office in person.
The offer was gently declined, and Rivenoak being about to
join them, Deerslayer requested the girl to leave him, first
enjoining her again to tell those in the ark to have full
confidence
in his fidelity. Hetty now walked away, and
approached
the group of females with as much confidence and
self-possession as if she were a native of the tribe. On the
other hand, the Huron resumed his seat by the side of his
prisoner, the one continuing to ask questions with all the
wily ingenuity of a practised Indian counsellor, and the
other baffling him by the very means that are known to be
the most efficacious in defeating the finesse of the more
pretending
diplomacy of civilization, or by confining his
answers
to the truth, and the truth only.
CHAPTER III.
Thus died she; never more on her
Shall sorrow light, or shame. She was not made
Through years or moons the inner weight to bear,
Which colder hearts endure till they are laid
By age in earth; her days and pleasures were
Brief but delightfulsuch as had not stayed
Long with her destiny; but she sleeps well
By the sea-shore whereon she loved to dwell.
Byron
.
The
young men who had been sent out to reconnoitre,
on the sudden appearance of Hetty, soon returned to report
their want of success in making any discovery. One of
them had even been along the beach as far as the spot
opposite
to the ark, but the darkness had completely concealed
that vessel from his notice. Others had examined in
different
directions, and everywhere the stillness of night was
added to the silence and solitude of the woods. It was
consequently
believed that the girl had come alone, as on her
former visit, and on some similar errand. The Iroquois were
ignorant that the ark had left the castle, and there were
movements
projected, if not in the course of actual execution by
this time, which also greatly added to the sense of security.
A watch was set, therefore, and all but the sentinels disposed
themselves to sleep.
Sufficient care was had to the safe keeping of the captive,
without inflicting on him any unnecessary suffering; and,
as for Hetty, she was permitted to find a place among the
Indian girls, in the best manner she could. She did not
find the friendly offices of Hist, though her character not
only bestowed impunity from pain and captivity, but it
procured
for her a consideration and an attention that placed her,
on the score of comfort, quite on a level with the wild but
gentle beings around her. She was supplied with a skin,
and made her own bed on a pile of boughs a little apart
from the huts. Here she was soon in a profound sleep, like
all around her.
There were now thirteen men in the party, and three kept
watch at a time. One remained in shadow, not far from
the fire, however. His duty was to guard the captive, to
take care that the fire neither blazed up so as to illuminate
the spot, nor yet become wholly extinguished; and to keep
an eye generally on the state of the camp. Another passed
from one beach to the other, crossing the base of the point,
while the third kept moving slowly around the strand on its
outer extremity, to prevent a repetition of the surprise that
had already taken place that night. This arrangement was
far from being usual among savages, who ordinarily rely
more on the secresy of their movements, than on vigilance
of this nature; but it had been called for by the peculiarity
of the circumstances in which the Hurons were now placed.
Their position was known to their foes, and it could not
easily be changed at an hour which demanded rest.
Perhaps
,
too, they placed most of their confidence on the
knowledge
of what they believed to be passing higher up the lake,
and which, it was thought, would fully occupy the whole
of the pale-faces, who were at liberty, with their solitary
Indian ally. It was also probable Rivenoak was aware,
that, in holding his captive, he had in his own hands the
most dangerous of all his enemies.
The precision with which those accustomed to
watchfulness
,
or lives of disturbed rest, sleep, is not the least of the
phenomena of our mysterious being. The head is no sooner
on the pillow, than consciousness is lost; and yet, at a
necessary
hour, the mind appears to arouse the body, as
promptly as if it had stood sentinel the while over it. There
can be no doubt that they who are thus roused, awake by
the influence of thought over matter, though the mode in
which this influence is exercised must remain hidden from
our curiosity, until it shall be explained, should that hour
ever arrive, by the entire enlightenment of the soul, on the
subject of all human mysteries. Thus it was with Hetty
Hutter. Feeble as the immaterial portion of her existence
was thought to be, it was sufficiently active to cause her to
open her eyes at midnight. At that hour she awoke, and
leaving her bed of skin and boughs, she walked innocently
and openly to the embers of the fire, stirring the latter, as
the coolness of the night and the woods, in connection with
an exceedingly unsophisticated bed, had a little chilled her.
As the flame shot up, it lighted the swarthy countenance of
the Huron on watch, whose dark eyes glistened under its
light, like the balls of the panther that is pursued to his den
with burning brands. But Hetty felt no fear, and she
approached
the spot where the Indian stood. Her movements
were so natural, and so perfectly devoid of any of the
stealthiness
of cunning, or deception, that he imagined she had
merely arisen on account of the coolness of the night, a
common occurrence in a bivouac, and the one of all others,
perhaps, the least likely to excite suspicion. Hetty spoke
to him, but he understood no English. She then gazed
near a minute at the sleeping captive, and moved slowly
away, in a sad and melancholy manner.
The girl took no pains to conceal her movements. Any
ingenious expedient of this nature, quite likely, exceeded her
powers; still her step was habitually light, and scarcely
audible. As she took the direction of the extremity of the
point, or the place where she had landed in the first
adventure
,
and where Hist had embarked, the sentinel saw her
light form gradually disappear in the gloom without
uneasiness
,
or changing his own position. He knew that others
were on the look-out, and he did not believe that one who
had twice come into the camp voluntarily, and had already
left it openly, would take refuge in flight. In short, the
conduct of the girl excited no more attention than that of
any person of feeble intellect would excite in civilized
society
,
while her person met with more consideration and
respect.
Hetty certainly had no very distinct notions of the
localities
,
but she found her way to the beach, which she reached
on the same side of the point as that on which the camp had
been made. By following the margin of the water, taking
a northern direction, she soon encountered the Indian, who
paced the strand as sentinel. This was a young warrior,
and when he heard her light tread coming along the gravel,
he approached swiftly, though with any thing but menace
in his manner. The darkness was so intense that it was
not easy to discover forms, within the shadows of the woods,
at the distance of twenty feet, and quite impossible to
distinguish
persons until near enough to touch them. The
young Huron manifested disappointment when he found
whom he had met; for, truth to say, he was expecting his
favourite, who had promised to relieve the
ennui
of a
midnight
watch with her presence. This man was also
ignorant
of English, but he was at no loss to understand why
the girl should be up at that hour. Such things were usual
in an Indian village and camp, where sleep is as irregular
as the meals. Then poor Hetty's known imbecility, as in
most things connected with the savages, stood her friend on
this occasion. Vexed at his disappointment, and impatient
of the presence of one he thought an intruder, the young
warrior signed for the girl to move forward, holding the
direction
of the beach. Hetty complied; but, as she walked
away, she spoke aloud in English, in her usual soft tones,
which the stillness of the night made audible at some little
distance.
If you took me for a Huron girl, warrior, she said, I
don't wonder you are so little pleased. I am Hetty Hutter,
Thomas Hutter's daughter, and have never met any man at
night, for mother always said it was wrong, and modest
young women should never do it; modest young women of
the pale-faces, I mean; for customs are different in different
parts of the world, I know. No, no; I'm Hetty Hutter, and
wouldn't meet even Hurry Harry, though he should fall
down on his knees and ask me! mother said it was wrong.
By the time Hetty had said this, she reached the place
where the canoes had come ashore, and, owing to the
curvature
of the land and the bushes, would have been
completely
hid from the sight of the sentinel, had it been broad
day. But another footstep had caught the lover's ear, and
he was already nearly beyond the sound of the girl's silvery
voice. Still Hetty, bent only on her own thoughts and
purposes
,
continued to speak, though the gentleness of her tones
prevented the sounds from penetrating far into the woods.
On the water they were more widely diffused.
Here I am, Judith, she added, and there is no one
near me. The Huron on watch has gone to meet his
sweetheart
,
who is an Indian girl, you know, and never had a
Christian mother to tell her how wrong it is to meet a man
at night
Hetty's voice was hushed by a hist! that came from
the water, and then she caught a dim view of the canoe,
which approached noiselessly, and soon grated on the
shingle
with its bow. The moment the weight of Hetty was
felt in the light craft, the canoe withdrew, stern foremost, as
if possessed of life and volition, until it was a hundred yards
from the shore. Then it turned, and, making a wide
sweep, as much to prolong the passage as to get beyond the
sound of voices, it held its way towards the ark. For
several
minutes nothing was uttered; but, believing herself to
be in a favourable position to confer with her sister, Judith,
who alone sat in the stern, managing the canoe with a skill
little short of that of a man, began a discourse, which she
had been burning to commence ever since they had quitted
the point.
Here we are safe, Hetty, she said, and may talk
without
the fear of being overheard. You must speak low,
however, for sounds are heard far on the water, in a still
night. I was so close to the point, some of the time, while
you were on it, that I have heard the voices of the warriors,
and I heard your shoes on the gravel of the beach, even
before
you spoke.
I don't believe, Judith, the Hurons know I have left
them.
Quite likely they do not, for a lover makes a poor
sentry
,
unless it be to watch for his sweetheart! But tell me,
Hetty, did you see and speak with Deerslayer?
Oh, yesthere he was seated near the fire, with his
legs tied, though they left his arms free, to move them as he
pleased.
Well, what did he tell you, child? Speak quick; I am
dying to know what message he sent me.
What did he tell me? why, what do you think, Judith;
he told me that he couldn't read! Only think of that! a
white man, and not know how to read his bible, even! He
never could have had a mother, sister!
Never mind
that,
Hetty. All men can't read; though
mother knew so much, and taught us so much, father
knows very little about books, and he can barely read the
bible, you know.
Oh! I never thought fathers
could
read much, but
mothers
ought all to read, else how can they teach their
children
?
Depend on it, Judith, Deerslayer could never have
had a mother, else he would know how to read.
Did you tell him
I
sent you ashore, Hetty, and how
much concern I feel for his misfortune? asked the other,
impatiently.
I believe I did, Judith; but you know I am feeble-minded,
and I may have forgotten. I
did
tell him you brought me
ashore. And he told me a great deal that I was to say to
you, which I remember well, for it made my blood run cold
to hear him. He told me to say that his friendsI suppose
you are one of them, sister?
How can you torment me thus, Hetty! Certainly, I
am one of the truest friends he has on earth.
Torment you! yes, now I remember all about it. I am
glad you used that word, Judith, for it brings it all back to
my mind. Well, he said he might be
tormented
by the
savages
,
but he would try to bear it as becomes a Christian
white man, and that no one need be afeardwhy does
Deerslayer
call it afeard, when mother always taught us to say
afraid?
Never mind, dear Hetty, never mind
that,
now, cried
the other, almost gasping for breath. Did Deerslayer
really tell you that he thought the savages would put him
to the torture? Recollect now, well, Hetty, for this is a
most awful and serious thing.
Yes he did; and I remember it by your speaking about
my tormenting you. Oh! I felt very sorry for him, and
Deerslayer took all so quietly and without noise!
Deerslayer
is not as handsome as Hurry Harry, Judith, but he
is more quiet.
He's worth a million Hurrys! yes, he's worth all the
young men who ever came upon the lake put together, said
Judith, with an energy and positiveness that caused her
sister
to wonder. He is
true
.There is no lie about
Deerslayer
.
You,
Hetty, may not know what a merit it is in a
man to have truth, but when you getnoI hope you will
never know it. Why should one like you be ever made to
learn the hard lesson to distrust and hate!
Judith bowed her face, dark as it was, and unseen as she
must have been, by any eye but that of Omniscience,
between
her hands, and groaned. This sudden paroxysm of
feeling, however, lasted but for a moment, and she continued
more calmly, still speaking frankly to her sister, whose
intelligence, and whose discretion in any thing that related
to herself, she did not in the least distrust. Her voice,
however, was low and husky, instead of having its former
clearness and animation.
It is a hard thing to fear truth, Hetty, she said; and
yet do I more dread Deerslayer's truth, than any enemy!
One cannot tamper with such truth  so much honesty
such obstinate uprightness! But we are not altogether
unequal
,
sisterDeerslayer and I? He is not altogether my
superior?
It was not usual for Judith so far to demean herself as to
appeal to Hetty's judgment. Nor did she often address her
by the title of sister, a distinction that is commonly given
by the junior to the senior, even where there is perfect
equality in all other respects. As trifling departures from
habitual deportment oftener strike the imagination than more
important changes, Hetty perceived the circumstances, and
wondered at them in her own simple way.
Her ambition was a little quickened, and the answer was
as much out of the usual course of things, as the question;
the poor girl attempting to refine beyond her strength.
Superior, Judith! she repeated with pride. In what
can
Deerslayer be
your
superior? Are you not mother's
childand does he know how to readand wasn't mother
before any woman in all this part of the world? I should
think, so far from supposing himself
your
superior, he would
hardly believe himself
mine
. You are handsome, and he is
ugly
No, not ugly, Hetty, interrupted Judith. Only plain.
But his honest face has a look in it, that is far better than
beauty. In my eyes Deerslayer is handsomer than Hurry
Harry.
Judith Hutter! you frighten me. Hurry is the
handsomest
mortal in the worldeven handsomer than you are
yourself; because a man's good looks, you know, are
always
better than a woman's good looks.
This little innocent touch of natural taste did not please
the elder sister at the moment, and she did not scruple to
betray
it.
Hetty, you now speak foolishly, and had better say no
more, on this subject, she answered. Hurry is not the
handsomest mortal in the world, by many; and there are
officers in the garrisons Judith stammered at the words
there are officers in the garrisons, near us, far comelier
than he. But, why do you think me the equal of
Deerslayer
speak
of
that,
for I do not like to hear you show so
much admiration of a man like Hurry Harry, who has
neither feelings, manners, nor conscience.
You
are too good
for
him,
and he ought to be told it, at once.
I!
Judith, how you forget! Why
I
am not beautiful,
and am feeble-minded.
You are
good,
Hetty, and that is more than can be said
of Henry March. He may have a
face,
and a
body,
but he
has no
heart
. But enough of this, for the present. Tell me
what raises me to an equality with Deerslayer.
To think of you asking me this, Judith! He can't read,
and you can. He don't know how to talk, but speaks worse
Vol. II.5
than Hurry even;for, sister, Harry doesn't always
pronounce
his words right! Did you ever notice
that?
Certainly, he is as coarse in speech, as in every thing
else. But, I fear you flatter me, Hetty, when you think I
can be justly called the equal of a man like Deerslayer. It
is true, I have been better taught; in one sense am more
comely; and perhaps might look higher; but then his truth
his truthmakes a fearful difference between us! Well,
I will talk no more of this; and we will bethink us of the
means of getting him out of the hands of the Hurons. We
have father's chest in the ark, Hetty, and might try the
temptation of more elephants; though I fear such baubles
will not buy the liberty of a man like Deerslayer. I am
afraid father and Hurry will not be as willing to ransom
Deerslayer, as Deerslayer was to ransom them!
Why not, Judith? Hurry and Deerslayer are friends,
and friends should always help one another.
Alas! poor Hetty, you little know mankind! Seeming
friends are often more to be dreaded than open enemies;
particularly
by females. But you'll have to land in the
morning
,
and try again what can be done for Deerslayer.
Tortured
he
shall
not be, while Judith Hutter lives, and can find
means to prevent it.
The conversation now grew desultory, and was drawn
out, until the elder sister had extracted from the younger
every fact that the feeble faculties of the latter permitted her
to retain, and to communicate. When Judith was satisfied
though, she could never be said to be satisfied, whose
feelings
seemed to be so interwoven with all that related to the
subject, as to have excited a nearly inappeasable curiosity
but, when Judith could think of no more questions to ask,
without resorting to repetition, the canoe was paddled
towards
the scow. The intense darkness of the night, and the
deep shadows which the hills and forest cast upon the water,
rendered it difficult to find the vessel, anchored, as it had
been, as close to the shore as a regard to safety rendered
prudent. Judith was expert in the management of a bark
canoe, the lightness of which demanded skill rather than
strength; and she forced her own little vessel swiftly over
the water, the moment she had ended her conference with
Hetty, and had come to the determination to return. Still
no ark was seen. Several times the sisters fancied they
saw it, looming up in the obscurity, like a low black rock,
but on each occasion it was found to be either an optical
illusion, or some swell of the foliage on the shore. After a
search that lasted half an hour, the girls were forced to the
unwelcome conviction that the ark had departed.
Most young women would have felt the awkwardness of
their situation, in a physical sense, under the circumstances
in which the sisters were left, more than any apprehensions
of a different nature. Not so with Judith, however; and
even Hetty felt more concern about the motives that might
have influenced her father and Hurry, than any fears for
her own safety.
It cannot be, Hetty, said Judith, when a thorough
search had satisfied them both that no ark was to be found,
it cannot be that the Indians have rafted, or swum off,
and surprised our friends as they slept?
I don't believe that Hist and Chingachgook would sleep
until they had told each other all they had to say after so
long a separationdo you, sister?
Perhaps not, child. There was much to keep them
awake, but one Indian may have been surprised even when
not asleep, especially as his thoughts may have been on
other things. Still we should have heard a noise; for in a
night like this, an oath of Harry Hurry's would have echoed
in the eastern hills like a clap of thunder.
Hurry
is
sinful and thoughtless about his words, Judith,
Hetty meekly and sorrowfully answered.
Nono; 'tis impossible the ark could be taken and I
not hear the noise. It is not an hour since I left it, and the
whole time I have been attentive to the smallest sound. And
yet, it is not easy to believe a father would willingly
abandon
his children!
Perhaps father has thought us in our cabin asleep,
Judith
,
and has moved away to go home. You know we often
move the ark in the night.
This is true, Hetty, and it must be as you suppose. There
is a little more southern air than there was, and they have
gone up the lake
Judith stopped, for, as the last word was on her tongue,
the scene was suddenly lighted, though only for a single
instant
,
by a flash. The crack of a rifle succeeded, and then
followed the roll of the echo along the eastern mountains.
Almost at the same moment a piercing female cry rose in
the air in a prolonged shriek. The awful stillness that
succeeded
was, if possible, more appalling than the fierce and
sudden interruption of the deep silence of midnight.
Resolute
as she was both by nature and habit, Judith scarce
breathed, while poor Hetty hid her face and trembled.
That was a woman's cry, Hetty, said the former
solemnly
,
and it was a cry of anguish! If the ark has
moved
from this spot, it can only have gone north with this air,
and the gun and shriek came from the point. Can any thing
have befallen Hist?
Let us go and see, Judith; she may want our assistance
for, besides herself, there are none but men in the ark.
It was not a moment for hesitation, and ere Judith had
ceased speaking her paddle was in the water. The distance
to the point, in a direct line, was not great, and the impulses
under which the girls worked were too exciting to allow
them to waste the precious moments in useless precautions.
They paddled incautiously for them, but the same
excitement
kept others from noting their movements. Presently
a glare of light caught the eye of Judith through an
opening
in the bushes, and steering by it she so directed the
canoe
as to keep it visible, while she got as near the land as
was either prudent or necessary.
The scene that was now presented to the observation of
the girls was within the woods, on the side of the declivity
so often mentioned, and in plain view from the boat. Here
all in the camp were collected, some six or eight carrying
torches of fat-pine, which cast a strong but funereal light on
all beneath the arches of the forest. With her back
supported
against a tree, and sustained on one side by the young
sentinel whose remissness had suffered Hetty to escape, sat
the female whose expected visit had produced his
delinquincy
.
By the glare of the torch that was held near her face,
it was evident that she was in the agonies of death, while
the blood that trickled from her bared bosom betrayed the
nature of the injury she had received. The pungent,
peculiar
smell of gunpowder, too, was still quite perceptible in
the heavy, damp night air. There could be no question
that she had been shot. Judith understood it all at a glance.
The streak of light had appeared on the water a short
distance
from the point, and either the rifle had been discharged
from a canoe hovering near the land, or it had been fired
from the ark in passing. An incautious exclamation, or
laugh, may have produced the assault, for it was barely
possible
that the aim had been assisted by any other agent than
sound. As to the effect, that was soon still more apparent,
the head of the victim dropping, and the body sinking in
death. Then all the torches but one were extinguished,a
measure of prudence; and the melancholy train that bore
the body to the camp was just to be distinguished by the
glimmering light that remained.
Judith sighed heavily and shuddered, as her paddle again
dipped, and the canoe moved cautiously around the point.
A sight had afflicted her senses, and now haunted her
imagination
,
that was still harder to be borne, than even the
untimely fate, and passing agony of the deceased girl. She
had seen, under the strong glare of all the torches, the erect
form of Deerslayer, standing, with commiseration, and as
she thought with shame, depicted on his countenance, near
the dying female. He betrayed neither fear nor
backwardness
,
himself;
but it was apparent by the glances cast at
him by the warriors, that fierce passions were struggling in
their
bosoms. All this seemed to be unheeded by the
captive
,
but it remained impressed on the memory of Judith
throughout the night.
No canoe was met hovering near the point. A stillness
and darkness, as complete as if the silence of the forest had
never been disturbed, or the sun had never shone on that
retired region, now reigned on the point, and on the gloomy
water, the slumbering woods, and even the murky sky.
No more could be done, therefore, than to seek a place of
safety; and this was only to be found in the centre of the
lake. Paddling, in silence, to that spot, the canoe was
suffered
to drift northerly, while the girls sought such repose
as their situation and feelings would permit.
5*
CHAPTER IV.
Stand to your arms, and guard the doorall's lost
Unless that fearful bell be silenced soon.
The officer hath miss'd his path, or purpose,
Or met some unforeseen and hideous obstacle.
Anselmo, with thy company proceed
Straight to the tower; the rest remain with me.
Marino Faliero
.
The
conjecture of Judith Hutter, concerning the manner
in which the Indian girl had met her death, was accurate in
the main. After sleeping several hours, her father and
March awoke. This occurred a few minutes after she had
left the ark to go in quest of her sister, and when of course
Chingachgook and his betrothed were on board. From the
Delaware the old man learned the position of the camp, and
the recent events, as well as the absence of his daughters.
The latter gave him no concern; for he relied greatly on
the sagacity of the eldest, and the known impunity with
which the younger passed among the savages. Long
familiarity
with danger, too, had blunted his sensibilities. Nor
did he seem much to regret the captivity of Deerslayer; for
while he knew how material his aid might be in a defence,
the difference in their views on the morality of the woods,
had not left much sympathy between them. He would have
rejoiced to know the position of the camp before it had been
alarmed by the escape of Hist, but it would be too
hazardous
now to venture to land; and he reluctantly relinquished
for the night, the ruthless designs that captivity and revenge
had excited him to entertain. In this mood Hutter took a
seat in the head of the scow, where he was quickly joined
by Hurry; leaving the Serpent and Hist in quiet possession
of the other extremity of the vessel.
Deerslayer has shown himself a boy, in going among
the savages at this hour, and letting himself fall into their
hands like a deer that tumbles into a pit, growled the old
man, perceiving as usual the mote in his neighbour's eyes,
while he overlooked the beam in his own. If he is left to
pay for his stupidity with his own flesh, he can blame no
one but himself.
That's the way of the world, Old Tom, returned
Hurry
.
Every man must meet his own debts, and answer
for his own sins. I 'm amazed, however, that a lad as
skilful
and watchful as Deerslayer, should have been caught in
such a trap! Didn't he know any better than to go
prowling
about a Huron camp, at midnight, with no place to
retreat
to, but a lake? or did he think himself a buck, that by
taking to the water could throw off the scent and swim
himself
out of difficulty? I had a better opinion of the boy's
judgment, I 'll own; but we must overlook a little ignorance
in a raw hand. I say, Master Hutter, do you happen to
know what has become of the galsI see no signs of
Judith
,
or Hetty, though I 've been through the ark, and
looked
into all its living creatur's?
Hutter briefly explained the manner in which his
daughters
had taken to the canoe, as it had been related by the
Delaware, as well as the return of Judith after landing her
sister, and her second departure.
This comes of a smooth tongue, Floating Tom,
exclaimed
Hurry, grating his teeth in pure resentmentthis
comes of a smooth tongue, and a silly gal's inclinations
and you had best look into the matter! You and I were
both prisonersHurry could recall that circumstance
now,
you and I were both prisoners, and yet Judith never
stirred an inch to do us any sarvice! She is bewitched
with this lank-looking Deerslayer; and he, and she, and you,
and all of us, had best look to it. I am not a man to put
up with such a wrong quietly, and do say, all the parties
had best look to it! Let's up kedge, old fellow, and move
nearer to this point, and see how matters are getting on.
Hutter had no objections to this movement, and the ark
was got under way, in the usual manner, care being taken
to make no noise. The wind was passing northward, and the
sail soon swept the scow so far up the lake, as to render
the dark outlines of the trees that clothed the point, dimly
visible. Floating Tom steered, and he sailed along as near
the land, as the depth of the water, and the overhanging
branches would allow. It was impossible to distinguish any
thing that stood within the shadows of the shore; but the
forms of the sail and of the hut, were discerned by the young
sentinel on the beach, who has already been mentioned. In
the moment of sudden surprise, a deep Indian exclamation
escaped him. In that spirit of recklessness and ferocity that
formed the essence of Hurry's character, this man dropped
his rifle and fired. The ball was sped by accident, or by
that overruling Providence which decides the fates of all, and
the girl fell. Then followed the scene with the torches,
which has just been described.
At the precise moment when Hurry committed this act of
unthinking cruelty, the canoe of Judith was within a hundred
feet of the spot from which the ark had so lately moved.
Her own course has been described, and it has now become
our office to follow that of her father and his companions.
The shriek announced the effects of the random shot of
March, and it also proclaimed that the victim was a woman.
Hurry himself was startled at these unlooked-for
consequences
;
and for a moment he was sorely disturbed by
conflicting
sensations. At first he laughed, in reckless and
rude-minded exultation; and then conscience, that monitor
planted in our breasts by God, and which receives its more
general growth from the training bestowed in the tillage of
childhood, shot a pang to his heart. For a minute, the mind
of this creature equally of civilization and barbarism, was a
sort of chaos as to feeling, not knowing what to think of its
own act; and then the obstinacy and pride of one of his
habits, interposed to assert their usual ascendency. He
struck the butt of his rifle on the bottom of the scow, with a
species of defiance, and began to whistle a low air, with an
affectation of indifference. All this time, the ark was in
motion, and it was already opening the bay above the point,
and was consequently quitting the land.
Hurry's companions did not view his conduct with the
same indulgence, as that with which he appeared disposed
to regard it himself. Hutter growled out his dissatisfaction,
for the act led to no advantage, while it threatened to render
the warfare more vindictive than ever; and none censure
motiveless departures from the right, more severely than the
mercenary and unprincipled. Still he commanded himself,
the captivity of Deerslayer rendering the arm of the offender
of double consequence to him at that moment.
Chingachgook
arose, and for a single instant the ancient animosity of
tribes was forgotten, in a feeling of colour; but he
recollected
himself in season to prevent any of the fierce
consequences
that for a passing moment, he certainly meditated.
Not so with Hist. Rushing through the hut, or cabin, the
girl stood at the side of Hurry, almost as soon as his rifle
touched the bottom of the scow; and with a fearlessness that
did credit to her heart, she poured out her reproaches with
the generous warmth of a woman.
What for you shoot? she said. What Huron gal do,
dat you kill him? What you t'ink Manitou
say?
What
you t'ink Manitou
feel?
What Iroquois
do?
No get honour
no get campno get prisonerno get battleno get
scalpno get not'ing at all. Blood come after blood!
How you feel, your wife killed? Who pity you, when
tear come for moder, or sister? You big as great pine
Huron gal little slender birchwhy you fall on her and
crush her! You t'ink Huron forget it? No; red-skin
never forget! Never forget friend; never forget enemy.
Red man Manitou in
dat
. Why you so wicked, great
pale-face
?
Hurry had never been so daunted, as by this close and
warm attack of the Indian girl. It is true that she had a
powerful ally in his conscience; and while she spoke
earnestly
,
it was in tones so feminine as to deprive him of any
pretext for unmanly anger. The softness of her voice added
to the weight of her remonstrance, by lending to the latter an
air of purity and truth. Like most vulgar-minded men, he
had only regarded the Indians through the medium of their
coarser and fiercer characteristics. It had never struck him
that the affections are human; that even high principles
modified by habits and prejudices, but not the less elevated
within their circlecan exist in the savage state; and that
the warrior who is most ruthless in the field, can submit to
the softest and gentlest influences, in the moments of domestic
quiet. In a word, it was the habit of his mind to regard
all Indians as beings only a slight degree removed from the
wild beasts that roamed the woods, and to feel disposed to
treat them accordingly, whenever interest or caprice
supplied
a motive, or an impulse. Still, though daunted by
these reproaches, the handsome barbarian could hardly be
said to be penitent. He was too much rebuked by
conscience
,
to suffer an outbreak of temper to escape him; and
perhaps he felt that he had already committed an act that
might justly bring his manhood in question. Instead of
resenting
,
or answering, the simple, but natural appeal of
Hist, he walked away, like one who disdained entering into
a controversy with a woman.
In the mean while, the ark swept onward, and by the
time the scene with the torches was enacting beneath the
trees, it had reached the open lake; Floating Tom causing
it to sheer further from the land, with a sort of instinctive
dread of retaliation. An hour now passed in gloomy silence,
no one appearing disposed to break it. Hist had retired to
her pallet, and Chingachgook lay sleeping in the forward
part of the scow. Hutter and Hurry alone remained awake,
the former at the steering oar, while the latter brooded over
his own conduct with the stubbornness of one little given to
a confession of his errors, and the secret goadings of the
worm that never dies. This was at the moment when
Judith
and Hetty reached the centre of the lake, and had lain
down to endeavour to sleep, in their drifting canoe.
The night was calm, though so much obscured by clouds.
The season was not one of storms, and those which did
occur in the month of June, on that embedded water, though
frequently violent, were always of short continuance.
Nevertheless
,
there was the usual current of heavy, damp night
air, which, passing over the summits of the trees, scarcely
appeared to descend so low as the surface of the glassy lake,
but kept moving a short distance above it, saturated with the
humidity that constantly arose from the woods, and
apparently
never proceeding far in any one direction. The
currents
were influenced by the formation of the hills, as a
matter of course,a circumstance that rendered even fresh
breezes baffling, and which reduced the feebler efforts of the
night air to be a sort of capricious and fickle sighings of
the woods. Several times the head of the ark pointed east,
and once it was actually turned towards the south, again;
but, on the whole, it worked its way north; Hutter making
always a fair wind, if wind it could be called, his principal
motive appearing to be a wish to keep in motion, in order
to defeat any treacherous design of his enemies. He now
felt some little concern about his daughters, and perhaps as
much about the canoe; but, on the whole, this uncertainty
did not much disturb him, as he had the reliance already
mentioned on the intelligence of Judith.
It was the season of the shortest nights, and it was not
long before the deep obscurity which precedes the day began
to yield to the returning light. If any earthly scene could
be presented to the senses of man that might soothe his
passions
and temper his ferocity, it was that which grew upon
the eyes of Hutter and Hurry, as the hours advanced,
changing
night to morning. There were the usual soft tints of
the sky, in which neither the gloom of darkness nor the
brilliancy of the sun prevails, and under which objects
appear
more unearthly, and we might add holy, than at any
other portion of the twenty-four hours. The beautiful and
soothing calm of eventide has been extolled by a thousand
poets, and yet it does not bring with it the far-reaching and
sublime thoughts of the half-hour that precedes the rising
of a summer's sun. In the one case the panorama is
gradually
hid from the sight, while in the other, its objects
start out from the unfolding picture, first dim and misty;
then marked in, in solemn back-ground; next seen in the
witchery of an
increasing,
a thing as different as possible
from the
decreasing
twilight; and finally mellow, distinct
and luminous, as the rays of the great centre of light
diffuse themselves in the atmosphere. The hymns of birds,
too, have no novel counterpart in the retreat to the roost, or
the flight to the nest; and these invariably accompany the
advent of the day, until the appearance of the sun itself
Bathes in deep joy, the land and sea.
All this, however, Hutter and Hurry witnessed without
experiencing any of that calm delight, which the spectacle
is wont to bring, when the thoughts are just, and the
aspirations
pure. They not only witnessed it, but they witnessed
it under circumstances that had a tendency to increase its
power, and to heighten its charms. Only one solitary object
became visible in the returning light, that had received
its form or uses from human taste, or human desires,
which as often deform as beautify a landscape. This was
the castle; all the rest being native, and fresh from the hand
of God. That singular residence, too, was in keeping with
the natural objects of the view; starting out from the gloom,
quaint, picturesque, and ornamental. Nevertheless the whole
was lost on the observers, who knew no feeling of poetry,
had lost their sense of natural devotion in lives of obdurate
and narrow selfishness, and had little other sympathy with
nature, than that which originated with her lowest wants.
As soon as the light was sufficiently strong to allow of a
distinct view of the lake, and more particularly of its shores,
Hutter turned the head of the ark directly towards the
castle
,
with the avowed intention of taking possession for the
day at least, as the place most favourable for meeting his
daughters, and for carrying on his operations against the
Indians. By this time, Chingachgook was up, and Hist was
heard stirring among the furniture of the kitchen. The
place for which they steered was distant only a mile, and
the air was sufficiently favourable to permit it to be neared
by means of the sail. At this moment, too, to render the
appearances generally auspicious, the canoe of Judith was
seen floating northward in the broadest part of the lake;
having actually passed the scow in the darkness, in obedience
to no other power than that of the elements. Hutter got his
glass, and took a long and anxious survey, to ascertain if
his daughters were in the light craft, or not; and a slight
exclamation
like that of joy escaped him, as he caught a
glimpse of what he rightly conceived to be a part of Judith's
dress above the top of the canoe. At the next instant, the
girl arose, and was seen gazing about her, like one assuring
herself of her situation. A minute later, Hetty was seen on
her knees, in the other end of the canoe, repeating the
prayers that had been taught her, in childhood, by a
misguided
but repentant mother. As Hutter laid down the
glass, still drawn to its focus, the Serpent raised it to his
eye, and turned it towards the canoe. It was the first time
he had ever used such an instrument, and Hist understood
by his hugh! the expression of his face, and his entire
mien, that something wonderful had excited his admiration.
It is well known that the American Indians, more
particularly
those of superior character and stations, singularly
maintain their self-possession and stoicism, in the midst of
the flood of marvels that present themselves in their
occasional
visits to the abodes of civilization; and Chingachgook
had imbibed enough of this impassibility to suppress any
very undignified manifestation of surprise. With Hist,
however, no such law was binding, and when her lover
managed to bring the glass in a line with a canoe, and her
eye was applied to the smaller end, the girl started back in
alarm; then she clapped her hands with delight, and a
laugh, the usual attendant of untutored admiration, followed.
A few minutes sufficed to enable this quick-witted girl to
manage the instrument for herself, and she directed it at
every prominent object that struck her fancy. Finding a
rest in one of the windows, she and the Delaware first
surveyed
the lake; then the shores, the hills, and, finally, the
castle attracted their attention. After a long steady gaze at
the latter, Hist took away her eye, and spoke to her lover
in a low earnest manner. Chingachgook immediately
placed his eye to the glass, and his look even exceeded that
of his betrothed in length and intensity. Again they spoke
together, confidentially, appearing to compare opinions, after
which the glass was laid aside, and the young warrior
quitted
the cabin to join Hutter and Hurry.
The ark was slowly but steadily advancing, and the
castle
was materially within half a mile, when Chingachgook
joined the two white men in the stern of the scow. His
manner was calm, but it was evident to the others, who
were familiar with the habits of the Indians, that he had
something to communicate. Hurry was generally prompt
to speak, and, according to custom, he took the lead on this
occasion.
Out with it, red-skin, he cried, in his usual rough
manner
.
Have you discovered a chip-munk in a tree, or is
there a salmon-trout swimming under the bottom of the
scow? You find what a pale-face can do in the way of
eyes, now, Sarpent, and mustn't wonder that they can see
the lands of the Indians from afar off.
No good to go to castle, put in Chingachgook, with
emphasis, the moment the other gave him an opportunity of
speaking. Huron there.
The devil he is! If this should turn out to be true,
Floating Tom, a pretty trap were we about to pull down on
our heads! Huron there!  well, this may be so; but no
Vol. II.6
signs can I see of any thing, near or about the old hut, but
logs, water, and bark'bating two or three windows, and
one door.
Hutter called for the glass, and took a careful survey of
the spot, before he ventured an opinion at all; then he
somewhat
cavalierly expressed his dissent from that given by the
Indian.
You 've got this glass wrong end foremost, Delaware,
continued Hurry; neither the old man, nor I, can see any
trail in the lake.
No trail  water make no trail, said Hist, eagerly.
Stop boatno go too nearHuron there!
Ay, that 's it! Stick to the same tale, and more people
will believe you. I hope, Sarpent, you and your gal will
agree in telling the same story after marriage, as well as
you do now. Huron, there!whereabouts is he to be seen
in the padlock, or the chains, or the logs? There isn't a
gaol in the Colony that has a more lock-up look about it, than
old Tom's
chient;
and, I know something about gaols from
exper'ence.
No see moccasin, said Hist, impatiently; why no
look
and see him.
Give me the glass, Harry, interrupted Hutter, and
lower the sail. It is seldom that an Indian woman meddles,
and when she does, there is generally a cause for it. There
is,
truly, a moccasin floating against one of the piles; and
it may, or may not be, a sign that the castle hasn't escaped
visiters, in our absence. Moccasins are no rarities,
however
,
for I wear 'em myself, and Deerslayer wears 'em, and
you wear 'em, March; and, for that matter, so does Hetty,
quite as often as she wears shoes; though I never yet saw
Judith trust her pretty foot in a moccasin.
Hurry had lowered the sail, and by this time the ark was
within two hundred yards of the castle, setting in, nearer and
nearer, each moment, but at a rate too slow to excite any
uneasiness. Each now took the glass in turn, and the
castle
,
and every thing near it, was subjected to a scrutiny still
more rigid than ever. There the moccasin lay, beyond a
question, floating so lightly, and preserving its form so well,
that it was scarcely wet. It had caught by a piece of the
rough bark of one of the piles, on the exterior of the
water-palisade
,
that formed the dock already mentioned; which
circumstance
alone prevented it from drifting away before the
air. There were many modes, however, of accounting for
the presence of the moccasin, without supposing it to have
been dropped by an enemy. It might have fallen from the
platform, even while Hutter was in possession of the place,
and drifted to the spot where it was now seen, remaining
unnoticed
until detected by the acute vision of Hist. It might
have drifted from a distance, up or down the lake, and
accidentally
become attached to the pile, or palisade. It might
have been thrown from a window, and alighted in that
particular
place; or it might certainly have fallen from a scout,
or an assailant, during the past night, who was obliged to
abandon it to the lake, in the deep obscurity which then
prevailed
.
All these conjectures passed from Hutter to Hurry; the
former appearing disposed to regard the omen as a little
sinister
,
while the latter treated it with his usual reckless
disdain
.
As for the Indian, he was of opinion, that the
moccasin
should be viewed as one would regard a trail in the
woods, which might, or might not, equally, prove to be
threatening. Hist, however, had something available to
propose
.
She declared her readiness to take a canoe, to proceed
to the palisade, and bring away the moccasin, when its
ornaments
would show whether it came from the Canadas or not.
Both the white men were disposed to accept this offer; but
the Delaware interfered to prevent the risk. If such a
service was to be undertaken, it best became a warrior to
expose himself in its execution; and he gave his refusal to
let his betrothed proceed, much in the quiet but brief
manner
in which an Indian husband issues his commands.
Well then, Delaware, go yourself, if you 're so tender
of your squaw, put in the unceremonious Hurry. That
moccasin must be had, or Floating Tom will keep off, here,
at arm's-length, till the hearth cools in his cabin. It 's but
a little deer-skin, after all, and cut this-a-way or that-a-way,
it 's not a skear-crow to frighten true hunters from their
game. What say you, Sarpent, shall you or I canoe it?
Let red man go. Better eyes than pale-faceknow
Huron trick better, too.
That I 'll gainsay, to the hour of my death! A white
man's eyes, and a white man's nose, and for that matter his
sight and ears, are all better than an Indian's, when fairly
tried. Time and ag'in have I put that to the proof, and what
is proved is sartain. Still I suppose the poorest vagabond
going
,
whether Delaware or Huron, can find his way to yonder
hut and back ag'in; and so, Sarpent, use your paddle and
welcome.
Chingachgook was already in the canoe, and he dipped
the implement the other named, into the water, just as
Hurry's limber tongue ceased. Wah-ta!-Wah saw the
departure
of her warrior on this occasion, with the submissive
silence of an Indian girl, but with most of the misgivings and
apprehensions of her sex. Throughout the whole of the
past night, and down to the moment when they used the
glass together in the hut, Chingachgook had manifested as
much manly tenderness towards his betrothed, as one of the
most refined sentiments could have shown under similar
circumstances
;
but now every sign of weakness was lost in an
appearance of stern resolution. Although Hist timidly
endeavoured
to catch his eye, as the canoe left the side of the
ark, the pride of a warrior would not permit him to meet her
fond and anxious looks. The canoe departed, and not a
wandering glance rewarded her solicitude.
Nor were the Delaware's care and gravity misplaced,
under the impressions with which he proceeded on this
enterprise
.
If the enemy had really gained possession of the
building, he was obliged to put himself under the very
muzzles
of their rifles, as it were, and this too without the
protection
of any of that cover, which forms so essential an
ally in Indian warfare. It is scarcely possible to conceive
of a service more dangerous; and had the Serpent been
fortified by the experience of ten more years, or had his
friend, the Deerslayer, been present, it would never have
been attempted; the advantages in no degree compensating
for the risk. But the pride of an Indian chief was acted on
by the rivalry of colour; and it is not unlikely that the
presence
of the very creature from whom his ideas of manhood
prevented his receiving a single glance, overflowing as he
was with the love she so well merited, had no small
influence
on his determination.
Chingachgook paddled steadily towards the palisades,
keeping his eye on the different loops of the building. Each
instant he expected to see the muzzle of a rifle protruded,
or to hear its sharp crack; but he succeeded in reaching the
piles in safety. Here he was, in a measure, protected,
having
the heads of the palisades between him and the hut;
and the chances of any attempt on his life, while thus
covered
,
were greatly diminished. The canoe had reached
the piles with its head inclining northward, and at a short
distance from the moccasin. Instead of turning to pick
up the latter, the Delaware slowly made the circuit of the
whole building, deliberately examining every object that
should betray the presence of enemies, or the commission
of violence. Not a single sign could be discovered,
however
,
to confirm the suspicions that had been awakened.
The stillness of desertion pervaded the building; not a
fastening
was displaced; not a window had been broken. The
door looked as secure as at the hour when it was closed by
Hutter, and even the gate of the dock had all the customary
fastenings. In short, the most wary and jealous eye could
detect no other evidence of the visit of enemies, than that
which was connected with the appearance of the floating
moccasin.
The Delaware was now greatly at a loss how to proceed.
At one moment, as he came round in front of the castle, he
was on the point of stepping up on the platform, and of
applying
his eye to one of the loops, with a view of taking a
direct personal inspection of the state of things within; but
he hesitated. Though of little experience in such matters,
himself, he had heard so much of Indian artifices through
traditions, had listened with such breathless interest to the
narration of the escapes of the elder warriors, and, in short,
was so well schooled in the theory of his calling, that it
was almost as impossible for him to make any gross
blunder
on such an occasion, as it was for a well-grounded
scholar, who had commenced correctly, to fail in solving
his problem in mathematics. Relinquishing the momentary
intention to land, the chief slowly pursued his course round
the palisades. As he approached the moccasinhaving
now nearly completed the circuit of the buildinghe threw
the ominous article into the canoe, by a dexterous and
almost imperceptible movement of his paddle. He was now
6*
ready to depart; but retreat was even more dangerous than
the approach, as the eye could no longer be riveted on the
loops. If there was really any one in the castle, the
motive
of the Delaware in reconnoitring must be understood;
and it was the wisest way, however perilous it might be, to
retire with an air of confidence, as if all distrust were
terminated
by the examination. Such, accordingly, was the
course adopted by the Indian, who paddled deliberately
away, taking the direction of the ark, suffering no nervous
impulse to quicken the motions of his arms, or to induce
him to turn even a furtive glance behind him.
No tender wife, reared in the refinements of the highest
civilization, ever met a husband on his return from the field,
with more of sensibility in her countenance, than Hist
discovered
,
as she saw the Great Serpent of the Delawares
step, unharmed, into the ark. Still she repressed her
emotions
,
though the joy that sparkled in her dark eyes, and
the smile that lighted her pretty mouth, spoke a language
that her betrothed could understand.
Well, Sarpent, cried Hurry, always the first to speak,
what news from the Muskrats? Did they show their
teeth, as you surrounded their dwelling?
I no like himsententiously returned the Delaware.
Too still. So still, can see silence!
That's downright Indianas if any thing could make
less noise than nothing! If you 've no better reason than
this to give, Old Tom had better hoist his sail, and go and
get his breakfast under his own roof. What has become of
the moccasin?
Here, returned Chingachgook, holding up his prize for
the general inspection.
The moccasin was examined, and Hist confidently
pronounced
it to be Huron, by the manner in which the
porcupine's
quills were arranged on its front. Hutter, and the
Delaware, too, were decidedly of the same opinion.
Admitting
all this, however, it did not necessarily follow that
its owners were in the castle. The moccasin might have
drifted from a distance, or it might have fallen from the
foot of some scout, who had quitted the place when his
errand
was accomplished. In short, it explained nothing,
while it awakened so much distrust.
Under the circumstances, Hutter and Hurry were not
men to be long deterred from proceeding, by proofs as slight
as that of the moccasin. They hoisted the sail again, and
the ark was soon in motion, heading towards the castle.
The wind, or air, continued light, and the movement was
sufficiently slow to allow of a deliberate survey of the
building
as the scow approached. The same death-like silence
reigned, and it was difficult to fancy that any thing possessing
animal life could be in or around the place. Unlike the
Serpent, whose imagination had acted through his traditions
until he was ready to perceive an artificial in a natural
stillness
,
the others saw nothing to apprehend in a tranquillity
that, in truth, denoted merely the repose of inanimate
objects
.
The accessories of the scene, too, were soothing and
calm, rather than exciting. The day had not yet advanced
so far as to bring the sun above the horizon, but the
heavens
,
the atmosphere, and the woods and lake were all seen
under that softened light which immediately precedes his
appearance, and which perhaps is the most witching period
of the four-and-twenty hours. It is the moment when every
thing is distinct, even the atmosphere seeming to possess a
liquid lucidity, the hues appearing grey and softened, with
the outlines of objects diffused, and the perspective just as
moral truths, that are presented in their simplicity without
the meretricious aids of ornament or glitter. In a word, it
is the moment when the senses seem to recover their powers
in the simplest and most accurate forms, like the mind
emerging from the obscurity of doubts into the tranquillity
and peace of demonstration. Most of the influence that
such a scene is apt to produce on those who are properly
constituted in a moral sense, was lost on Hutter and Hurry;
but both the Delawares, though too much accustomed to
witness the loveliness of morning-tide, to stop to analyze
their feelings, were equally sensible of the beauties of the
hour, though it it was probably in a way unknown to
themselves
.
It disposed the young warrior to peace; and never
had he felt less longings for the glory of the combat than
when he joined Hist in the cabin, the instant the scow
rubbed
against the side of the platform. From the indulgence
of such gentle emotions, however, he was aroused by a rude
summons from Hurry, who called on him to come forth and
help to take in the sail and to secure the ark.
Chingachgook obeyed; and by the time he had reached
the head of the scow, Hurry was on the platform, stamping
his feet, like one glad to touch what, by comparison, might
be called
terra firma,
and proclaiming his indifference to
the whole Huron tribe, in his customary noisy, dogmatical
manner. Hutter had hauled a canoe up to the head of the
scow, and was already about to undo the fastenings of the
gate, in order to enter within the dock. March had no other
motive in landing than a senseless bravado, and having
shaken
the door in a manner to put its solidity to the proof, he
joined Hutter in the canoe, and began to aid him in opening
the gate. The reader will remember that this mode of
entrance
was rendered necessary by the manner in which the
owner of this singular residence habitually secured it
whenever
it was left empty; more particularly at moments when
danger was apprehended. Hutter had placed a line in the
Delaware's hand, on entering the canoe, intimating that the
other was to fasten the ark to the platform and to lower the
sail. Instead of following these directions, however,
Chingachgook
left the sail standing, and throwing the bight of
the rope over the head of a pile, he permitted the ark to
drift round until it lay against the defences in a position
where it could be entered only by means of a boat, or by
passing along the summits of the palisades; the latter
being
an exploit that required some command of the feet, and
which was not to be attempted in the face of a resolute enemy.
In consequence of this change in the position of the scow,
which was effected before Hutter had succeeded in opening
the gate of his dock, the ark and the castle lay, as sailors
would express it, yard-arm and yard-arm, kept asunder some
ten or twelve feet by means of the piles. As the scow
pressed
close against the latter, their tops formed a species of
breast-work that rose to the height of a man's head,
covering
in a certain degree the parts of the scow that were
not protected by the cabin. The Delaware surveyed this
arrangement with great satisfaction, and, as the canoe of
Hutter passed through the gate into the dock, he thought
that he might defend his position against any garrison in
the castle, for a sufficient time, could he but have had the
helping arm of his friend Deerslayer. As it was, he felt
comparatively secure, and no longer suffered the keen
apprehensions
he had lately experienced in behalf of Hist.
A single shove sent the canoe from the gate, to the trap
beneath the castle. Here Hutter found all fast, neither
padlock
,
nor chain, nor bar, having been molested. The key
was produced, the locks removed, the chain loosened, and
the trap pushed upward. Hurry now thrust his head in at
the opening; the arms followed, and the colossal legs rose
without any apparent effort. At the next instant, his heavy
foot was heard stamping in the passage above; that which
separated the chambers of the father and daughters, and into
which the trap opened. He then gave a shout of triumph.
Come on, old Tom, the reckless woodsman called out
from within the buildinghere's your tenement, safe and
sound; ay, and as empty as a nut that has passed half an
hour in the paws of a squirrel! The Delaware brags of
being able to
see
silence; let him come here, and he may
feel
it, in the bargain.
Any silence where you are, Hurry Harry, returned
Hutter, thrusting his head in at the hole, as he uttered the
last word, which instantly caused his voice to sound
smothered
to those withoutany silence where you are, ought
to be both seen and felt, for it's unlike any other silence.
Come, comeold fellow; hoist yourself up, and we'll
open doors and windows and let in the fresh air to brighten
up matters. Few words in troublesome times, make men
the best fri'nds. Your darter Judith, is what I call a
misbehaving
young woman, and the hold of the whole family
on me is so much weakened by her late conduct, that it
wouldn't take a speech as long as the ten commandments
to send me off to the river, leaving you and your traps, your
ark and your children, your man-servants and your
maid-servants
,
your oxen and your asses, to fight this battle with
the Iroquois, by yourselves. Open that window, Floating
Tom, and I'll blunder through and do the same job to the
front door.
A moment of silence succeeded, and a noise like that
produced
by the fall of a heavy body followed. A deep
execration
from Hurry succeeded, and then the whole interior
of the building seemed alive. The noises that now so
suddenly
,
and we may add so unexpectedly even to the
Delaware
,
broke the stillness within, could not be mistaken.
They resembled those that would be produced by a struggle
between tigers in a cage. Once or twice the Indian yell
was given, but it seemed smothered, and as if it proceeded
from exhausted or compressed throats; and, in a single
instance
,
a deep and another shockingly revolting execration
came from the throat of Hurry. It appeared as if bodies
were constantly thrown upon the floor with violence, as
often rising to renew the struggle. Chingachgook felt greatly
at a loss what to do. He had all the arms in the ark,
Hutter
and Hurry having proceeded without their rifles; but
there was no means of using them, or of passing them to the
hands of their owners. The combatants were literally caged,
rendering it almost as impossible, under the circumstances,
to get out, as to get into the building. Then there was Hist
to embarrass his movements, and to cripple his efforts.
With a view to relieve himself from this disadvantage, he
told the girl to take the remaining canoe, and to join
Hutter's
daughters, who were incautiously but deliberately
approaching
,
in order to save herself, and to warn the others
of their danger. But the girl positively and firmly refused
to comply. At that moment, no human power, short of an
exercise of superior physical force, could have induced her
to quit the ark. The exigency of the moment did not
admit
of delay, and the Delaware seeing no possibility of
serving his friends, cut the line and by a strong shove forced
the scow some twenty feet clear of the piles. Here he took
the sweeps and succeeded in getting a short distance to
windward, if any direction could be thus termed in so light
an air, but neither the time, nor his skill at the oars, allowed
this distance to be great. When he ceased rowing, the ark
might have been a hundred yards from the platform, and
half that distance to the southward of it, the sail being
lowered
.
Judith and Hetty had now discovered that something
was wrong, and were stationary a thousand feet farther
north.
All this while the furious struggle continued within the
house. In scenes like these, events thicken in less time
than they can be related. From the moment when the first
fall was heard within the building, to that when the
Delaware
ceased his awkward attempts to row, it might have
been three or four minutes, but it had evidently served to
weaken the combatants. The oaths and execrations of Hurry
were no longer heard, and even the struggles had lost some
of their force and fury; nevertheless, they still continued
with unabated perseverance. At this instant the door flew
open, and the fight was transferred to the platform, the light,
and the open air.
A Huron had undone the fastenings of the door, and
three or four of his tribe rushed after him upon the narrow
space, as if glad to escape from some terrible scene within.
The body of another followed, pitched headlong through the
door, with terrific violence. Then March appeared, raging
like a lion at bay, and for an instant freed from his
numerous
enemies. Hutter was already a captive and bound.
There was now a pause in the struggle, which resembled a
lull in a tempest. The necessity of breathing was common
to all, and the combatants stood watching each other, like
mastiffs that have been driven from their holds, and are
waiting for a favourable opportunity of renewing them. We
shall profit by this pause, to relate the manner in which the
Indians had obtained possession of the castle; and this the
more willingly, because it may be necessary to explain to
the reader why a conflict which had been so close and fierce,
should have also been so comparatively bloodless.
Rivenoak and his companion, particularly the latter, who
had appeared to be a subordinate and occupied solely with
his raft, had made the closest observations in their visits to
the castle; even the boy had brought away minute and
valuable
information. By these means the Hurons had obtained a
general idea of the manner in which the place was
constructed
and secured, as well as details that enabled them
to act intelligently in the dark. Notwithstanding the care
that Hutter had taken to drop the ark on the east side of the
building, when he was in the act of transferring the
furniture
from the former to the latter, he had been watched in a
way to render the precaution useless. Scouts were on the
look-out on the eastern, as well as on the western, shore of the
lake, and the whole proceeding had been noted. As soon
as it was dark, rafts like that already described, approached
from both shores to reconnoitre; and the ark had passed
within fifty feet of one of them, without its being discovered;
the men it held, lying at their length on the logs, so as to
blend themselves and their slow-moving machine with the
water. When these two sets of adventurers drew near the
castle, they encountered each other, and after
communicating
their respective observations, they unhesitatingly
approached
the building. As had been expected, it was found
empty. The rafts were immediately sent for a reinforcement
to the shore, and two of the savages remained to profit by
their situation. These men succeeded in getting on the
roof, and, by removing some of the bark, in entering what
might be termed the garret. Here they were found by their
companions. Hatchets now opened a hole through the
square logs of the upper floor, through which no less than
eight of the most athletic of the Indians dropped into the
room beneath. Here they were left, well supplied with
arms and provisions, either to stand a siege, or to make a
sortie, as the case might require. The night was passed in
sleep, as is usual with Indians in a state of activity. The
returning day brought them a view of the approach of the
ark, through the loops, the only manner in which light and
air were now admitted, the windows being closed most
effectually
with plank, rudely fashioned to fit. As soon as it was
ascertained that the two white men were about to enter by
the trap, the chief who directed the proceedings of the
Hurons
took his measures accordingly. He removed all the
arms from his own people, even to the knives, in distrust of
savage ferocity, when awakened by personal injuries, and
he hid them where they could not be found without a search.
Ropes of bark were then prepared, and taking their stations
in the three different rooms, they all waited for the signal to
fall upon their intended captives. As soon as the party had
entered the building, men without replaced the bark of the
roof, removed every sign of their visit, with care, and then
departed for the shore. It was one of these who had
dropped
his moccasin, which he had not been able to find again,
in the dark. Had the death of the girl been known, it is
probable nothing could have saved the lives of Hurry and
Hutter; but that event occurred after the ambush was laid,
and at a distance of several miles from the encampment
near the castle. Such were the means that had been
employed
to produce the state of things we shall continue to
to describe.
CHAPTER V.
Now all is done that man can do,
And all is done in vain!
My love! my native land, adieu,
For I must cross the main;
My dear,
For I must cross the main.
Scottish Ballad
.
In
the last chapter we left the combatants breathing in
their narrow lists. Accustomed to the rude sports of
wrestling
and jumping, then so common in America, more
especially
on the frontiers, Hurry possessed an advantage, in
addition to his prodigious strength, that had rendered the
struggle less unequal than it might otherwise appear to be.
This alone had enabled him to hold out so long, against so
many enemies; for the Indian is by no means remarkable
for his skill or force in athletic exercises. As yet, no one
had been seriously hurt, though several of the savages had
received severe falls; and he, in particular, who had been
thrown bodily upon the platform, might be said to be
temporarily
hors de combat
. Some of the rest were limping; and
March himself had not entirely escaped from bruises,
though want of breath was the principal loss that both sides
wished to repair.
Under circumstances like those in which the parties were
placed, a truce, let it come from what cause it might, could
not well be of long continuance. The arena was too
confined
,
and the distrust of treachery too great, to admit
of this. Contrary to what might be expected in his
situation
,
Hurry was the first to recommence hostilities. Whether
this proceeded from policy, or an idea that he might gain
some advantage by making a sudden and unexpected
assault
,
or was the fruit of irritation and his undying hatred
of an Indian, it is impossible to say. His onset was furious,
however, and at first it carried all before it. He seized the
nearest Huron by the waist, raised him entirely from the
platform, and hurled him into the water, as if he had been
Vol. II.7
a child. In half a minute, two more were at his side, one
of whom received a grave injury by falling on the friend
who had just preceded him. But four enemies remained,
and, in a hand-to-hand conflict, in which no arms were used
but those which nature had furnished, Hurry believed himself
fully able to cope with that number of red-skins.
Hurrah! Old Tom, he shouted; the rascals are
taking to the lake, and I'll soon have 'em all swimming!
As these words were uttered, a violent kick in the face sent
back the injured Indian, who had caught at the edge of the
platform and was endeavouring to raise himself to its level,
helplessly and hopelessly into the water. When the affiray
was over, his dark body was seen, through the limpid
element
of the Glimmerglass, lying, with outstretched arms,
extended on the bottom of the shoal on which the castle
stood, clinging to the sands and weeds as if life were to be
retained by this frenzied grasp of death. A blow, sent into
the pit of another's stomach, doubled him up like a worm
that had been trodden on; and but two able-bodied foes
remained
to be dealt with. One of these, however, was not
only the largest and strongest of the Hurons, but he was
also the most experienced of the warriors present, and that
one whose sinews were the best strung in fights, and by
marches on the war-path. This man had fully appreciated
the gigantic strength of his opponent, and had carefully
husbanded
his own. He was also equipped in the best manner
for such a conflict, standing in nothing but his breech-cloth,
the model of a naked and beautiful statue of agility and
strength. To grasp him required additional dexterity and
unusual strength. Still Hurry did not hesitate; but the
kick, that had actually destroyed one fellow-creature, was
no sooner given than he closed in with this formidable
antagonist
,
endeavouring to force him into the water also.
The struggle that succeeded was truly frightful. So fierce
did it immediately become, and so quick and changeful were
the evolutions of the athlet, that the remaining savage had
no chance for interfering, had he possessed the desire; but
wonder and apprehension held him spell-bound. He was
an inexperienced youth, and his blood curdled as he
witnessed
the fell strife of human passions, exhibited, too, in an
unaccustomed form.
Hurry first attempted to throw his antagonist. With this
view he seized him by the throat and an arm, and tripped
with the quickness and force of an American borderer. The
effect was frustrated by the agile movements of the Huron,
who had clothes to grasp by, and whose feet avoided the
attempt with a nimbleness equal to that with which it was
made. Then followed a sort of
mle,
if such a term can
be applied to a struggle between two, in which no efforts
were distinctly visible, the limbs and bodies of the
combatants
assuming so many attitudes and contortions, as to
defeat
observation. This confused but fierce rally lasted less
than a minute, however, when Hurry, furious at having his
strength baffled by the agility and nakedness of his foe,
made a desperate effort, which sent the Huron from him,
hurling his body violently against the logs of the hut. The
concussion was so great as momentarily to confuse the
latter's
faculties. The pain, too, extorted a deep groan; an
unusual concession to agony, to escape a red man in the
heat of battle. Still he rushed forward again, to meet his
enemy, conscious that his safety rested on his
resolution
.
Hurry now seized the other by the waist, raised him
bodily from the platform, and fell with his own great weight
on the body beneath. This additional shock so far stunned
the sufferer, that his gigantic white opponent now had him
completely at his mercy. Passing his hands round the
throat of his victim, he compressed them with the strength
of a vice, fairly doubling the head of the Huron over the
edge of the platform, until the chin was uppermost, with the
infernal strength he expended. An instant sufficed to show
the consequences. The eyes of the sufferer seemed to start
forward, his tongue protruded, and his nostrils dilated nearly
to splitting. At this instant a rope of bark, having an eye,
was passed dexterously within the two arms of Hurry; the
end threaded the eye, forming a noose, and his elbows were
drawn together behind his back, with a power that all his
gigantic strength could not resist. Reluctantly, even under
such circumstances, did the exasperated borderer see his
hands drawn from their deadly grasp, for all the evil
passions
were then in the ascendant. Almost at the same
instant
,
a similar fastening secured his ancles, and his body
was rolled to the centre of the platform as helplessly, and
as cavalierly, as if it were a log of wood. His rescued
antagonist
,
however, did not rise, for while he began again to
breathe, his head still hung helplessly over the edge of the
logs, and it was thought at first that his neck was dislocated.
He recovered gradually only, and it was hours before he
could walk. Some fancied that neither his body, nor his
mind, ever totally recovered from this near approach to
death.
Hurry owed his defeat and capture to the intensity with
which he had concentrated all his powers, on his fallen foe.
While thus occupied, the two Indians he had hurled into the
water mounted to the heads of the piles, along which they
passed, and joined their companion on the platform. The
latter had so far rallied his faculties as to have gotten the
ropes, which were in readiness for use as the others
appeared
,
and they were applied in the manner related, as
Hurry lay pressing his enemy down with his whole weight,
intent only on the horrible office of strangling him. Thus
were the tables turned, in a single moment; he who had
been so near achieving a victory that would have been
renowned
for ages, by means of tradition, throughout all that
region, lying helpless, bound, and a captive. So fearful had
been the efforts of the pale-face, and so prodigious the
strength he exhibited, that even as he lay, tethered like a
sheep before them, they regarded him with respect, and not
without dread. The helpless body of their stoutest warrior
was still stretched on the platform; and, as they cast their
eyes towards the lake, in quest of the comrade that had been
hurled into it so unceremoniously, and of whom they had
lost sight in the confusion of the fray, they perceived his
lifeless form clinging to the grass on the bottom, as already
described. These several circumstances contributed to
render
the victory of the Hurons almost as astounding to
themselves
,
as a defeat.
Chingachgook and his betrothed, had witnessed the whole
of this struggle from the ark. When the three Hurons were
about to pass the cords around the arms of the prostrate
Hurry, the Delaware sought his rifle; but, before he could
use it, the white man was bound, and the mischief was
done. He might still bring down an enemy, but to obtain
the scalp was impossible; and the young chief, who would
so freely risk his own life to obtain such a trophy, hesitated
about taking that of a foe, without such an object in view.
A glance at Hist, and the recollection of what might follow,
checked any transient wish for revenge. The reader has
been told that Chingachgook could scarcely be said to know
how to manage the oars of the ark at all, however expert
he might be in the use of the paddle. Perhaps there is no
manual labour, at which men are so bungling and awkward,
as in their first attempts to pull an oar, even the experienced
mariner, or boatman, breaking down in his efforts to figure
with the celebrated rullock of the gondolier. In short, it is
temporarily an impracticable thing for a new beginner to
succeed with a single oar; but, in this case, it was necessary
to handle two at the same time, and those of great size.
Sweeps, or large oars, however, are sooner rendered of use
by the raw hand, than lighter implements, and this was the
reason that the Delaware had succeeded in moving the ark
as well as he did, in a first trial. That trial,
notwithstanding
,
had sufficed to produce distrust, and he was fully aware
of the critical situation in which Hist and himself were now
placed, should the Hurons take to the canoe that was still
lying beneath the trap, and come against them. At one
moment he thought of putting Hist into the canoe in his own
possession, and of taking to the eastern mountain, in the
hope of reaching the Delaware villages by direct flight. But
many considerations suggested themselves to put a stop to
this indiscreet step. It was almost certain that scouts
watched the lake on both sides, and no canoe could possibly
approach the shore without being seen from the hills. Then
a trail could not be concealed from Indian eyes, and the
strength of Hist was unequal to a flight sufficiently sustained,
to outstrip the pursuit of trained warriors. This was a part
of America in which the Indians did not know the use of
horses, and every thing would depend on the physical
energies
of the fugitives. Last, but far from being least, were
the thoughts connected with the situation of Deerslayer, a
friend who was not to be deserted in his extremity.
Hist, in some particulars, reasoned, and even felt,
differently
,
though she arrived at the same conclusions. Her
own danger disturbed her less than her concern for the two
sisters, in whose behalf her womanly sympathies were now
7*
strongly enlisted. The canoe of the girls, by the time the
struggle on the platform had ceased, was within three hundred
yards of the castle, and here Judith ceased paddling, the
evidences
of strife first becoming apparent to the eyes. She
and Hetty were standing erect, anxiously endeavouring to
ascertain what had occurred, but unable to satisfy their
doubts, from the circumstance that the building, in a great
measure, concealed the scene of action.
The parties in the ark, and in the canoe, were indebted to
the ferocity of Hurry's attack, for their momentary security.
In any ordinary case, the girls would have been immediately
captured; a measure easy of execution, now the savages had
a canoe, were it not for the rude check the audacity of the
Hurons had received, in the recent struggle. It required
some little time to recover from the effects of this violent
scene; and this so much the more, because the principal man
of the party, in the way of personal prowess at least, had
been so great a sufferer. Still it was of the last importance
that Judith and her sister should seek immediate refuge in
the ark, where the defences offered a temporary shelter at
least; and the first step was to devise the means of inducing
them to do so. Hist showed herself in the stern of the scow,
and made many gestures and signs, in vain, in order to
induce
the girls to make a circuit to avoid the castle, and to
approach the ark from the eastward. But these signs were
distrusted or misunderstood. It is probable Judith was not
yet sufficiently aware of the real state of things, to put full
confidence in either party. Instead of doing as desired, she
rather kept more aloof; paddling slowly back to the north, or
into the broadest part of the lake, where she could command
the widest view, and had the fairest field for flight before her.
It was at this instant that the sun appeared above the pines
of the eastern range of mountain, and a light southerly
breeze arose, as was usual enough, at that season and
hour.
Chingachgook lost no time in hoisting the sail.
Whatever
might be in reserve for him, there could be no question
that it was every way desirable to get the ark at such a
distance
from the castle, as to reduce his enemies to the
necessity
of approaching the former in the canoe, which the
chances of war had so inopportunely for his wishes and
security
,
thrown into their hands. The appearance of the
opening duck seemed first to arouse the Hurons from their
apathy; and by the time the head of the scow had fallen off
before the wind, which it did unfortunately in the wrong
direction
,
bringing it within a few yards of the platform, Hist
found it necessary to warn her lover of the importance of
covering his person against the rifles of his foes. This was
a danger to be avoided under all circumstances, and so much
the more, because the Delaware found that Hist would not
take to the cover herself, so long as he remained exposed.
Accordingly, Chingachgook abandoned the scow to its own
movements, forced Hist into the cabin, the doors of which he
immediately secured, and then he looked about him for the
rifles.
The situation of the parties was now so singular as to
merit a particular description. The ark was within sixty
yards of the castle, a little to the southward, or to
windward
of it, with its sail full, and the steering-oar
abandoned
.
The latter, fortunately, was loose, so that it produced
no great influence on the crab-like movement of the
unwieldy
craft. The sail being set, as sailors term it, flying,
or having no braces, the air forced the yard forward, though
both sheets were fast. The effect was threefold on a boat
with a bottom that was perfectly flat, and which drew
merely
some three or four inches of water. It pressed the head
slowly round to leeward, it forced the whole fabric bodily in
the same direction at the same time, and the water that
unavoidably
gathered under the lee gave the scow also a
forward
movement. All these changes were exceedingly slow,
however, for the wind was not only light, but it was
baffling
as usual, and twice or thrice the sail shook. Once it
was absolutely taken a back.
Had there been any keel to the ark, it would inevitably
have run foul of the platform, bows on, when it is probable
nothing could have prevented the Hurons from carrying it;
more particularly as the sail would have enabled them to
approach under cover. As it was, the scow wore slowly
round, barely clearing that part of the building. The piles
projecting several feet,
they
were not cleared, but the head
of the slow-moving craft caught between two of them by
one of its square corners, and hung. At this moment the
Delaware was vigilantly watching through a loop for an
opportunity to fire, while the Hurons kept within the
building
,
similarly occupied. The exhausted warrior reclined
against the hut, there having been no time to remove him,
and Hurry lay, almost as helpless as a log, tethered like a
sheep on its way to the slaughter, near the middle of the
platform. Chingachgook could have slain the first at any
moment, but still his scalp would have been safe, and the
young chief disdained to strike a blow that could lead to
neither honour nor advantage.
Run out one of the poles, Sarpent, if Sarpent you be,
said Hurry, amid the groans that the tightness of the
ligatures
were beginning to extort from himrun out one of
the poles, and shove the head of the scow off, and you'll
drift clear of usand, when you've done that good turn
for
yourself,
just finish this gagging blackguard for
me
.
The appeal of Hurry, however, had no other effect than
to draw the attention of Hist to his situation. This
quickwitted
creature comprehended it at a glance. His ancles
were bound with several turns of stout bark rope, and his
arms, above the elbows, were similarly secured behind his
back, barely leaving him a little play of the hands and
wrists. Putting her mouth near a loop, she said in a low
but distinct voice
Why you don't roll here, and fall in scow?
Chingachgook
shoot Huron if he chase!
By the Lord, gal, that's a judgmatical thought, and it
shall be tried, if the starn of your scow will come a little
nearer. Put a bed at the bottom for me to fall on.
This was said at a happy moment, for, tired of waiting,
all the Indians made a rapid discharge of their rifles, almost
simultaneously, injuring no one, though several bullets
passed
through the loops. Hist had heard part of Hurry's
words, but most of what he said was lost in the sharp
reports
of the fire-arms. She undid the bar of the door that
led to the stern of the scow, but did not dare to expose her
person. All this time the head of the ark hung, but by a
gradually decreasing hold, as the other end swung slowly
round, nearer and nearer to the platform. Hurry, who now
lay with his face towards the ark, occasionally writhing and
turning over like one in pain, evolutions he had performed
ever since he was secured, watched every change, and, at
last, he saw that the whole vessel was free, and was
beginning
to grate slowly along the sides of the piles. The
attempt
was desperate, but it seemed the only chance for
escaping torture and death, and it suited the reckless daring
of the man's character. Waiting to the last moment, in
order that the stern of the scow might fairly rub against the
platform, he began to writhe again, as if in intolerable
suffering
,
execrating all Indians in general; and the Hurons in
particular, and then he suddenly and rapidly rolled over and
over, taking the direction of the stern of the scow.
Unfortunately
,
Hurry's shoulders required more space to revolve
in than his feet, and, by the time he reached the edge of the
platform, his direction had so far changed as to carry him
clear of the ark altogether; and the rapidity of his
revolutions
,
and the emergency, admitting of no delay, he fell into
the water. At this instant, Chingachgook, by an
understanding
with his betrothed, drew the fire of the Hurons
again, not a man of whom saw the manner in which one,
whom they knew to be effectually tethered, had
disappeared
.
But Hist's feelings were strongly interested in the
success
of so bold a scheme, and she watched the movements
of Hurry as the cat watches the mouse. The moment he
was in motion she foresaw the consequences, and this the
more readily, as the scow was now beginning to move with
some steadiness, and she bethought her of the means of
saving him. With a sort of instinctive readiness, she
opened
the door at the very moment the rifles were ringing in
her ears, and, protected by the intervening cabin, she
stepped
into the stern of the scow in time to witness the fall of
Hurry into the lake. Her foot was unconsciously placed
on the end of one of the sheets of the sail, which was
fastened
aft, and catching up all the spare rope, with the
awkwardness
,
but also with the generous resolution, of a
woman
,
she threw it in the direction of the helpless Hurry.
The line fell on the head and body of the sinking man, and
he not only succeeded in grasping separate parts of it with
his hands, but he actually got a portion of it between his
teeth. Hurry was an expert swimmer, and, tethered as he
was, he resorted to the very expedient that philosophy and
reflection would have suggested. He had fallen on his
back, and instead of floundering and drowning himself by
desperate efforts to walk on the water, he permitted his body
to sink as low as possible, and was already submerged, with
the exception of his face, when the line reached him. In
this situation he might possibly have remained until rescued
by the Hurons, using his hands as fishes use their fins, had
he received no other succour; but the movement of the ark
soon tightened the rope, and of course he was dragged
gently
ahead, holding even pace with the scow. The motion
aided in keeping his face above the surface of the water,
and it would have been possible for one accustomed to
endurance
to have been towed a mile in this singular but
simple
manner.
It has been said that the Hurons did not observe the
sudden
disappearance of Hurry. In his present situation, he
was not only hid from view by the platform, but, as the ark
drew slowly ahead, impelled by a sail that was now filled,
he received the same friendly service from the piles. The
Hurons, indeed, were too intent on endeavouring to slay
their Delaware foe, by sending a bullet through some one
of the loops or crevices of the cabin, to bethink them at all,
of one whom they fancied so thoroughly tied. Their great
concern was, the manner in which the ark rubbed past the
piles, although its motion was lessened at least one-half by
the friction, and they passed into the northern end of the
castle, in order to catch opportunities of firing through the
loops of that part of the building. Chingachgook was
similarly
occupied, and remained as ignorant as his enemies,
of the situation of Hurry. As the ark grated along, the
rifles sent their little clouds of smoke from one cover to the
other, but the eyes and movements of the opposing parties
were too quick to permit any injury to be done. At length
one side had the mortification, and the other the pleasure,
of seeing the scow swing clear of the piles altogether, when
it immediately moved away, with a materially accelerated
motion, towards the north.
Chingachgook now first learned from Hist, the critical
condition of Hurry. To have exposed either of their
persons
in the stern of the scow, would have been certain
death; but, fortunately, the sheet to which the man clung,
led forward to the foot of the sail. The Delaware found
means to unloosen it from the cleet aft; and Hist, who was
already forward for that purpose, immediately began to pull
upon the line. At this moment Hurry was towing fifty or
sixty feet astern, with nothing but his face above water. As
he was dragged out clear of the castle and the piles, he was
first perceived by the Hurons, who raised a hideous yell, and
commenced a fire on, what may very well be termed, the
floating mass. It was at the same instant, that Hist began
to pull upon the line forwarda circumstance that probably
saved Hurry's life, aided by his own self-possession and
border readiness. The first bullet struck the water directly
on the spot where the broad chest of the young giant was
visible through the pure element, and might have pierced
his heart, had the angle at which it was fired been less
acute. Instead of penetrating the lake, however, it glanced
from its smooth surface, rose, and actually buried itself in
the logs of the cabin, near the spot at which Chingachgook
had shown himself the minute before, while clearing the
line from the cleet. A second, and a third, and a fourth
bullet followed, all meeting with the same resistance from
the surface of the water; though Hurry sensibly felt the
violence of the blows they struck upon the lake so
immediately
above, and so near his breast. Discovering their
mistake
,
the Hurons now changed their plan, and aimed at the
uncovered face; but, by this time, Hist was pulling on the
line, the target advanced, and the deadly missiles still fell
upon the water. In another moment the body was dragged
past the end of the scow, and became concealed. As for
the Delaware and Hist, they worked perfectly covered by
the cabin, and in less time than it requires to tell it, they
had hauled the huge frame of Hurry to the place they
occupied
.
Chingachgook stood in readiness with his keen
knife, and bending over the side of the scow, he soon
severed
the bark that bound the limbs of the borderer. To raise
him high enough to reach the edge of the boat, and to aid
him in entering, were less easy tasks, as Hurry's arms were
still nearly useless; but both were done in time, when the
liberated man staggered forward, and fell, exhausted and
helpless, into the bottom of the scow. Here we shall leave
him to recover his strength and the due circulation of his
blood, while we proceed with the narrative of events that
crowd upon us too fast to admit of any postponement.
The moment the Hurons lost sight of the body of Hurry,
they gave a common yell of disappointment, and three of
the most active of their number ran to the trap and entered
the canoe. It required some little delay, however, to
embark
with their weapons, to find the paddles, and, if we may
use a phrase so purely technical, to get out of dock. By
this time Hurry was in the scow, and the Delaware had his
rifles, again, in readiness. As the ark necessarily sailed
before the wind, it had got by this time, quite two hundred
yards from the castle, and was sliding away each instant,
farther and farther, though with a motion so easy as scarcely
to stir the water. The canoe of the girls was quite a quarter
of a mile distant from the ark, obviously keeping aloof, in
ignorance of what had occurred, and in apprehension of the
consequences of venturing too near. They had taken the
direction of the eastern shore, endeavouring at the same time
to get to windward of the ark, and in a manner between the
two parties, as if distrusting which was to be considered a
friend, and which an enemy. The girls, from long habit,
used the paddles with great dexterity; and Judith, in
particular
,
had often sportively gained races, in trials of speed
with the youths that occasionally visited the lake.
When the three Hurons emerged from behind the palisades,
and they found themselves on the open lake, and under the
necessity of advancing unprotected on the ark, if they
persevered
in the original design, their ardour sensibly cooled.
In a bark canoe, they were totally without cover, and Indian
discretion was entirely opposed to such a sacrifice of life as
would most probably follow any attempt to assault an enemy,
entrenched as effectually as the Delaware. Instead of
following
the ark, therefore, these three warriors inclined
towards
the eastern shore, keeping at a safe distance from the
rifles of Chingachgook. But this manuvre rendered the
position of the girls exceedingly critical. It threatened to
place them if not between two fires, at least between two
dangers, or what they conceived to be dangers; and, instead
of permitting the Hurons to enclose her, in what she fancied
a sort of net, Judith immediately commenced her retreat, in
a southern direction, at no very great distance from the
shore. She did not dare to land; if such an expedient were
to be resorted to at all, she could only venture on it, in the last
extremity. At first the Indians paid little or no attention to the
other canoe; for, fully apprised of its contents, they deemed
its capture of comparatively little moment; while the ark,
with its imaginary treasures, the persons of the Delaware
and of Hurry, and its means of movement on a large scale,
was before them. But this ark had its dangers as well as
its temptations; and after wasting near an hour, in vacillating
evolutions, always at a safe distance from the rifle, the
Hurons
seemed suddenly to take their resolution, and began to
display it by giving eager chase to the girls.
When this last design was adopted, the circumstances of
all parties, as connected with their relative positions, were
materially changed. The ark had sailed and drifted quite
half a mile, and was nearly that distance due north of the
castle. As soon as the Delaware perceived that the girls
avoided him, unable to manage his unwieldy craft, and
knowing that flight from a bark canoe, in the event of
pursuit
,
would be a useless expedient if attempted, he had
lowered
his sail, in the hope it might induce the sisters to change
their plan, and to seek refuge in the scow. This
demonstration
produced no other effect than to keep the ark nearer
to the scene of action, and to enable those in her to become
witnesses of the chase. The canoe of Judith was about a
quarter of a mile south of that of the Hurons, a little nearer
to the east shore, and about the same distance to the
southward
of the castle, as it was from the hostile canoe, a
circumstance
which necessarily put the last nearly abreast of
Hutter's fortress. With the several parties thus situated, the
chase commenced.
At the moment when the Hurons so suddenly changed
their mode of attack, their canoe was not in the best
possible
racing trim. There were but two paddles, and the third
man was so much extra and useless cargo. Then the
difference
in weight, between the sisters and the other two
men, more especially in vessels so extremely light, almost
neutralized any difference that might proceed from the
greater strength of the Hurons, and rendered the trial of
speed far from being as unequal as it might seem. Judith
did not commence her exertions until the near approach of
Vol. II.8
the other canoe rendered the object of the movement certain,
and then she excited Hetty to aid her with her utmost skill
and strength.
Why should we run, Judith? asked the simple-minded
girl; the Hurons have never harmed
me,
nor do I think
they ever will.
That may be true as to you, Hetty, but it will prove
very different with me. Kneel down and say your prayer,
and then rise, and do your utmost to help escape.Think
of me, dear girl, too, as you pray.
Judith gave these directions from a mixed feeling; first,
because she knew that her sister ever sought the support of
her Great Ally, in trouble; and next, because a sensation of
feebleness and dependence suddenly came over her own
proud spirit, in that moment of apparent desertion and trial.
The prayer was quickly said, however, and the canoe was
soon in rapid motion. Still, neither party resorted to their
greatest exertions from the outset, both knowing that the
chase was likely to be arduous and long. Like two vessels
of war that are preparing for an encounter, they seemed
desirous
of first ascertaining their respective rates of speed, in
order that they might know how to graduate their exertions,
previously to the great effort. A few minutes sufficed to
show the Hurons that the girls were expert, and that it
would require all their skill and energies to overtake them.
Judith had inclined towards the eastern shore at the
commencement
of the chase, with a vague determination of
landing and flying to the woods, as a last resort; but as she
approached the land, the certainty that scouts must be
watching
her movements, made her reluctance to adopt such
an expedient unconquerable. Then she was still fresh, and
had sanguine hopes of being able to tire out her pursuers.
With such feelings, she gave a sweep with her paddle, and
sheered off from the fringe of dark hemlocks, beneath the
shades of which she was so near entering, and held her way
again, more towards the centre of the lake. This seemed
the instant favourable for the Hurons to make their push,
as it gave them the entire breadth of the sheet to do it in;
and this, too, in the widest part, as soon as they had got
between the fugitives and the land. The canoes now flew;
Judith making up for what she wanted in strength, by her
great dexterity and self-command. For half a mile the
Indians
gained no material advantage, but the continuance of
so great exertions for so many minutes sensibly affected all
concerned. Here the Indians resorted to an expedient that
enabled them to give one of their party time to breathe, by
shifting the paddles from hand to hand, and this, too,
without
sensibly relaxing their efforts. Judith occasionally
looked behind her, and she saw this expedient practised. It
caused her immediately to distrust the result, since her
powers of endurance were not likely to hold out against
those of men who had the means of relieving each other;
still she persevered, allowing no very visible consequences
immediately to follow the change.
As yet, the Indians had not been able to get nearer to the
girls than two hundred yards, though they were what
sea-men
would term in their wake; or in a direct line behind
them, passing over the same track of water. This made
the pursuit what is technically called a stern chase, which
is proverbially a long chase; the meaning of which is,
that in consequence of the relative position of the parties,
no change becomes apparent, except that which is a direct
gain in the nearest possible approach. Long as this
species of chase is admitted to be, however, Judith was
enabled
to perceive that the Hurons were sensibly drawing
nearer and nearer, before she had gained the centre of the
lake. She was not a girl to despair; but there was an
instant
when she thought of yielding, with the wish of being
carried to the camp where she knew the Deerslayer to be a
captive; but the considerations connected with the means
she hoped to be able to employ, in order to procure his
release
,
immediately interposed, in order to stimulate her to
renewed exertions. Had there been any one there to note
the progress of the two canoes, he would have seen that of
Judith flying swiftly away from its pursuers, as the girl
gave it freshly-impelled speed, while her mind was thus
dwelling on her own ardent and generous schemes. So
material, indeed, was the difference in the rate of going
between the two canoes, for the next five minutes, that the
Hurons began to be convinced all their powers must be
exerted
,
or they would suffer the disgrace of being baffled by
women. Making a furious effort, under the mortification
of such a conviction, one of the stronger of their party
broke his paddle, at the very moment when he had taken it
from the hand of a comrade, to relieve him. This at once
decided the matter; a canoe containing three men, and
having
but one paddle, being utterly unable to overtake fugitives
like the daughters of Thomas Hutter.
There, Judith! exclaimed Hetty, who saw the
accident
I
hope, now, you will own, that praying is useful!
The Hurons have broke a paddle, and they never
can
overtake
us.
I never denied it, poor Hetty; and sometimes wish, in
bitterness of spirit, that I had prayed more myself, and
thought less of my beauty! As you say, we are now safe,
and need only go a little south, and take breath.
This was done; the enemy giving up the pursuit, as
suddenly
as a ship that has lost an important spar, the instant
the accident occurred. Instead of following Judith's canoe,
which was now lightly skimming the water towards the
south, the Hurons turned their bows towards the castle,
where they soon arrived and landed. The girls, fearful
that some spare paddles might be found in, or about the
buildings, continued on; nor did they stop, until so distant
from their enemies as to give them every chance of escape,
should the chase be renewed. It would seem that the
savages
meditated no such design, but at the end of an hour
their canoe, filled with men, was seen quitting the castle,
and steering towards the shore. The girls were without
food, and they now drew nearer to the buildings and the
ark, having finally made up their minds, from its man
uvres
,
that the latter contained friends.
Notwithstanding the seeming desertion of the castle,
Judith
approached it with extreme caution. The ark was now
quite a mile to the northward, but sweeping up towards the
buildings; and this, too, with a regularity of motion that
satisfied Judith a white man was at the oars. When within
a hundred yards of the building, the girls began to circle it,
in order to make sure that it was empty. No canoe was
nigh, and this emboldened them to draw nearer and nearer,
until they had gone entirely round the piles, and reached
the platform.
Do you go into the house, Hetty, said Judith, and
see that the savages are gone. They will not harm you,
and if any of them are still here, you can give me the
alarm. I do not think they will fire on a poor defenceless
girl, and I at least may escape, until I shall be ready to go
among them of my own accord.
Hetty did as desiredJudith retiring a few yards from
the platform, the instant her sister landed, in readiness for
flight. But the last was unnecessary, not a minute
elapsing
before Hetty returned to communicate that all was safe.
I've been in all the rooms, Judith, said the latter,
earnestly
,
and they are empty, except father's; he is in his
own chamber, sleeping, though not as quietly as we could
wish.
Has any thing happened to father? demanded Judith,
as her foot touched the platform; speaking quick, for her
nerves were in a state to be easily alarmed.
Hetty seemed concerned, and she looked furtively about
her, as if unwilling any one but a child should hear what
she had to communicate, and even that
she
should learn it
abruptly.
You know how it is with father, sometimes, Judith,
she said. When overtaken with liquor he doesn't always
know what he says, or doesand he seems to be overtaken
with liquor, now.
This is strange!Would the savages have drunk with
him, and then leave him behind? But 't is a grievous sight
to a child, Hetty, to witness such a failing in a parent, and
we will not go near him till he wakes.
A groan from the inner room, however, changed this
resolution, and the girls ventured near a parent, whom it
was no unusual thing for them to find in a condition that
lowers a man to the level of brutes. He was seated,
reclining
in a corner of the narrow room, with his shoulders
supported by the angle, and his head fallen heavily on his
chest. Judith moved forward, with a sudden impulse, and
removed a canvass cap that was forced so low on his head
as to conceal his face, and, indeed, all but his shoulders.
The instant this obstacle was taken away, the quivering and
raw flesh, the bared veins and muscles, and all the other
disgusting signs of mortality, as they are revealed by
tearing
away the skin, showed he had been scalped, though
still living.
8*
CHAPTER VI.
Lightly they'll talk of the spirit that's gone,
And o'er his cold ashes upbraid him;
But nothing he'll reck, if they'll let him sleep on,
In the grave where a Briton has laid him.
Disputed
.
The
reader must imagine the horror that daughters would
experience, at unexpectedly beholding the shocking
spectacle
that was placed before the eyes of Judith and Esther, as
related in the close of the last chapter. We shall pass over
the first emotions, the first acts of filial piety, and proceed
with the narrative, by imagining rather than relating most
of the revolting features of the scene. The mutilated and
ragged head was bound up, the unseemly blood was wiped
from the face of the sufferer, the other appliances required
by appearances and care were resorted to, and there was
time to inquire into the more serious circumstances of the
case. The facts were never known until years later, in all
their details, simple as they were; but they may as well be
related here, as it can be done in a few words. In the
struggle with the Hurons, Hutter had been stabbed by the
knife of the old warrior, who had used the discretion to
remove
the arms of every one but himself. Being hard pushed
by his sturdy foe, his knife had settled the matter. This
occurred just as the door was opened, and Hurry burst out
upon the platform, as has been previously related. This
was the secret of neither party's having appeared in the
subsequent struggle; Hutter having been literally disabled,
and his conqueror being ashamed to be seen with the traces
of blood about him, after having used so many injunctions to
convince his young warriors of the necessity of taking their
prisoners alive. When the three Hurons returned from the
chase, and it was determined to abandon the castle, and join
the party on the land, Hutter was simply scalped, to secure
the usual trophy, and was left to die by inches, as has been
done in a thousand similar instances, by the ruthless warriors
of this part of the American continent. Had the injury of
Hutter been confined to his head, he might have recovered,
however; for it was the blow of the knife that proved
mortal.
There are moments of vivid consciousness, when the stern
justice of God stands forth in colours so prominent, as to
defy any attempts to veil them from the sight, however
unpleasant
they may appear, or however anxious we may be
to avoid recognising it. Such was now the fact with Judith
and Hetty, who both perceived the decrees of a retributive
Providence, in the manner of their father's suffering, as a
punishment for his own recent attempts on the Iroquois.
This was seen and felt by Judith, with the keenness of
perception
and sensibility that were suited to her character;
while the impression made on the simpler mind of her sister
was perhaps less lively, though it might well have proved
more lasting.
Oh! Judith, exclaimed the weak-minded girl, as soon
as their first care had been bestowed on the sufferer.
Father
went for scalps, himself, and now where is his own?
The Bible might have foretold this dreadful punishment!
HushHettyhush, poor sisterhe opens his eyes; he
may hear and understand you. 'T is as you say and think;
but 't is too dreadful to speak of!
Waterejaculated Hutter, as it might be by a
desperate
effort, that rendered his voice frightfully deep and
strong, for one as near death as he evidently waswater
foolish girlswill you let me die of thirst?
Water was brought and administered to the sufferer; the
first he had tasted in hours of physical anguish. It had the
double effect of clearing his throat, and of momentarily
reviving
his sinking system. His eyes opened with that
anxious, distended gaze, which is apt to accompany the
passage
of a soul surprised by death, and he seemed disposed to
speak.
Fathersaid Judith, inexpressibly pained by his
deplorable
situation, and this so much the more from her
ignorance
of what remedies ought to be appliedFather, can
we do any thing for you? Can Hetty and I relieve your
pain?
Father! slowly repeated the old man. No, Judith
no, HettyI'm no father.
She
was your mother, but I'm
no father. Look in the chesttis all theregive me more
water.
The girls complied; and Judith, whose early recollections
extended farther back than her sister's, and who, on every
account, had more distinct impressions of the past, felt an
uncontrollable impulse of joy, as she heard these words.
There had never been much sympathy between her reputed
father and herself, and suspicions of this very truth had
often glanced across her mind, in consequence of dialogues
she had overheard between Hutter and her mother. It
might be going too far to say she had never loved him; but
it is not so to add, that she rejoiced it was no longer a duty.
With Hetty the feeling was different. Incapable of making
all the distinctions of her sister, her very nature was full of
affection, and she
had
loved her reputed parent, though far
less tenderly than the real parent; and it grieved her, now,
to hear him declare he was not naturally entitled to that
love. She felt a double grief, as if his death and his words
together, were twice depriving her of parents. Yielding to
her feelings, the poor girl went aside and wept.
The very opposite emotions of the two girls, kept both
silent for a long time. Judith gave water to the sufferer
frequently
,
but she forbore to urge him with questions, in some
measure out of consideration for his condition; but, if truth
must be said, quite as much lest something he should add,
in the way of explanation, might disturb her pleasing belief
that she was not Thomas Hutter's child. At length Hetty
dried her tears, and came and seated herself on a stool by
the side of the dying man, who had been placed at his length
on the floor, with his head supported by some worn
vestments
that had been left in the house.
Father, she said, you will let me
call
you father,
though you say you are not one,Father, shall I read the
bible to youmother always said the bible was good for
people in trouble. She was often in trouble herself, and
then she made me read the bible to her; for Judith wasn't
as fond of the bible as I amand it always did her good.
Many is the time I've known mother begin to listen with
the tears streaming from her eyes, and end with smiles and
gladness. Oh! father, you don't know how much good the
bible can do, for you've never tried it;now, I'll read a
chapter, and it will soften your heart, as it softened the
hearts of the Hurons.
While poor Hetty had so much reverence for, and faith
in, the virtue of the bible, her intellect was too shallow to
enable her fully to appreciate its beauties, or to fathom its
profound, and sometimes mysterious wisdom. That
instinctive
sense of right, which appeared to shield her from
the commission of wrong, and even cast a mantle of moral
loveliness and truth around her character, could not
penetrate
abstrusities, or trace the nice affinities between cause
and effect, beyond their more obvious and indisputable
connection
,
though she seldom failed to see all the latter, and to
defer to all their just consequences. In a word, she was one
of those who feel and act correctly, without being able to
give a logical reason for it, even admitting revelation as her
authority. Her selections from the bible, therefore, were
commonly distinguished by the simplicity of her own mind,
and were oftener marked for containing images of known
and palpable things, than for any of the higher cast of
moral truths with which the pages of that wonderful book
aboundwonderful, and unequalled, even without referring
to its divine origin, as a work replete with the profoundest
philosophy, expressed in the noblest language. Her mother,
with a connection that will probably strike the reader, had
been fond of the book of Job; and Hetty had, in a great
measure, learned to read by the frequent lessons she had
received from the different chapters of this venerable and
sublime poemnow believed to be the oldest book in the
world. On this occasion, the poor girl was submissive to
her training, and she turned to that well-known part of the
sacred volume, with the readiness with which the practised
counsel would cite his authorities from the stores of legal
wisdom. In selecting the particular chapter, she was
influenced
by the caption, and she chose that which stands in
our English version as,
Job excuseth his desire of death
.
This she read steadily, from beginning to end, in a sweet,
low, and plaintive voice; hoping devoutly that the
allegorical
and abstruse sentences might convey to the heart of the
sufferer the consolation he needed. It is another peculiarity
of the comprehensive wisdom of the bible, that scarce a
chapter, unless it be strictly narrative, can be turned to, that
does not contain some searching truth that is applicable to
the condition of every human heart, as well as to the
temporal
state of its owner, either through the workings of that
heart, or even in a still more direct form. In this instance,
the very opening sentence,
Is there not an appointed
time to man on earth?
was startling; and as Hetty
proceeded
,
Hutter applied, or fancied he could apply many
aphorisms and figures to his own worldly and mental
condition
.
As life is ebbing fast, the mind clings eagerly to
hope, when it is not absolutely crushed by despair. The
solemn words,
I have sinned; what shall I do unto thee,
O thou preserver of men? Why hast thou set me as a
mark against thee, so that I am a burden to myself,
struck
Hutter more perceptibly than the others; and, though too
obscure
for one of his blunted feelings and obtuse mind either
to feel or to comprehend in their fullest extent, they had a
directness of application to his own state that caused him to
wince under them.
Don't you feel better now, father? asked Hetty, closing
the volume. Mother was always better when she had
read the bible.
Water, returned Hutter; give me water, Judith. I
wonder if my tongue will always be so hot! Hetty, isn't
there something in the bible about cooling the tongue of a
man who was burning in hell-fire?
Judith turned away, shocked; but Hetty eagerly sought
the passage, which she read aloud to the conscience-stricken
victim of his own avaricious longings.
That's it; poor Hetty; yes, that's it. My tongue wants
cooling,
now;
what will it be
hereafter?
This appeal silenced even the confiding Hetty, for she
had no answer ready for a confession so fraught with
despair
.
Water, so long as it could relieve the sufferer, it
was in the power of the sisters to give; and, from time to
time, it was offered to the lips of the sufferer as he asked
for it. Even Judith prayed. As for Hetty, as soon as she
found that her efforts to make her father listen to her texts
were no longer rewarded with success, she knelt at his side,
and devoutly repeated the words which the Saviour has left
behind him as a model for human petitions. This she
continued
to do, at intervals, as long as it seemed to her that the
act could benefit the dying man. Hutter, however, lingered
longer than the girls had believed possible, when they first
found him. At times he spoke intelligibly, though his
lips oftener moved in utterance of sounds that carried no
distinct impressions to the mind. Judith listened intently,
and she heard the words husband, death, pirate,
law, scalps, and several others of a similar import,
though there was no sentence to tell the precise connection
in which they were used. Still they were sufficiently
expressive
to be understood by one whose ears had not escaped
all the rumours that had been circulated to her reputed
father's
discredit, and whose comprehension was as quick as
her faculties were attentive.
During the whole of the painful hour that succeeded,
neither
of the sisters bethought her sufficiently of the Hurons
to dread their return. It seemed as if their desolation and
grief placed them above the danger of such an interruption;
and when the sound of oars was at length heard, even
Judith
,
who alone had any reason to apprehend the enemy,
did not start, but at once understood that the ark was near.
She went upon the platform fearlessly; for, should it turn
out that Hurry was not there, and that the Hurons were
masters of the scow also, escape was impossible. Then she
had the sort of confidence that is inspired by extreme misery.
But there was no cause for any new alarm,Chingachgook,
Hist, and Hurry all standing in the open part of the scow,
cautiously examining the building, to make certain of the
absence of the enemy. They, too, had seen the departure
of the Hurons, as well as the approach of the canoe of the
girls to the castle, and, presuming on the latter fact, March
had swept the scow up to the platform. A word sufficed to
explain that there was nothing to be apprehended, and the
ark was soon moored in her old berth.
Judith said not a word concerning the condition of her
father, but Hurry knew her too well not to understand that
something was more than usually wrong. He led the way,
though with less of his confident bold manner than usual,
into the house, and, penetrating to the inner room, found
Hutter lying on his back, with Hetty sitting at his side,
fanning
him with pious care. The events of the morning had
sensibly changed the manner of Hurry. Notwithstanding
his skill as a swimmer, and the readiness with which he had
adopted the only expedient that could possibly save him, the
helplessness of being in the water, bound hand and foot, had
produced some such effect on him as the near approach of
punishment is known to produce on most criminals, leaving
a vivid impression of the horrors of death upon his mind,
and this, too, in connection with a picture of bodily
helplessness
;
the daring of this man being far more the offspring
of vast physical powers than of the energy of the will, or
even of natural spirit. Such heroes invariably lose a large
portion of their courage with the failure of their strength;
and, though Hurry was now unfettered, and as vigorous as
ever, events were too recent to permit the recollection of his
late deplorable condition to be at all weakened. Had he
lived a century, the occurrences of the few momentous
minutes
during which he was in the lake, would have produced
a chastening effect on his character, if not always on his
manner.
Hurry was not only shocked when he found his late
associate
in this desperate situation, but he was greatly
surprised
.
During the struggle in the building, he had been
far too much occupied himself to learn what had befallen
his comrade, and, as no deadly weapon had been used in
his particular case, but every effort had been made to capture
him without injury, he naturally believed that Hutter had
been overcome, while he owed his own escape to his great
bodily strength, and to a fortunate concurrence of
extraordinary
circumstances. Death, in the silence and solemnity
of a chamber, was a novelty to him. Though
accustomed
to scenes of violence, he had been unused to sit by the
bed-side and watch the slow beating of the pulse as it
gradually
grew weaker and weaker. Notwithstanding the
change in his feelings, the manners of a life could not be
altogether cast aside in a moment, and the unexpected scene
extorted a characteristic speech from the borderer.
How now! Old Tom, he said, have the vagabonds
got you at an advantage, where you're not only down, but
are likely to be kept down! I thought you a capt
y
ve it's
true, but never supposed you as hard run as this!
Hutter opened his glassy eyes and stared wildly at the
speaker. A flood of confused recollections rushed on his
wavering mind at the sight of his late comrade. It was
evident that he struggled with his own images, and knew not
the real from the unreal.
Who are you? he asked in a husky whisper, his
failing
strength refusing to aid him in a louder effort of his
voice. Who are you?You look like the mate of the
Snowhe was a giant, too, and near overcoming us.
I'm your mate, Floating Tom, and your comrade,
but have nothing to do with any snow. It's summer now,
and Harry March always quits the hills as soon after the
frosts set in as is convenient.
I know youHurry SkurryI'll sell you a scalp!
a sound one, and of a full-grown man;what'll you give?
Poor Tom! That scalp business hasn't turned out at
all profitable, and I've pretty much concluded to give it up,
and to follow a less bloody calling.
Have you got any scalp? Mine's goneHow does it
feel to have a scalp?I know how it feels to lose onefire
and flames about the brainand a wrenching at the heart
no, nokill
first,
Hurry, and scalp
afterwards
.
What does the old fellow mean, Judith? He talks like
one that is getting tired of the business as well as myself.
Why have you bound up his head? or, have the savages
tomahawked him about the brains?
They have done that for
him,
which you and he,
Harry
March, would have so gladly done for
them
. His skin
and hair have been torn from his head to gain money from
the governor of Canada, as you would have torn theirs from
the heads of the Hurons, to gain money from the governor
of York.
Judith spoke with a strong effort to appear composed, but
it was neither in her nature, nor in the feeling of the
moment
to speak altogether without bitterness. The strength
of her emphasis, indeed, as well as her manner, caused
Hetty
to look up reproachfully.
These are high words to come from Thomas Hutter's
darter, as Thomas Hutter lies dying before her eyes,
retorted
Hurry.
God be praised for that!whatever reproach it may
Vol. II.9
bring on my poor mother, I am
not
Thomas Hutter's
daughter
.
Not Thomas Hutter's darter!Don't disown the old
fellow in his last moments, Judith, for
that's
a sin the Lord
will never overlook. If you're not Thomas Hutter's
darter
,
whose darter be you?
This question rebuked the rebellious spirit of Judith; for,
in getting rid of a parent, whom she felt it was a relief to
find she might own she had never loved, she overlooked the
important circumstance that no substitute was ready to
supply
his place.
I cannot tell you, Harry, who my father was, she
answered
more mildly; I hope he was an honest man, at
least.
Which is more than you think was the case, with old
Hutter? Well, Judith, I'll not deny that hard stories were
in circulation consarning Floating Tom, but who is there
that doesn't get a scratch when an inimy holds the rake?
There's them that say hard things of
me;
and even
you,
beauty as you be, don't always escape.
This was said with a view to set up a species of
community
of character between the parties, and, as the politicians
of the day are wont to express it, with ulterior intentions.
What might have been the consequences with one of
Judith's
known spirit, as well as her assured antipathy to the
speaker, it is not easy to say; for, just then, Hutter gave
unequivocal signs that his last moment was nigh. Judith
and Hetty had stood by the dying bed of their mother, and
neither needed a monitor to warn them of the crisis, and
every sign of resentment vanished from the face of the first.
Hutter opened his eyes, and even tried to feel about him
with a hand, a sign that sight was failing. A minute later
his breathing grew ghastly; a pause totally without
respiration
followed; and, then, succeeded the last, long-drawn
sigh, on which the spirit is supposed to quit the body. This
sudden termination of the life of one who had hitherto filled
so important a place in the narrow scene on which he had
been an actor, put an end to all discussion.
The day passed by without further interruption, the
Hurons
,
though possessed of a canoe, appearing so far
satisfied
with their success as to have relinquished all immediate
designs on the castle. It would not have been a safe
undertaking
,
indeed, to approach it under the rifles of those it was
now known to contain, and it is probable that the truce was
more owing to this circumstance than to any other. In the
meanwhile, the preparations were made for the interment
of Hutter. To bury him on the land was impracticable,
and it was Hetty's wish that his body should lie by the side
of that of her mother, in the lake. She had it in her power
to quote one of his speeches, in which he himself had called
the lake the family burying-ground, and luckily this was
done without the knowledge of her sister, who would have
opposed the plan, had she known it, with unconquerable
disgust. But Judith had not meddled with the arrangement,
and every necessary disposition was made without her
privity or advice.
The hour chosen for the rude ceremony, was just as the
sun was setting, and a moment and a scene more suited to
paying the last office to one of calm and pure spirit, could
not have been chosen. There are a mystery and a
solemn
dignity in death, that dispose the living to regard the
remains of even a malefactor with a certain degree of
reverence
.
All worldly distinctions have ceased; it is thought
that the veil has been removed, and that the character and
destiny of the departed are now as much beyond human
opinions, as they are beyond human ken. In nothing is death
more truly a leveller than in this, since, while it may be
impossible absolutely to confound the great with the low,
the worthy with the unworthy, the mind feels it to be
arrogance
to assume a right to judge of those who are believed
to be standing at the judgment-seat of God. When Judith
was told that all was ready, she went upon the platform,
passive to the request of her sister, and then she first took
heed of the arrangement. The body was in the scow,
enveloped
in a sheet, and quite a hundred-weight of stones,
that had been taken from the fire-place, were enclosed with
it, in order that it might sink. No other preparation seemed
to be thought necessary, though Hetty carried her bible
beneath
her arm.
When all were on board the ark, this singular habitation
of the man whose body it now bore to his final abode, was
set in motion. Hurry was at the oars. In his powerful
hands, indeed, they seemed little more than a pair of sculls,
which were wielded without effort, and, as he was expert in
their use, the Delaware remained a passive spectator of the
proceedings. The progress of the ark had something of the
stately solemnity of a funeral procession, the dip of the oars
being measured, and the movement slow and steady. The
wash of the water, as the blades rose and fell, kept time
with the efforts of Hurry, and might have been likened to
the measured tread of mourners. Then the tranquil scene
was in beautiful accordance with a rite, that ever
associates
with itself the idea of God. At that instant, the lake
had not even a single ripple on its glassy surface, and the
broad panorama of woods seemed to look down on the holy
tranquillity of the hour and ceremony in melancholy stillness.
Judith was affected to tears, and even Hurry, though he
hardly knew why, was troubled. Hetty preserved the
outward
signs of tranquillity, but her inward grief greatly
surpassed
that of her sister, since her affectionate heart loved
more from habit and long association, than from the usual
connections of sentiment and taste. She was sustained by
religious hope, however, which in her simple mind usually
occupied the space that worldly feelings filled in that of
Judith
;
and she was not without an expectation of witnessing
some open manifestation of divine power, on an occasion so
solemn. Still, she was neither mystical nor exaggerated,
her mental imbecility denying both. Nevertheless her
thoughts had generally so much of the purity of a better
world about them, that it was easy for her to forget earth
altogether, and to think only of heaven. Hist was serious,
attentive and interested, for she had often seen the
interments
of the pale-faces, though never one that promised to
be as peculiar as this; while the Delaware, though grave,
and also observant in his demeanour, was stoical and calm.
Hetty acted as pilot, directing Hurry how to proceed, to
find that spot in the lake, which she was in the habit of
terming
mother's grave. The reader will remember that the
castle stood near the southern extremity of a shoal that
extended
near half a mile northerly, and it was at the farthest
end of this shallow water that Floating Tom had seen fit to
deposit the remains of his wife and child. His own were
now in the course of being placed at their side. Hetty
had marks on the land by which she usually found the spot,
although the position of the buildings, the general direction
of the shoal, and the beautiful transparency of the water, all
aided her, the latter even allowing the bottom to be seen.
By these means the girl was enabled to note their progress,
and at the proper time she approached March, whispering
Now, Hurry, you can stop rowing. We have passed
the stone on the bottom, and mother's grave is near.
March ceased his efforts, immediately dropping the kedge,
and taking the warp in his hand, in order to check the scow.
The ark turned slowly round, under this restraint, and when
it was quite stationary, Hetty was seen at its stern, pointing
into the water, the tears streaming from her eyes, in
ungovernable
natural feeling. Judith had been present at the
interment
of her mother, but she had never visited the spot
since. This neglect proceeded from no indifference to the
memory of the deceased; for she had loved her
mother,
and bitterly had she found occasion to mourn her loss; but
she was averse to the contemplation of death; and there had
been passages in her own life since the day of that
interment
,
which increased this feeling, and rendered her if
possible
still more reluctant to approach the spot that contained
the remains of one whose severe lessons of female morality
and propriety, had been deepened and rendered doubly
impressive
by remorse for her own failings. With Hetty, the
case had been very different. To her simple and innocent
mind, the remembrance of her mother brought no other
feeling than one of gentle sorrow; a grief that is so often
termed luxurious, even, because it associates with itself the
images of excellence, and the purity of a better state of
existence
.
For an entire summer, she had been in the habit
of repairing to the place after night-fall; and carefully
anchoring
her canoe so as not to disturb the body, she would
sit and hold fancied conversations with the deceased, sing
sweet hymns to the evening air, and repeat the orisons that
the being who now slumbered below, had taught her in
infancy
.
Hetty had passed her happiest hours in this indirect
communion with the spirit of her mother; the wildness of
Indian traditions, and Indian opinions, unconsciously to
herself
,
mingling with the Christian lore received in childhood.
Once she had even been so far influenced by the former, as
9*
to have bethought her of performing some of those physical
rites at her mother's grave, which the red men are known to
observe; but the passing feeling had been obscured by the
steady, though mild, light of Christianity, which never
ceased to burn in her gentle bosom. Now, her emotions
were merely the natural outpourings of a daughter that wept
for a mother whose love was indelibly impressed on the
heart, and whose lessons had been too earnestly taught to
be easily forgotten by one who had so little temptation to
err.
There was no other priest than nature, at that wild and
singular funeral rite. March cast his eyes below, and through
the transparent medium of the clear water, which was
almost
as pure as air, he saw what Hetty was accustomed to
call mother's grave. It was a low straggling mound of
earth, fashioned by no spade, out of a corner of which
gleamed a bit of the white cloth that formed the shroud of the
dead. The body had been lowered to the bottom, and
Hutter
brought earth from the shore and let it fall upon it,
until all was concealed. In this state the place had
remained
,
until the movement of the waters had revealed the
solitary
sign of the uses of the spot, that has just been
mentioned
.
Even the most rude and brawling are chastened by
the ceremonies of a funeral. March felt no desire to indulge
his voice in any of its coarse outbreakings, and was disposed
to complete the office he had undertaken in decent sobriety.
Perhaps he reflected on the retribution that had alighted on
his late comrade, and bethought him of the frightful jeopardy
in which his own life had so lately been placed. He
signified
to Judith that all was ready, received her directions to
proceed, and with no other assistant than his own vast
strength, raised the body and bore it to the end of the scow.
Two parts of a rope were passed beneath the legs and
shoulders
,
as they are placed beneath coffins, and then the corpse
was slowly lowered beneath the surface of the lake.
Not
there
Harry Marchno, not
there,
said Judith,
shuddering involuntarily; do not lower it, quite so near
the spot where mother lies!
Why not, Judith? asked Hetty, earnestly. They
lived together in life, and should lie together in death.
NonoHarry March, farther offfarther off.Poor
Hetty, you know not what you say.Leave me to order
this.
I know I am weak-minded, Judith, and that you are
cleverbut, surely a husband should be placed near a wife.
Mother always said that this was the way they bury in
Christian church-yards.
This little controversy was conducted earnestly, but in
smothered voices, as if the speakers feared that the dead
might overhear them. Judith could not contend with her
sister, at such a moment, but a significant gesture from her
induced March to lower the body, at a little distance from
that of his wife; when he withdrew the cords, and the act
was performed.
There's an end of Floating Tom! exclaimed Hurry,
bending over the scow, and gazing through the water at the
body. He was a brave companion on a scout, and a
notable hand with traps. Don't weep, Judithdon't be
overcome, Hetty, for the righteousest of us all must die;
and when the time comes, lamentations and tears can't bring
the dead to life. Your father will be a loss to you, no doubt;
most fathers are a loss, especially to onmarried darters; but
there's a way to cure that evil, and you're both too young
and handsome to live long without finding it out. When
it's agreeable to hear what an honest and onpretending man
has to say, Judith, I should like to talk a little with you,
apart.
Judith had scarce attended to this rude attempt of
Hurry's
at consolation, although she necessarily understood its
general drift, and had a tolerably accurate notion of its
manner. She was weeping at the recollection of her
mother's
early tenderness, and painful images of
long-forgotten
lessons and neglected precepts were crowding her
mind. The words of Hurry, however, recalled her to the
present time, and abrupt and unseasonable as was their
import
,
they did not produce those signs of distaste that one
might have expected, from the girl's character. On the
contrary, she appeared to be struck with some sudden idea,
gazed intently for a moment at the young man, dried her
eyes, and led the way to the other end of the scow,
signifying
her wish for him to follow. Here she took a seat, and
motioned for March to place himself at her side. The
decision
and earnestness with which all this was done, a little
intimidated her companion, and Judith found it necessary
to open the subject herself.
You wish to speak to me of marriage, Harry March,
she said, and I have come here, over the grave of my
parents
,
as it might beno, noover the grave of my poor,
dear, dear, mother, to hear what you have to say.
This is oncommon, and you have a skearful way with
you, this evening, Judith, answered Hurry, more disturbed
than he would have cared to own; but truth is truth, and
it shall come out, let what will follow. You well know, gal,
that I've long thought you the comeliest young woman my
eyes ever beheld, and that I've made no secret of that fact,
either here on the lake, out among the hunters and trappers,
or in the settlements.
Yesyes, I've heard this before, and I suppose it to be
true, answered Judith, with a sort of feverish impatience.
When a young man holds such language of any
particular
young woman, it's reasonable to calculate he sets
store by her.
Truetrue, Hurryall this you've told me, again and
again.
Well, if it's agreeable, I should think a woman couldn't
hear it too often. They all tell me this is the way with
your sexthat nothing pleases them more than to repeat
over and over, for the hundredth time, how much you like
'em, unless it be to talk to 'em of their good looks!
No doubtwe like both, on most occasions; but this is
an uncommon moment, Hurry, and vain words should not
be too freely used. I would rather hear you speak plainly.
You shall have your own way, Judith, and I some
suspect
you always will. I've often told you that I not only
like you better than any other young woman going, or, for
that matter, better than
all
the young women going; but
you must have obsarved, Judith, that I've never asked you,
in up and down tarms, to marry me.
I have observed both, returned the girl, a smile
struggling
about her beautiful mouth, in spite of the singular and
engrossing intentness which caused her cheeks to flush and
lighted her eyes with a brilliancy that was almost dazzling,
I have observed both, and have thought the last
remarkable
for a man of Harry March's decision and
fearlessness
.
There's been a reason, gal, and it's one that troubles
me even nownay, don't flush up so, and look fiery-like,
for there are thoughts which will stick long in any man's
mind, as there be words that will stick in his throatbut,
then, ag'in, there's feelin's that will get the better of 'em
all, and to these feelin's I find I must submit. You've no
longer a father, or a mother, Judith; and it's morally
impossible
that you and Hetty could live here, alone, allowing
it was peace and the Iroquois was quiet; but, as matters
stand, not only would you starve, but you'd both be
prisoners
,
or scalped, afore a week was out. It's time to think
of a change and a husband, and, if you'll accept of me,
all that's past shall be forgotten, and there's an end on't.
Judith had difficulty in repressing her impatience until
this rude declaration and offer were made, which she
evidently
wished to hear, and which she now listened to with a
willingness that might well have excited hope. She hardly
allowed the young man to conclude, so eager was she to
bring him to the point, and so ready to answer.
There, Hurry, that's enough, she said, raising a hand,
as if to stop him; I understand you as well as if you were
to talk a month. You prefer me to other girls, and you
wish me to become your wife.
You put it in better words than I can do, Judith, and I
wish you to fancy them said, just as you most like to hear
'em.
They're plain enough, Hurry, and 'tis fitting they
should be so. This is no place to trifle or deceive in.
Now, listen to my answer, which shall be, in every tittle, as
sincere as your offer. There is a reason, March, why I
should never
I suppose I understand you, Judith; but if I'm willing
to overlook that reason, it's no one's consarn but mine.
Now don't brighten up like the sky at sundown; for no
offence
is meant, and none should be taken.
I do not brighten up, and will
not
take offence, said
Judith, struggling to repress her indignation, in a way she
had never found it necessary to exert before. There is a
reason why I should not,
can
not, ever be your wife, Hurry,
that you seem to overlook, and which it is my duty now to
tell you, as plainly as you have asked me to consent to
become
so. I do not, and I am certain that I never shall, love
you well enough to marry you. No man can wish for a
wife who does not prefer him to all other men; and when I
tell you this frankly, I suppose you yourself will thank me
for my sincerity.
O Judith, them flaunting, gay, scarlet-coated officers of
the garrisons have done all this mishief!
Hush, March; do not calumniate a daughter over her
mother's grave! Do not, when I only wish to treat you
fairly, give me reason to call for evil on your head, in
bitterness
of heart! Do not forget that I am a woman, and
that you are a man; that I have neither father nor brother
to revenge your words.
Well, there is something in the last, and I'll say no
more. Take time, Judith, and think better of this.
I want no time; my mind has long been made up, and
I have only waited for you to speak plainly, to answer
plainly. We now understand each other, and there is no
use in saying any more.
The impetuous earnestness of the girl awed the young
man, for never before had he seen her so serious and
determined
.
In most of their previous interviews she had met his
advances with evasion, or sarcasm; but these Hurry had
mistaken for female coquetry, and had supposed might easily
be converted into consent. The struggle had been with
himself, about offering; nor had he ever seriously believed
it possible that Judith would refuse to become the wife of
the handsomest man on all that frontier. Now that the
refusal
came, and that in terms so decided as to put all
cavilling
out of the question, if not absolutely dumfounded, he
was so much mortified and surprised, as to feel no wish to
attempt to change her resolution.
The Glimmerglass has now no great call for me, he
exclaimed, after a minute's silence. Old Tom is gone;
the Hurons are as plenty on shore, as pigeons in the woods;
and altogether, it is getting to be an onsuitable place.
Then leave it. You see it is surrounded by dangers,
and there is no reason why you should risk your life for
others. Nor do I know that you can be of any service to
us. Go, to-night; we'll never accuse you of having done
any thing forgetful, or unmanly.
If I do go, 't will be with a heavy heart on your
account
,
Judith; I would rather take you with me.
That is not to be spoken of any longer, March; but, I
will land you in one of the canoes, as soon as it is dark, and
you can strike a trail for the nearest garrison. When you
reach the fort, if you send a party
Judith smothered the words, for she felt that it was
humiliating
to be thus exposing herself to the comments and
reflections of one who was not disposed to view her conduct
in connection with all in these garrisons, with an eye of
favour
.
Hurry, however, caught the idea; and, without
perverting
it, as the girl dreaded, he answered to the purpose.
I understand
what
you would say, and
why
you don't
say it, he replied. If I get safe to the fort, a party shall
start on the trail of these vagabonds, and I'll come with it,
myself; for I should like to see you, and Hetty, in a place
of safety, before we part for ever.
Ah, Harry March, had you always spoken thus, felt
thus, my feelings towards you might have been different!
Is it too late, now, Judith? I'm rough, and a
woodsman
;
but we all change under different treatment from what
we have been used to.
It
is
too late, March. I can never feel towards you, or
any other man but
one,
as you would wish to have me.
There, I've said enough, surely, and you will question me
no further. As soon as it is dark, I, or the Delaware, will
put you on the shore; you will make the best of your way
to the Mohawk, and the nearest garrison, and send all you
can to our assistance. And, Hurry, we are now friends,
and I may trust you, may I not?
Sartain, Judith; though our fri'ndship would have been
all the warmer, could you look upon me, as I look upon
you.
Judith hesitated, and some powerful emotion was
struggling
within her. Then, as if determined to look down all
weaknesses, and accomplish her purposes, at every hazard,
she spoke more plainly.
You will find a captain of the name of Warley, at the
nearest post, she said, pale as death, and even trembling as
she spoke; I think it likely he will wish to head the party;
I would greatly prefer it should be another. If Captain
Warley
can
be kept back, 't would make me very happy!
That's easier said than done, Judith; for these officers
do pretty much as they please. The major will order, and
captains, and lieutenants, and ensigns must obey. I know
the officer you mean; a red-faced, gay, oh!-be-joyful sort
of a gentleman, who swallows Madeira enough to drown the
Mohawk, and yet a pleasant talker. All the gals in the
valley admire him; and they say he admires all the gals. I
don't wonder he is your dislike, Judith, for he's a very
gineral lover, if he isn't a gineral officer.
Judith did not answer, though her frame shook, and her
colour changed from pale to crimson, and from crimson back
again to the hue of death.
Alas! my poor mother! she ejaculated mentally,
instead
of uttering it aloud; we are over thy grave, but
little
dost thou know how much thy lessons have been
forgotten
;
thy care neglected; thy love defeated!
As this goading of the worm that never dies was felt, she
arose, and signified to Hurry, that she had no more to
communicate
.
CHAPTER VII.
That point
In misery, which makes the oppressed man
Regardless of his own life, makes him too
Lord of the oppressor's
Coleridge
.
All
this time Hetty had remained seated in the head of
the scow, looking sorrowfully into the water, which held the
body of her mother, as well as that of the man whom she
had been taught to consider her father. Hist stood near
her in gentle quiet, but had no consolation to offer in words.
The habits of her people taught her reserve in this respect;
and the habits of her sex induced her to wait patiently for a
moment when she might manifest some soothing sympathy
by means of acts, rather than speech. Chingachgook held
himself a little aloof, in grave reserve, looking like a warrior,
but feeling like a man.
Judith jointed her sister with an air of dignity and
solemnity
it was not her practice to show; and, though the
gleamings of anguish were still visible on her beautiful face,
when she spoke it was firmly and without tremour. At that
instant, Hist and the Delaware withdrew, moving towards
Hurry, in the other end of the boat.
Sister, said Judith, kindly, I have much to say to
you; we will get into this canoe, and paddle off to a distance
from the arkthe secrets of two orphans ought not to be
heard by every ear.
Certainly, Judith, by the ears of their parents. Let
Hurry lift the grapnel, and move away with the ark, and
leave us here, near the graves of father and mother, to say
what we may have to say.
Father! repeated Judith, slowly, the blood for the first
time since her parting with March, mounting to her cheeks;
He was no father of ours, Hetty!
That
we had from his
own mouth, and in his dying moments.
Are you glad, Judith, to find you had no father! He
took care of us, and fed us, and clothed us, and loved us;
a father could have done no more. I don't understand why
he wasn't a father.
Never mind, dear child, but let us do as you have said.
It may be well to remain here, and let the ark move a little
away. Do you prepare the canoe, and I will tell Hurry and
the Indians our wishes.
This was soon and simply done; the ark moving, with
measured strokes of the sweeps, a hundred yards from the
spot, leaving the girls floating, seemingly in air, above the
place of the dead; so buoyant was the light vessel that held
them, and so limpid the element by which it was
sustained
.
The death of Thomas Hutter, Judith commenced, after
a short pause had prepared her sister to receive her
communications
,
has altered all our prospects, Hetty. If he was
Vol. II.10
not
our father, we are
sisters,
and must feel alike and live
together.
How do I know, Judith, that you wouldn't be as glad to
find I am not your sister, as you are in finding that Thomas
Hutter, as you call him, was not your father. I am only
half-witted, and few people like to have half-witted relations;
and then I'm not handsomeat least, not as handsome as
youand you may wish a handsomer sister.
No, no, Hetty.
You
and you only are my sistermy
heart, and my love for you, tell me thatand mother was
my motherof that, too, am I glad, and proud; for she was
a mother to be proud ofbut father was not father!
Hush, Judith! His spirit may be near; it would grieve
it to hear his children talking so, and that, too, over his
very grave. Children should never grieve parents, mother
often told me, and especially when they are dead!
Poor Hetty! They are happily removed beyond all
cares on our accounts. Nothing that
I
can do or say, will
cause mother any sorrow
now
there is some consolation in
that, at least!and nothing
you
can say or do, will make
her smile, as she used to smile on your good conduct when
living.
You don't know that, Judith. Spirits can see, and
mother
may see as well as any spirit. She always told us that
God saw all we did, and that we should do nothing to offend
him;
and now
she
has left us, I strive to do nothing that
can displease
her
. Think how her spirit would mourn and
feel sorrow, Judith, did it see either of us doing what is not
right; and spirits
may
see, after all; especially the spirits
of parents that feel anxious about their children.
Hetty, Hettyyou know not what you say!
murmured
Judith, almost livid with emotion. The dead
cannot
see, and know nothing of what passes here! But, we
will not talk of this any longer. The bodies of mother and
Thomas Hutter lie together in the lake, and we will hope
that the spirits of both are with God. That we, the
children
of one of them, remain on earth, is certain; it is now
proper to know what we are to do in future.
If we are not Thomas Hutter's children, Judith, no one
will dispute our right to his property. We have the castle
and the ark, and the canoes, and the woods, and the lakes,
the same as when he was living; and what can prevent us
from staying here, and passing our lives just as we ever
have done.
No, nopoor sister. This can no longer be. Two
girls would not be safe here, even should these Hurons fail
in getting us into their power. Even father had as much
as he could sometimes do, to keep peace upon the lake; and
we should fail altogether. We must quit this spot, Hetty,
and remove into the settlements.
I am sorry you think so, Judith, returned Hetty,
dropping
her head on her bosom, and looking thoughtfully
down at the spot where the funeral pile of her mother could
just be seen. I am
very
sorry to hear it. I would rather
stay here, where, if I wasn't born, I've passed my life. I
don't like the settlementsthey are full of wickedness and
heart-burnings, while God dwells unoffended in these hills!
I love the trees, and the mountains, and the lake, and the
springs; all that his bounty has given us, and it would grieve
me sorely, Judith, to be forced to quit them. You are
handsome
,
and not at all half-witted, and one day you will marry,
and then you will have a husband, and I a brother, to take
care of us, if women can't really take care of themselves in
such a place as this.
Ah! if this
could
be so, Hetty, then, indeed, I could
now
be a thousand times happier in these woods, than in the
settlements
!
Once
I did not feel thus, but
now
I do. Yet
where is the man to turn this beautiful place into such a
garden of Eden, for us?
Harry March loves you, sister, returned poor Hetty,
unconsciously picking the bark off the canoe as she spoke.
He would be glad to be your husband, I'm sure; and a
stouter and a braver youth is not to be met with the whole
country round.
Harry March and I understand each other, and no more
need be said about
him
. There is onebut no matter. It
is all in the hands of Providence, and we must shortly come
to some conclusion about our future manner of living.
Remain
herethat is, remain here, alone, we cannotand
perhaps no occasion will ever offer for remaining in the
manner you think of. It is time, too, Hetty, we should learn
all we can concerning our relations and family. It is not
probable we are altogether without relations, and they may
be glad to see us. The old chest is now our property, and
we have a right to look into it, and learn all we can by what
it holds. Mother was so very different from Thomas
Hutter
,
that, now I know we are not his children, I burn with
a desire to know whose children we can be. There are
papers in that chest, I am certain, and those papers may
tell us all about our parents and natural friends.
Well, Judith, you know best, for you are cleverer than
common, mother always said, and I am only half-witted.
Now father and mother are dead, I don't much care for any
relations but you, and don't think I could love them I never
saw, as well as I ought. If you don't like to marry Hurry,
I don't see who you can choose for a husband, and then I
fear we shall have to quit the lake, after all.
What do you think of Deerslayer, Hetty? asked Judith,
bending forward like her unsophisticated sister, and
endeavouring
to conceal her embarrassment in a similar manner.
Would he not make a brother-in-law to your liking?
Deerslayer! repeated the other, looking up in unfeigned
surprise; why, Judith, Deerslayer isn't in the least comely,
and is altogether unfit for one like you!
He is not ill-looking, Hetty; and beauty in a man is
not of much matter.
Do you think so, Judith? I know that beauty is of no
great matter, in man or woman, in the eyes of God; for
mother has often told me so, when she thought I might have
been sorry I was not as handsome as you,though she
needn't have been uneasy on that account, for I never
coveted any thing that is yours, sister; but tell me so she
did;still, beauty is very pleasant to the eye, in both. I
think, if I were a man, I should pine more for good looks,
than I do as a girl. A handsome man is a more pleasing
sight than a handsome woman.
Poor child! you scarce know what you say, or what
you mean! Beauty in our sex
is
something, but in man, it
passes for little. To be sure, a man ought to be tall, but
others are tall as well as Hurry; and activeI think I
know those that are more active; and strongwell, he
hasn't all the strength in the world; and braveI am
certain
I can name a youth who is braver!
This is strange, Judith. I didn't think the earth held a
handsomer, or a stronger, or a more active, or a braver
man than Harry Hurry! I am sure
I
never met his equal
in either of these things.
Well, well, Hettysay no more of this. I dislike to
hear
you
talking in this manner. 'Tis not suitable to your
innocence, and truth, and warm-hearted sincerity. Let
Harry March go. He quits us to-night, and no regret of
mine will follow him, unless it be that he has staid so long,
and to so little purpose.
Ah! Judith, this is what I've long feared; and I did
so
hope he might be my brother-in-law!
Never mind it now; let us talk of our poor mother,
and of Thomas Hutter.
Speak kindly, then, sister, for you can't be quite certain
that spirits don't both hear and see. If father wasn't father,
he was good to us, and gave us food and shelter. We can't
put any stones over their graves, here in the water, to tell
people all this, and so we ought to say it with our tongues.
They will care little for that, girl. 'T is a great
consolation
to know, Hetty, that if mother ever did commit any
heavy fault when young, that she lived sincerely to repent of
it; no doubt her sins were forgiven her.
'T isn't right, Judith, for children to talk of their
parent's
sins. We had better talk of our own.
Talk of your sins, Hetty! If there ever was a creature
on earth without sin, it is you! I wish I could say or think
the same of myself; but we shall see. No one knows what
changes affection for a good husband can make in a
woman's
heart. I don't think, child, I have even now the same
love for finery I once had.
It would be a pity, Judith, if you did think of clothes,
over your parents' graves! We will never quit this spot, if
you say so, and will let Hurry go where he pleases.
I am willing enough to consent to the last, but cannot
answer for the first, Hetty. We must live, in future, as
becomes
respectable young women, and cannot remain here
to be the talk and jest of all the rude and foul-tongued
trappers and hunters that may come upon the lake. Let
Hurry go by himself, and then I'll find the means to see
Deerslayer, when the future shall be soon settled. Come,
10*
girl, the sun has set, and the ark is drifting away from us;
let us paddle up to the scow, and consult with our friends.
This night I shall look into the chest, and to-morrow shall
determine what we are to do. As for the Hurons, now we
can use our stores without fear of Thomas Hutter, they will
be easily bought off. Let me get Deerslayer once out of
their hands, and a single hour shall bring things to an
understanding
.
Judith spoke with decision, and she spoke with authority,
a habit she had long practised towards her feeble-minded
sister. But, while thus accustomed to have her way, by
the aid of manner and a readier command of words, Hetty
occasionally checked her impetuous feelings and hasty acts
by the aid of those simple, moral truths that were so deeply
engrafted in all her own thoughts and feelings; shining
through both with a mild and beautiful lustre that threw a
sort of holy halo around so much of what she both said and
did. On the present occasion, this healthful ascendency of
the girl of weak intellect, over her of a capacity that, in
other situations, might have become brilliant and admired,
was exhibited in the usual simple and earnest manner.
You forget, Judith, what has brought us here, she said
reproachfully. This is mother's grave, and we have just
laid the body of father by her side. We have done wrong
to talk so much of ourselves at such a spot, and ought now
to pray God to forgive us, and ask
him
to teach us where
we are to go, and what we are to do.
Judith involuntarily laid aside her paddle, while Hetty
dropped on her knees and was soon lost in her devout but
simple petitions. Her sister did not pray. This she had
long ceased to do directly, though anguish of spirit
frequently
wrung from her mental and hasty appeals to the great
source of benevolence, for support, if not for a change of
spirit. Still, she never beheld Hetty on her knees, that a
feeling of tender recollection, as well as of profound regret
at the deadness of her own heart, did not come over her.
Thus had she herself done in childhood, and even down to
the hour of her ill-fated visits to the garrisons; and she
would willingly have given worlds, at such moments, to be
able to exchange her present sensations, for that confiding
faith, those pure aspirations, and the gentle hope that shone
through every lineament and movement of her, otherwise,
less-favoured sister. All she could do, however, was to
drop her head to her bosom, and assume in her attitude
some of that devotion in which her stubborn spirit refused
to unite.
When Hetty rose from her knees, her countenance had a
glow and serenity that rendered a face that was always
agreeable, positively handsome. Her mind was at peace,
and her conscience acquitted her of a neglect of duty.
Now you may go, if you want to, Judith, she said;
God has been kind to me, and lifted a burden off my
heart. Mother had many such burdens, she used to tell
me, and she always took them off in this way. 'Tis the
only way, sister, such things can be done. You may raise
a stone, or a log, with your hands; but the heart
must
be
lightened by prayer. I don't think you pray as often as
you used to do when younger, Judith!
Never mindnever mind, childanswered the other
huskily'tis no matter, now. Mother is gone, and
Thomas
Hutter is gone, and the time has come when we must
think and act for ourselves.
As the canoe moved slowly away from the place, under
the gentle impulsion of the elder sister's paddle, the
younger
sat musing, as was her wont, whenever her mind was
perplexed by any idea more abstract and difficult of
comprehension
than common.
I don't know what you mean by future, Judith, she at
length suddenly observed. Mother used to call heaven the
future, but you seem to think it means next week, or
to-morrow
!
It means both, dear sister; every thing that is yet to
come, whether in this world or another. It is a solemn
word, Hetty, and most so, I fear, to them that think the
least about it. Mother's future is eternity; ours may yet
mean what will happen while we live in this worldis not
that a canoe just passing behind the castle?here, more in
the direction of the point I mean; it is hid, now;but,
certainly
,
I saw a canoe stealing behind the logs.
I've seen it some time, Hetty quietly answered, for
the Indians had few terrors for her, but I did not think it
right to talk about such things over mother's grave. The
canoe came from the camp, Judith, and was paddled by a
single man; he seemed to be Deerslayer, and no Iroquois.
Deerslayer! returned the other, with much of her
native
impetuosity. That can't be! Deerslayer is a
prisoner
,
and I have been thinking of the means of setting
him free. Why did you fancy it Deerslayer, child?
You can look for yourself, sister; there comes the
canoe in sight again, on this side of the hut.
Sure enough, the light boat had passed the building, and
was now steadily advancing towards the ark; the persons on
board of which were already collecting in the head of the
scow, to receive their visiter. A single glance sufficed to
assure Judith that her sister was right, and that Deerslayer
was alone in the canoe. His approach was so calm and
leisurely, however, as to fill her with wonder, since a man
who had effected his escape from enemies, by either artifice
or violence, would not be apt to move with the steadiness
and deliberation with which his paddle swept the water. By
this time the day was fairly departing, and objects were
already
seen dimly under the shores. In the broad lake,
however, the light still lingered, and around the immediate
scene of the present incidents, which was less shaded than
most of the sheet, being in its broadest part, it cast a glare
that bore some faint resemblance to the warm tints of an
Italian or Grecian sunset. The logs of the hut and ark
had a sort of purple hue, blended with the growing
obscurity
,
and the bark of the hunter's boat was losing its
distinctness, in colours richer, but more mellowed, than those
it showed under a bright sun. As the two canoes approached
each other,for Judith and her sister had plied their
paddles
so as to intercept the unexpected visiter ere he reached
the ark,even Deerslayer's sun-burned countenance wore
a brighter aspect than common, under the pleasing tints that
seemed to dance in the atmosphere. Judith fancied that
delight
at meeting her had some share in this unusual and
agreeable expression. She was not aware that her own
beauty appeared to more advantage than common, from the
same natural cause; nor did she understand, what it would
have given her so much pleasure to know, that the young
man actually thought her, as she drew near, the loveliest
creature of her sex, his eyes had ever dwelt on.
Welcomewelcome, Deerslayer! exclaimed the girl,
as the canoes floated at each other's sides, the paddles having
ceased their movements; we have had a melancholya
frightful daybut your return is, at least, one misfortune
the less. Have the Hurons become more humane, and let
you go; or have you escaped from the wretches, by your
own courage and skill?
Neither, Judithneither one nor t'other. The Mingos
are Mingos still, and will live and die Mingos; it is not
likely their natur's will ever undergo much improvement.
Well; they've
their
gifts, and we've our'n, Judith, and it
doesn't much become either to speak ill of what the Lord
has created; though, if the truth must be said, I find it a
sore trial to think kindly, or to talk kindly, of them
vagabonds
.
As for outwitting them, that might have been done,
and it
was
done, too, atween the Sarpent, yonder, and
me, when we were on the trail of Hist here the hunter
stopped to laugh in his own silent fashion;but it's no
easy matter to sarcumvent the sarcumvented. Even the
fa'ans get to know the tricks of the hunters afore a single
season is over; and an Indian, whose eyes have once been
opened by a sarcumvention, never shuts them ag'in in
precisely
the same spot. I've known whites to do that, but
never a red-skin. What they l'arn, comes by practice, and
not by books; and of all schoolmasters, exper'ence gives
lessons that are the longest remembered.
All this is true, Deerslayer; but if you have not escaped
from the savages, how came you here?
That's a nat'ral question, and charmingly put. You
are
wonderful handsome this evening, Judith, or, Wild Rose,
as the Sarpent calls you, and I may as well say it, since I
honestly think it! You may well call them Mingos, savages,
too, for savage enough do they feel, and savage enough will
they act, if you once give them an opportunity. They feel
their loss here, in the late skrimmage, to their hearts' cores,
and are ready to revenge it on any creatur' of English blood
that may fall in their way. Nor, for that matter, do I much
think they would stand at taking their satisfaction out of a
Dutchman.
They have killed father; that ought to satisfy their
wicked cravings for blood, observed Hetty, reproachfully.
I know it, galI know the whole storypartly from
what I've seen from the shore, since they brought me up
from the point, and partly from their threats ag'in myself,
and their other discourse. Well, life is unsartain at the
best, and we all depend on the breath of our nostrils for it,
from day to day. If you've lost a staunch fri'nd, as I make
no doubt you have, Providence will raise up new ones in his
stead; and since our acquaintance has begun in this
oncommon
manner, I shall take it as a hint that it will be a part
of my duty in futur', should the occasion offer, to see you
don't suffer for want of food in the wigwam. I can't bring
the dead to life, but as to feeding the living, there's few on
all this frontier can outdo me, though I say it in the way of
pity and consolation, like, and, in no particular, in the way
of boasting!
We understand you, Deerslayer, returned Judith,
hastily
,
and take all that falls from your lips, as it is meant,
in kindness and friendship. Would to heaven all men had
tongues as true, and hearts as honest!
In that respect men
do
differ, of a sartainty, Judith.
I've known them that wasn't to be trusted any farther than
you can see them; and others ag'in whose messages, sent
with a small piece of wampum, perhaps, might just as much
be depended on, as if the whole business was finished afore
your face. Yes, Judith, you never said truer words, than
when you said some men might be depended on, and some
others might not.
You are an unaccountable being, Deerslayer, returned
the girl, not a little puzzled with the childish simplicity of
character that the hunter so often betrayeda simplicity so
striking, that it frequently appeared to place him nearly on
a level with the fatuity of poor Hetty, though always
relieved
by the beautiful moral truth that shone through all
that this unfortunate girl both said and did. You are a
most unaccountable man, and I often do not know how to
understand you. But never mind, just now; you have
forgotten
to tell us by what means you are here.
I!oh! That's not very onaccountable, if I am
myself
,
Judith. I'm out on furlough.
Furlough!That word has a meaning among the
soldiers
that I understand; I cannot tell what it signifies when
used by a prisoner.
It means just the same. You're right enough; the
soldiers
do use it, and just in the same way as I use it. A
furlough is when a man has leave to quit a camp, or a
garrison
,
for a sartain specified time; at the end of which he is
to come back and shoulder his musket, or submit to his
torments
,
just as he may happen to be a soldier, or a capt
y
ve
Being the last, I must take the chances of a prisoner.
Have the Hurons suffered you to quit them in this
manner
,
without watch or guard?
SartainI couldn't have come in any other manner,
unless, indeed, it had been by a bold rising, or a sarcum
vention.
What pledge have they that you will ever return?
My word, answered the hunter, simply. Yes, I own
I gave 'em
that,
and big fools would they have been to let me
come without it! Why, in that case, I shouldn't have been
obliged to go back and ondergo any deviltries their fury may
invent, but might have shouldered my rifle, and made the
best of my way to the Delaware villages. But, Lord!
Judith
,
they know'd this, just as well as you and I do, and
would no more let me come away, without a promise to go
back, than they would let the wolves dig up the bones of
their fathers!
Is it possible you mean to do this act of extraordinary
self-destruction and recklessness?
Anan!
I ask if it can be possible that you expect to be able to
put yourself again in the power of such ruthless enemies,
by keeping your word.
Deerslayer looked at his fair questioner for a moment,
with stern displeasure. Then the expression of his honest
and guileless face suddenly changed, lighting as by a quick
illumination of thought; after which he laughed in his
ordinary
manner.
I didn't understand you, at first, Judith; no, I didn't!
You believe that Chingachgook and Hurry Harry won't
suffer it; but you don't know mankind thoroughly yet, I
see. The Delaware would be the last man on 'arth to offer
any objections to what he knows is a duty; and, as for
March, he doesn't care enough about any creatur' but
himself
to spend many words on such a subject. If he did,
't would make no great difference, howsever; but not he
for he thinks more of his gains than of even his own word.
As for my promises, or your'n, Judith, or anybody else's,
they give him no consarn. Don't be under any oneasiness,
therefore, gal; I shall be allowed to go back according to
the furlough; and if difficulties was made, I've not been
brought up, and edicated, as one may say, in the woods,
without knowing how to look 'em down.
Judith made no answer for some little time. All her
feelings
as a womanand as a woman who, for the first time
in her life, was beginning to submit to that sentiment which
has so much influence on the happiness or misery of her
sexrevolted at the cruel fate that she fancied Deerslayer
was drawing down upon himself, while the sense of right,
which God has implanted in every human breast, told her
to admire an integrity as indomitable and unpretending as
that which the other so unconsciously displayed.
Argument
,
she felt would be useless; nor was she, at that
moment
,
disposed to lessen the dignity and high principle that
were so striking in the intentions of the hunter, by any
attempt to turn him from his purpose. That something
might yet occur to supersede the necessity for this
self-immolation
,
she tried to hope; and then she proceeded to
ascertain
the facts, in order that her own conduct might be
regulated by her knowledge of circumstances.
When is your furlough out, Deerslayer? she asked,
after both canoes were heading towards the ark, and
moving
,
with scarcely a perceptible effort of the paddles, through
the water.
To-morrow noon; not a minute afore; and you may
depend on it, Judith, I shan't quit what I call Christian
company
,
to go and give myself up to them vagabonds, an
instant
sooner than is downright necessary. They begin to
fear a visit from the garrisons, and wouldn't lengthen the
time a moment; and it's pretty well understood atween us,
that, should I fail in my ar'n'd, the torments are to take
place when the sun begins to fall, that they may strike upon
their home trail as soon as it is dark.
This was said solemnly, as if the thought of what was
believed to be in reserve duly weighed on the prisoner's
mind, and yet so simply, and without a parade of suffering,
as rather to repel than to invite any open manifestations of
sympathy.
Are they bent on revenging their losses? Judith asked,
faintly, her own high spirit yielding to the influence of the
other's quiet but dignified integrity of purpose.
Downright, if I can judge of Indian inclinations by the
symptoms. They think, howsever, I don't suspect their
designs
,
I do believe; but one that has lived so long among
men of red-skin gifts, is no more likely to be misled in
Indian
feelin's, than a true hunter is like to lose his trail, or a
staunch hound his scent. My own judgment is greatly ag'in
my own escape, for I see the women are a good deal enraged
on behalf of Hist, though I say it, perhaps, that shouldn't
say itseein' that I had considerable hand myself in getting
the gal off. Then there was a cruel murder in their camp
last night, and that shot might just as well have been fired
into my breast. Howsever, come what will, the Sarpent
and his wife will be safe, and that is some happiness, in
any case.
Oh! Deerslayer, they will think better of this, since
they have given you until to-morrow noon to make up your
mind!
I judge not, Judith; yes, I judge not. An Indian is an
Indian, gal, and it's pretty much hopeless to think of
swarving
him, when he's got the scent and follows it with his
nose in the air. The Delawares, now, are a
half-christianized
tribenot that I think such sort of Christians much
better than your whole-blooded disbelieversbut,
nevertheless
,
what good half-christianizing can do to a man some
among 'em have got, and yet revenge clings to their hearts
like the wild creepers here to the tree! Then I slew one of
the best and boldest of their warriors, they say, and it
is
too much to expect that they should captivate the man who
did this deed, in the very same scouting on which it was
performed, and they take no account of the matter. Had
a month or so gone by, their feelin's would have been
softened
down, and we might have met in a more friendly way;
but it is, as it is. Judith, this is talking of nothing but
myself, and my own consarns, when you have had trouble
Vol. II.11
enough, and may want to consult a fri'nd a little about
your own matters. Is the old man laid in the water where
I should think his body would like to rest?
It is, Deerslayer, answered Judith, almost inaudibly.
That duty has just been performed. You are right in
thinking that I wish to consult a friend; and that friend is
yourself. Hurry Harry is about to leave us; when he is
gone, and we have got a little over the feelings of this
solemn
office, I hope you will give me an hour alone. Hetty
and I are at a loss what to do.
That's quite nat'ral, coming as things have, suddenly
and fearfully. But here's the ark, and we'll say more of
this when there is a better opportunity.
CHAPTER VIII.
The winde is great upon the highest hilles;
The quiet life is in the dale below;
Who tread on ice shall slide against their willes;
They want not cares, that curious arts should know;
Who lives at ease and can content him so,
Is perfect wise, and sets us all to schoole;
Who hates this lore may well be called a foole.
Churchyard
.
The
meeting between Deerslayer and his friends in the
ark was grave and anxious. The two Indians, in
particular
,
read in his manner that he was not a successful
fugitive
,
and a few sententious words sufficed to let them
comprehend
the nature of what their friend had termed his
furlough. Chingachgook immediately became
thoughtful
;
while Hist, as usual, had no better mode of expressing
her sympathy than by those little attentions which mark the
affectionate manner of woman.
In a few minutes, however, something like a general plan
for the proceedings of the night was adopted, and, to the eye
of an uninstructed observer, things would be thought to
move in their ordinary train. It was now getting to be
dark, and it was decided to sweep the ark up to the castle,
and secure it in its ordinary berth. This decision was come
to, in some measure, on account of the fact that all the
canoes
were again in the possession of their proper owners;
but principally, from the security that was created by the
representations of Deerslayer. He had examined the state
of things among the Hurons, and felt satisfied that they
meditated no further hostilities during the night, the loss
they had met having indisposed them to further exertions
for the moment. Then he had a proposition to make; the
object of his visit; and, if this were accepted, the war would
at once terminate between the parties; and it was
improbable
that the Hurons would anticipate the failure of a project
on which their chiefs had apparently set their hearts, by
having recourse to violence previously to the return of their
messenger.
As soon as the ark was properly secured, the different
members of the party occupied themselves in their several
peculiar manners; haste in council, or in decision, no more
characterizing the proceedings of the border whites, than
it did those of their red neighbours. The women busied
themselves in preparations for the evening meal, sad and
silent, but ever attentive to the first wants of nature.
Hurry set about repairing his moccasins, by the light of a
blazing knot; Chingachgook seated himself in gloomy
thought; while Deerslayer proceeded, in a manner equally
free from affectation and concern, to examine Killdeer,
the rifle of Hutter, that has been already mentioned, and
which subsequently became so celebrated, in the hands of
the individual who was now examining its merits. The
piece was a little longer than usual, and had evidently been
turned out from the work-shop of some manufacturer of a
superior
order. It had a few silver ornaments; though, on the
whole, it would have been deemed a plain piece by most
frontier men; its great merit consisting in the accuracy of
its bore, the perfection of the details, and the excellence of
the metal. Again and again did the hunter apply the breech
to his shoulder, and glance his eye along the sights, and as
often did he poise his body, and raise the weapon slowly, as
if about to catch an aim at a deer, in order to try the weight,
and to ascertain its fitness for quick and accurate firing.
All this was done, by the aid of Hurry's torch, simply, but
with an earnestness and abstraction that would have been
found touching by any spectator who happened to know the
real situation of the man.
'T is a glorious we'pon, Hurry! Deerslayer at length
exclaimed, and it may be thought a pity that it has fallen
into the hands of women. The hunters have told me of its
expl'ites; and by all I have heard, I should set it down as
sartain
death in exper'enced hands. Hearken to the tick of this
locka wolf-trap hasn't a livelier spring; pan and cock
speak together, like two singing-masters undertaking a psalm
in meetin'. I never
did
see so true a bore, Hurry, that's
sartain!
Ay, Old Tom used to give the piece a character, though
he wasn't the man to particularize the ra'al natur' of any
sort of fire-arms, in practice, returned March, passing the
deer's thongs through the moccasin with the coolness of a
cobbler. He was no marksman, that we must all allow;
but he had his good p'ints, as well as his bad ones. I have
had hopes that Judith might consait the idee of giving
Kill-deer
to me.
There's no saying what young women may do, that's
a truth, Hurry; and I suppose you're as likely to own the
rifle as another. Still, when things are so very near
perfection
,
it's a pity not to reach it entirely.
What do you mean by that?Would not that piece
look as well on my shoulder, as on any man's?
As for looks, I say nothing. You are both
good-looking
,
and might make what is called a good-looking couple.
But the true p'int is as to conduct. More deer would fall in
one day, by that piece, in some men's hands, than would fall
in a week, in your'n, Hurry! I've seen you try;you
remember
the buck t'other day?
That buck was out of season; and who wishes to kill
venison out of season. I was merely trying to frighten the
creatur', and I think you will own that he was pretty well
skeared, at any rate.
Well, well, have it as you say. But this is a lordly
piece, and would make a steady hand and quick eye, the
King of the Woods!
Then keep it, Deerslayer, and become King of the
Woods, said Judith, earnestly, who had heard the
conversation
,
and whose eye was never long averted from the honest
countenance of the hunter. It can never be in better hands
than it is, at this moment; there I hope it will remain these
fifty years.
Judith, you can't be in 'arnest! exclaimed Deerslayer,
taken so much by surprise, as to betray more emotion than
it was usual for him to manifest on ordinary occasions.
Such a gift would be fit for a ra'al king to make; yes, and
for a ra'al king to receive.
I never was more in earnest, in my life, Deerslayer;
and I am as much in earnest in the wish as in the gift.
Well, gal, well; we'll find time to talk of this ag'in.
You musn't be down-hearted, Hurry, for Judith is a sprightly
young woman, and she has a quick reason; she knows
that the credit of her father's rifle is safer in my hands, than
it can possibly be in your'n; and, therefore, you mustn't be
down-hearted. In other matters, more to your liking, too,
you'll find she'll give you the preference.
Hurry growled out his dissatisfaction; but he was too
intent
on quitting the lake, and in making his preparations, to
waste his breath on a subject of this nature. Shortly after,
the supper was ready; it was eaten in silence, as is so
much the habit of those who consider the table as merely a
place of animal refreshment. On this occasion, however,
sadness and thought contributed their share to the general
desire not to converse; for Deerslayer was so far an
exception
to the usages of men of his cast, as not only to wish to
hold discourse on such occasions, but as often to create a
similar desire in his companions.
The meal ended, and the humble preparations removed,
the whole party assembled on the platform to heat the
expected
intelligence from Deerslayer, on the subject of his
visit. It had been evident he was in no haste to make his
communications; but the feelings of Judith would no longer
admit of delay. Stools were brought from the ark and the
hut, and the whole six placed themselves in a circle, near
the door, watching each other's countenances, as best they
could, by the scanty means that were furnished by a lovely
starlight night. Along the shore, beneath the mountains,
lay the usual body of gloom; but in the broad lake no shadow
11*
was cast, and a thousand mimic stars were dancing in the
limpid element, that was just stirred enough by the evening
air to set them all in motion.
Now, Deerslayer, commenced Judith, whose impatience
resisted further restraint; now, Deerslayer, tell us all the
Hurons have to say, and the reason why they have sent you
on parole, to make us some offer.
Furlough, Judith; furlough is the word; and it carries
the same meaning with a capt
y
ve at large as it does with a
soldier who has leave to quit his colours. In both cases the
word is past to come back: and now I remember to have
heard that's the ra'al signification, `furlough' meaning a
`word' passed for the doing of any thing, or the like.
Parole, I rather think, is Dutch, and has something to do
with the tattoos of the garrisons. But this makes no great
difference, since the vartue of a pledge lies in the idee, and
not in the word. Well, then, if the message must be given,
it must; and perhaps there is no use in putting it off.
Hurry will soon be wanting to set out on his journey to the
river, and the stars rise and set, just as if they cared for
neither Indian nor message. Ah's! me; 'tisn't a pleasant,
and I know it's a useless ar'n'd; but it must be told.
Harkee, Deerslayer, put in Hurry, a little
authoritatively
;
you're a sensible man in a hunt, and as good a fellow
on a march as a sixty-miler-a-day could wish to meet with;
but you're oncommon slow about messages, especially them
that you think won't be likely to be well received. When
a thing is to be told, why, tell it, and don't hang back like a
Yankee lawyer pretending he can't understand a
Dutchman's
English, just to get a double fee out of him.
I understand you, Hurry, and well are you named
tonight
,
seeing you've no time to lose. But let us come at
once to the p'int, seeing that's the object of this council; for
council it may be called, though women have seats among
us. The simple fact is this. When the party came back
from the castle, the Mingos held a council, and bitter
thoughts were uppermost, as was plainly to be seen by their
gloomy faces. No one likes to be beaten, and a red-skin as
little as a pale-face. Well, when they had smoked upon it,
and made their speeches, and their council-fire had burnt
low, the matter came out. It seems the elders among 'em
consaited I was a man to be trusted on a furlough. They're
wonderful obsarvant, them Mingos;
that
their worst
inimies
must allow; but they consaited I was such a man;
and it isn't often added the hunter, with a pleasing
consciousness
that his previous life justified this implicit reliance
on his good faithit isn't often they consait any thing so
good of a pale-face; but so they did with me, and therefore
they didn't hesitate to speak their minds, which is just this:
You see the state of things. The lake and all on it, they
fancy, lie at their marcy. Thomas Hutter is deceased, and
as for Hurry, they've got the idee he has been near enough
to death to-day, not to wish to take another look at him this
summer. Therefore, they account all your forces as
reduced
to Chingachgook and the two young women, and,
while they know the Delaware to be of a high race, and a
born warrior, they know he's now on his first war-path.
As for the gals, of course they set them down much as they
do women in gineral.
You mean that they despise us! interrupted Judith,
with eyes that flashed so brightly as to be observed by all
present.
That will be seen in the end. They hold that all on
the lake lies at their marcy, and, therefore, they send by
me this belt of wampum, showing the article in question
to the Delaware as he spoke, with these words:Tell
the Sarpent, they say, that he has done well for a beginner;
he may now strike across the mountains, for his own
villages
,
and no one shall look for his trail. If he has found
a scalp, let him take it with him; the Huron braves have
hearts, and can feel for a young warrior who doesn't wish to
go home empty-handed. If he is nimble, he is welcome to
lead out a party in pursuit. Hist, howsever, must go back
to the Hurons; when she left them in the night, she
carried away, by mistake, that which doesn't belong to
her.
That
can't
be true! said Hetty, earnestly. Hist is no
such girlbut one that gives everybody his due
How much more she would have said, in remonstrance,
cannot be known, inasmuch as Hist, partly laughing, and
partly hiding her face in shame, put her own hand across
the speaker's mouth, in a way to check the words.
You don't understand Mingo messages, poor Hetty,
resumed Deerslayer, which seldom mean what lies
exactly
uppermost. Hist has brought away with her the
inclinations
of a young Huron, and they want her back again,
that the poor young man may find them where he last saw
them! The Sarpent, they say, is too promising a young
warrior not to find as many wives as he wants, but this one
he cannot have. That's their meaning, and nothing else,
as I understand it.
They are very obliging and thoughtful, in supposing a
young woman can forget all her own inclinations in order
to let this unhappy youth find his! said Judith, ironically;
though her manner became more bitter as she proceeded.
I suppose a woman is a woman, let her colour be white or
red; and your chiefs know little of a woman's heart,
Deerslayer
,
if they think it can ever forgive when wronged, or
ever forget when it fairly loves.
I suppose that's pretty much the truth, with some
women
,
Judith, though I've known them that could do both.
The next message is to you. They say the Muskrat, as
they call your father, has dove to the bottom of the lake;
that he will never come up again, and that his young
will soon be in want of wigwams, if not of food. The
Huron huts, they think, are better than the huts of York;
they wish you to come and try them. Your colour is
white, they own, but they think young women who've lived
so long in the woods, would lose their way in the clearin's.
A great warrior among them has lately lost his wife, and he
would be glad to put the Wild Rose on her bench at his
fireside
.
As for the Feeble-Mind, she will always be honoured
and taken care of by red warriors. Your father's goods,
they think, ought to go to enrich the tribe; but your own
property, which is to include every thing of a female natur',
will go, like that of all wives, into the wigwam of the
husband
.
Moreover, they've lost a young maiden by violence,
lately, and 'twill take two pale-faces to fill her seat.
And do
you
bring such a message to
me!
exclaimed
Judith, though the tone in which the words were uttered,
had more in it of sorrow than of anger. Am I a girl to
be an Indian's slave?
If you wish my honest thoughts on this p'int, Judith, I
shall answer that I don't think you'll willingly ever become
any man's slave, red-skin or white. You're not to think
hard, howsever, of my bringing the message, as near as I
could, in the very words in which it was given to me.
Them was the conditions on which I got my furlough, and
a bargain is a bargain, though it is made with a vagabond.
I've told you what
they've
said, but I've not yet told you
what I think you ought, one and all, to answer.
Ay; let's hear that, Deerslayer, put in Hurry. My
cur'osity is up on that consideration, and I should like right
well to hear your idees of the reasonableness of the reply.
For my part, though, my own mind is pretty much settled,
on the p'int of my own answer, which shall be made known
as soon as necessary.
And so is mine, Hurry, on all the different heads, and
on no one is it more sartainly settled than on your'n. If I
was you, I should say`Deerslayer, tell them scamps, they
don't know Harry March! He is human; and having a
white skin, he has also a white natur', which natur' won't
let him desart females of his own race and gifts, in their
greatest need. So set me down as one that will refuse to
come into your treaty, though you should smoke a
hogshead
of tobacco over it.'
March was a little embarrassed at this rebuke, which was
uttered with sufficient warmth of manner, and with a point
that left no doubt of the meaning. Had Judith encouraged
him, he would not have hesitated about remaining to defend
her and her sister, but under the circumstances, a feeling of
resentment rather urged him to abandon them. At all
events, there was not a sufficiency of chivalry in Hurry
Harry, to induce him to hazard the safety of his own
person
,
unless he could see a direct connection between the
probable
consequences and his own interests. It is no wonder,
therefore, that his answer partook equally of his intention,
and of the reliance he so boastingly placed on his gigantic
strength, which if it did not always make him courageous,
usually made him impudent, as respects those with whom he
conversed.
Fair words make long friendships, Master Deerslayer,
he said, a little menacingly. You're but a stripling, and,
you know by exper'ence, what you are in the hands of a
man. As you're not me, but only a go-between, sent by
the savages to us Christians, you may tell your empl'yers
that they do know Harry March, which is a proof of their
sense, as well as his. He's human enough to follow human
natur', and that tells him to see the folly of one man's
fighting
a whole tribe. If females desart him, they must expect
to be desarted
by
him, whether they're of his own gifts, or
another man's gifts. Should Judith see fit to change her
mind, she's welcome to my company to the river, and Hetty
with her; but shouldn't she come to this conclusion, I start
as soon as I think the enemy's scouts are beginning to nestle
themselves in among the brush and leaves, for the night.
Judith will
not
change her mind, and she does not ask
your company, Master March, returned the girl, with spirit.
That p'int's settled, then, resumed Deerslayer,
unmoved
by the other's warmth. Hurry Harry must act for
himself, and do that which will be most likely to suit his own
fancy. The course he means to take will give him an easy
race, if it don't give him an easy conscience. Next comes
the question with Hist what say you, gal? will you
desart
your duty, too, and go back to the Mingos and take a
Huron husband; and all, not for the love of the man you're
to marry, but for the love of your own scalp?
Why you talk so to Hist? demanded the girl, half
offended
.
You t'ink a red-skin girl made like captain's
lady, to laugh and joke with any officer that come.
What I think, Hist, is neither here nor there, in this
matter. I must carry back your answer, and in order to do
so, it is necessary that you should send it. A faithful
messenger
gives his ar'n'd, word for word.
Hist no longer hesitated to speak her mind fully. In the
excitement she rose from her bench, and naturally recurring
to that language in which she expressed herself the most
readily, she delivered her thoughts and intentions, beautifully
and with dignity, in the tongue of her own people.
Tell the Hurons, Deerslayer, she said, that they are
as ignorant as moles; they don't know the wolf from the dog.
Among my people, the rose dies on the stem where it
budded
;
the tears of the child fall on the graves of its parents;
the corn grows where the seed has been planted. The
Delaware girls are not messengers, to be sent, like belts of
wampum, from tribe to tribe. They are honeysuckles, that
are sweetest in their own woods; their own young men
carry them away in their bosoms, because they are
fragrant
;
they are sweetest when plucked from their native
stems. Even the robin and the marten come back, year after
year, to their old nests; shall a woman be less true-hearted
than a bird? Set the pine in the clay, and it will turn
yellow
;
the willow will not flourish on the hill; the tamarack
is healthiest in the swamp; the tribes of the sea love best
to hear the winds that blow over the salt water. As
for a Huron youth, what is he to a maiden of the Lenni
Lenape? He may be fleet, but her eyes do not follow him
in the race; they look back towards the lodges of the
Delawares
.
He may sing a sweet song for the girls of Canada,
but there is no music for Wah, but in the tongue she has
listened to from childhood. Were the Huron born of the
people that once roamed the shores of the salt lake, it would
be in vain, unless he were of the family of Uncas. The
young pine will rise to be as high as any of its fathers.
Wah-ta!-Wah has but one heart, and it can love but one
husband.
Deerslayer listened to this characteristic message, which
was given with an earnestness suited to the feelings from
which it sprung, with undisguised delight; meeting the ardent
eloquence of the girl, as she concluded, with one of his own
heart-felt, silent, and peculiar fits of laughter.
That's worth all the wampum in the woods! he
exclaimed
.
You don't understand it, I suppose, Judith; but
if you'll look into your feelin's, and fancy that an inimy
had sent to tell you to give up the man of your choice, and
to take up with another that wasn't the man of your choice,
you'll get the substance of it, I'll warrant! Give me a
woman for ra'al eloquence, if they'll only make up their
minds to speak what they feel. By speakin', I don't mean
chatterin', howsever; for most of them will do
that
by the
hour; but comin' out with their honest, deepest feelin's, in
proper words. And now, Judith, having got the answer of
a red-skin girl, it is fit I should get that of a pale-face, if,
indeed, a countenance that is as blooming as your'n can in
any wise so be tarmed. You are well named the Wild Rose,
and so far as colour goes, Hetty ought to be called the
Honeysuckle
.
Did this language come from one of the garrison
gallants
,
I should deride it, Deerslayer; but coming from
you,
I know it can be depended on, returned Judith, deeply
gratified
by his unmeditated and characteristic compliments.
It is too soon, however, to ask my answer; the Great
Serpent has not yet spoken.
The Serpent! Lord; I could carry back his speech
without hearing a word of it! I didn't think of putting the
question to him at all, I will allow; though 't would be
hardly right either, seeing that truth is truth, and I'm bound
to tell these Mingos the fact, and nothing else. So,
Chingachgook
,
let us hear
your
mind on this matterare you
inclined to strike across the hills towards your village, to
give up Hist to a Huron, and to tell the chiefs at home, that
if they're act
y
ve and successful they may possibly get
on
the end of the Iroquois trail some two or three days after
the inimy has got
off
of it?
Like his betrothed, the young chief arose, that his
answer
might be given with due distinctness and dignity.
Hist had spoken with her hands crossed upon her bosom,
as if to suppress the emotions within; but the warrior
stretched an arm before him, with a calm energy that aided
in giving emphasis to his expressions.
Wampum should be sent for wampum, he said; a
message must be answered by a message. Hear what the
Great Serpent of the Delawares has to say to the pretended
wolves from the great lakes, that are howling through our
woods. They are no wolves; they are dogs that have come
to get their tails and ears cropped by the hands of the
Delawares
.
They are good at stealing young women; bad
at keeping them. Chingachgook takes his own where he
finds it; he asks leave of no cur from the Canadas. If
he has a tender feeling in his heart, it is no business of the
Hurons. He tells it to her who most likes to know it;
he will not bellow it in the forest, for the ears of those that
only understand yells of terror. What passes in his lodge
is not for the chiefs of his own people to know; still less
for Mingo rogues
Call 'em vagabonds, Sarpent, interrupted Deerslayer,
unable to restrain his delightyes, just call 'em
up-and-down
vagabonds, which is a word easily intarpreted, and
the most hateful to all their ears, it's so true. Never fear
me; I'll give 'em your message, syllable for syllable, sneer
for sneer, idee for idee, scorn for scornand they desarve
no better at your hands.Only call 'em vagabonds, once
or twice, and that will set the sap mounting in 'em, from
their lowest roots to the uppermost branches!
Still less for Mingo vagabonds! resumed
Chingachgook
,
quite willingly complying with his friend's request.
Tell the Huron dogs to howl louder, if they wish a
Delaware
to find them in the woods, where they burrow like
foxes, instead of hunting like warriors. When they had a
Delaware maiden in their camp, there was a reason for
hunting them up; now they will be forgotten, unless they
make a noise. Chingachgook don't like the trouble of
going to his villages for more warriors; he can strike their
run-away trail: unless they hide it under ground, he will
follow it to Canada, alone. He will keep Wah-ta!-Wah
with him to cook his game; they two will be Delawares
enough to scare all the Hurons back to their own
country
.
That's a grand despatch, as the officers call them
things! cried Deerslayer;  't will set all the Huron blood
in motion; most particularly that part where he tells 'em
Hist, too, will keep on their heels, till they're fairly driven
out of the country. Ah's! me; big words ar'n't always big
deeds, notwithstanding! The Lord send that we be able to
be only one half as good as we promise to be! And now,
Judith, it's your turn to speak, for them miscreants will
expect an answer from each person, poor Hetty, perhaps,
excepted.
And why not Hetty, Deerslayer? She often speaks to
the purpose; the Indians may respect her words, for they
feel for people in her condition.
That is true, Judith, and quick-thoughted in you. The
red-skins
do
respect misfortunes of all kinds, and Hetty's,
in particular. So, Hetty, if you have any thing to say, I'll
carry it to the Hurons as faithfully as if it was spoken by a
schoolmaster, or a missionary.
The girl hesitated a moment, and then she answered in
Vol. II.12
her own gentle, soft tones, as earnestly as any who had
preceded her.
The Hurons can't understand the difference between
white people and themselves, she said, or they wouldn't
ask Judith and me to go and live in their villages. God
has given one country to the red men, and another to us.
He meant us to live apart. Then mother always said that
we should never dwell with any but Christians, if possible,
and
that
is a reason why we can't go. This lake is ours,
and we won't leave it. Father and mother's graves are in
it, and even the worst Indians love to stay near the graves
of their fathers. I will come and see them again, if they
wish me to, and read more out of the bible to them, but I
can't quit father's and mother's graves.
That will dothat will do, Hetty, just as well as if you
sent them a message twice as long, interrupted the hunter.
I'll tell 'em all you've said, and all you mean, and I'll
answer for it, that they'll be easily satisfied. Now, Judith,
your turn comes next, and then this part of my ar'n'd will
be tarminated, for the night.
Judith manifested a reluctance to give her reply, that had
awakened a little curiosity in the messenger. Judging from
her known spirit, he had never supposed the girl would be
less true to her feelings and principles than Hist, or Hetty;
and yet there was a visible wavering of purpose that
rendered
him slightly uneasy. Even now when directly
required
to speak, she seemed to hesitate; nor did she open
her lips, until the profound silence told her how anxiously
her words were expected. Then, indeed, she spoke, but it
was doubtingly and with reluctance.
Tell me, firsttell
us,
first, Deerslayer, she
commenced
,
repeating the words merely to change the emphasis
what effect will our answers have on your fate? If
you are to be the sacrifice of our spirit, it would have been
better had we all been more wary as to the language we
use. What, then, are likely to be the consequences to
yourself?
Lord, Judith, you might as well ask me which way the
wind will blow next week, or what will be the age of the
next deer that will be shot! I can only say that their faces
look a little dark upon me, but it doesn't thunder every time
a black cloud rises, nor does every puff of wind blow up
rain. That's a question, therefore, much more easily put
than answered.
So is this message of the Iroquois to me, answered
Judith, rising, as if she had determined on her own course
for the present. My answer shall be given, Deerslayer,
after you and I have talked together alone, when the others
have laid themselves down for the night.
There was a decision in the manner of the girl, that
disposed
Deerslayer to comply, and this he did the more readily
as the delay could produce no material consequences, one
way or the other. The meeting now broke up, Hurry
announcing his resolution to leave them speedily. During
the hour that was suffered to intervene, in order that the
darkness might deepen, before the frontier-man took his
departure, the different individuals occupied themselves in
their customary modes, the hunter, in particular, passing
most of the time in making further inquiries into the
perfection
of the rifle already mentioned.
The hour of nine soon arrived, however, and then it had
been determined that Hurry should commence his journey.
Instead of making his adieus frankly, and in a generous
spirit, the little he thought it necessary to say was uttered
sullenly and in coldness. Resentment at what he
considered
Judith's obstinacy, was blended with mortification at
the career he had run, since reaching the lake; and, as is
usual with the vulgar and narrow-minded, he was more
disposed
to reproach others with his failures, than to censure
himself. Judith gave him her hand, but it was quite as
much in gladness as with regret, while the two Delawares
were not sorry to find he was leaving them. Of the whole
party, Hetty alone betrayed any real feeling. Bashfulness,
and the timidity of her sex and character, kept even her
aloof, so that Hurry entered the canoe, where Deerslayer
was already waiting for him, before she ventured near
enough to be observed. Then, indeed, the girl came into
the ark, and approached its end just as the little bark was
turning from it, with a movement so light and steady as to
be almost imperceptible. An impulse of feeling now
overcame
her timidity, and Hetty spoke.
Good bye, Hurryshe called out in her sweet voice
good bye, dear Hurry. Take care of yourself in the
woods, and don't stop once 'till you reach the garrison.
The leaves on the trees are scarcely plentier than the
Hurons
round the lake, and they'd not treat a strong man like
you, as kindly as they treat me.
The ascendency which March had obtained over this
feeble-minded
,
but right-thinking, and right-feeling girl, arose
from a law of nature. Her senses had been captivated by
his personal advantages; and her moral communications
with him had never been sufficiently intimate to counteract
an effect that must have been otherwise lessened, even with
one whose mind was as obtuse as her own. Hetty's instinct
of right, if such a term can be applied to one who seemed
taught by some kind spirit how to steer her course with
unerring
accuracy between good and evil, would have
revolted
at Hurry's character, on a thousand points, had there
been opportunities to enlighten her; but while he conversed
and trifled with her sister, at a distance from herself, his
perfection of form and feature had been left to produce their
influence on her simple imagination, and naturally tender
feelings, without suffering by the alloy of his opinions and
coarseness. It is true, she found him rough and rude; but
her father was that, and most of the other men she had
seen; and that which she believed to belong to all of the sex,
struck her less unfavourably in Hurry's character, than it
might otherwise have done. Still, it was not absolutely love
that Hetty felt for Hurry, nor do we wish so to portray it,
but merely that awakening sensibility and admiration, which,
under more propitious circumstances, and always supposing
no untoward revelations of character, on the part of the
young man, had supervened to prevent it, might soon have
ripened into that engrossing feeling. She felt for him an
incipient tenderness, but scarcely any passion. Perhaps the
nearest approach to the latter that Hetty had manifested,
was to be seen in the sensitiveness which had caused her to
detect March's predilection for her sister; for, among Judith's
many admirers, this was the only instance in which the
dull mind of the girl had been quickened into an
observation
of the circumstance.
Hurry received so little sympathy at his departure, that
the gentle tones of Hetty, as she thus called after him,
sounded
soothingly. He checked the canoe, and with one sweep
of his powerful arm brought it back to the side of the ark.
This was more than Hetty, whose courage had risen with
the departure of her hero, had expected, and she now shrunk
timidly back at his unexpected return.
You're a good gal, Hetty, and I can't quit you without
shaking hands, said March kindly. Judith, after all,
isn't worth as much as you, though she may be a trifle
better-looking
.
As to wits, if honesty and fair-dealing with a
young man is a sign of sense in a young woman, you're
worth a dozen Judiths; ay, and for that matter, most young
women of my acquaintance.
Don't say any thing against Judith, Harry, returned
Hetty imploringly. Father's gone, and mother's gone,
and nobody's left but Judith and me, and it isn't right for
sisters to speak evil, or to hear evil, of each other.
Father's
in the lake, and so is mother, and we should all fear
God, for we don't know when we may be in the lake, too.
That sounds reasonable, child, as does most you say.
Well, if we ever meet ag'in, Hetty, you'd find a fri'nd in
me, let your sister do what she may. I was no great fri'nd
of your mother, I'll allow, for we didn't think alike on most
p'ints; but then your father, Old Tom, and I, fitted each
other as remarkably as a buckskin garment will fit any
reasonable-built
man. I've always been unanimous of opinion
that old Floating Tom Hutter, at the bottom, was a good
fellow, and will maintain that ag'in all inimies for his sake,
as well as for your'n.
Good bye, Hurry, said Hetty, who now wanted to
hasten the young man off, as ardently as she had wished to
keep him only the moment before, though she could give no
clearer account of the latter than of the former feeling;
good bye, Hurry; take care of yourself in the woods;
don't halt till you reach the garrison. I'll read a chapter
in the bible for you, before I go to bed, and think of you in
my prayers.
This was touching a point on which March had no
sympathies
,
and without more words, he shook the girl cordially
by the hand, and re-entered the canoe. In another minute
the two adventurers were a hundred feet from the ark, and
half a dozen had not elapsed before they were completely
12*
lost to view. Hetty sighed deeply, and rejoined her sister
and Hist.
For some time Deerslayer and his companion paddled
ahead in silence. It had been determined to land Hurry at
the precise point where he is represented, in the
commencement
of our tale, as having embarked; not only as a place
little likely to be watched by the Hurons, but because he
was sufficiently familiar with the signs of the woods, at that
spot, to thread his way through them in the dark. Thither,
then, the light craft proceeded, being urged as diligently,
and as swiftly, as two vigorous and skilful canoe-men could
force their little vessel through, or rather
over,
the water.
Less than s quarter of an hour sufficed for the object; and,
at the end of that time, being within the shadows of the
shore, and quite near the point they sought, each ceased his
efforts in order to make their parting communications out
of ear-shot of any straggler who might happen to be in the
neighbourhood.
You will do well to persuade the officers at the garrison
to lead out a party ag'in these vagabonds, as soon as you
git in, Hurry, Deerslayer commenced; and you'll do
better if you volunteer to guide it up yourself. You know
the paths, and the shape of the lake, and the natur' of the
land, and can do it better than a common, gineralizing scout.
Strike at the Huron camp first, and follow the signs that
will then show themselves. A few looks at the hut and the
ark will satisfy you as to the state of the Delaware and the
women; and, at any rate, there'll be a fine opportunity to
fall on the Mingo trail, and to make a mark on the
memories
of the blackguards that they'll be apt to carry with
'em a long time. It won't be likely to make much
difference
with me, since
that
matter will be detarmined afore
to-morrow's
sun has set; but it may make a great change in
Judith and Hetty's hopes and prospects!
And as for yourself, Nathaniel, Hurry inquired with
more interest than he was accustomed to betray in the
welfare
of othersand as for yourself, what do you think is
likely to turn up?
The Lord, in his wisdom, only can tell, Henry March!
The clouds look black and threatening, and I keep my mind
in a state to meet the worst. Vengeful feelin's are
uppermost
in the hearts of the Mingos, and any little
disapp'intment
about the plunder, or the prisoners, or Hist, may make
the torments sartain. The Lord, in his wisdom, can only
detarmine my fate, or your'n!
This is a black business, and ought to be put a stop to,
in some way or other, answered Hurry, confounding the
distinctions between right and wrong, as is usual with selfish
and vulgar men. I heartily wish old Hutter and I had
scalped every creatur' in their camp, the night we first
landed with that capital object! Had you not held back,
Deerslayer, it might have been done; then you wouldn't
have found yourself, at the last moment, in the desperate
condition you mention.
'T would have been better had you said, you wished
you had never attempted to do what it little becomes any
white man's gifts to undertake; in which case, not only
might we have kept from coming to blows, but Thomas
Hutter would now have been living, and the hearts of the
savages would be less given to vengeance. The death of
that young woman, too, was oncalled for, Henry March,
and leaves a heavy load on our names, if not on our
consciences
!
This was so apparent, and it seemed so obvious to Hurry
himself, at the moment, that he dashed his paddle into the
water, and began to urge the canoe towards the shore, as if
bent only on running away from his own lively remorse.
His companion humoured this feverish desire for change,
and, in a minute or two, the bows of the boat grated lightly
on the shingle of the beach. To land, shoulder his pack
and rifle, and to get ready for his march, occupied Hurry
but an instant, and with a growling adieu, he had already
commenced his march, when a sudden twinge of feeling
brought him to a dead stop, and immediately after to the
other's side.
You cannot mean to give yourself up ag'in to them
murdering
savages, Deerslayer! he said, quite as much in angry
remonstrance as with generous feeling. 'T would be the
act of a madman or a fool!
There's them that thinks it madness to keep their
words, and there's them that don't, Hurry Harry. You
may be one of the first, but I'm one of the last. No
red-skin
breathing shall have it in his power to say, that a
Mingo minds his word more than a man of white blood and
white gifts, in any thing that consarns me. I'm out on a
furlough, and if I've strength and reason, I'll go in on a
furlough afore noon to-morrow!
What's an Indian, or a word passed, or a furlough
taken from creatur's like them, that have neither souls, nor
names?
If they've got neither souls nor names, you and I have
both, Harry March, and one is accountable for the other.
This furlough is not, as you seem to think, a matter
altogether
atween me and the Mingos, seeing it is a solemn
bargain
made atween me and God. He who thinks that he can
say what he pleases, in his distress, and that 'twill all pass
for nothing, because 'tis uttered in the forest, and into red
men's ears, knows little of his situation, and hopes, and
wants. The words are said to the ears of the Almighty.
The air is his breath, and the light of the sun is little more
than a glance of his eye. Farewell, Harry; we may not
meet ag'in; but I would wish you never to treat a furlough,
or any other solemn thing, that your Christian God has
been called on to witness, as a duty so light that it may be
forgotten according to the wants of the body, or even
according
to the cravings of the spirit.
March was now glad again to escape. It was quite
impossible
that he could enter into the sentiments that ennobled
his companion, and he broke away from both with an
impatience
that caused him secretly to curse the folly that
could induce a man to rush, as it were, on his own
destruction
.
Deerslayer, on the contrary, manifested no such
excitement
.
Sustained by his principles, inflexible in the
purpose
of acting up to them, and superior to any unmanly
apprehension, he regarded all before him as a matter of
course, and no more thought of making any unworthy
attempt
to avoid it, than a Mussulman thinks of counteracting
the decrees of Providence. He stood calmly on the shore,
listening to the reckless tread with which Hurry betrayed
his progress through the bushes, shook his head in
dissatisfaction
at the want of caution, and then stepped quietly into
his canoe. Before he dropped the paddle again into the
water, the young man gazed about him at the scene
presented
by the star-lit night. This was the spot where he
had first laid his eyes on the beautiful sheet of water on which
he floated. If it was then glorious in the bright light of
summer's
noon-tide, it was now sad and melancholy under the
shadows of night. The mountains rose around it, like black
barriers to exclude the outer world, and the gleams of pale
light that rested on the broader parts of the basin, were no
bad symbols of the faintness of the hopes that were so dimly
visible in his own future. Sighing heavily, he pushed the
canoe from the land, and took his way back, with steady
diligence, towards the ark and the castle.
CHAPTER IX.
Thy secret pleasures turned to open shame;
Thy private feasting to a public fast;
Thy smoothing titles to a ragged name;
Thy sugar'd tongue to bitter wormwood taste;
Thy violent vanities can never last.
Rape of Lucrece
.
Judith
was waiting the return of Deerslayer, on the
platform
,
with stifled impatience, when the latter reached the
hut. Hist and Hetty were both in a deep sleep, on the
bed usually occupied by the two daughters of the house,
and the Delaware was stretched on the floor of the adjoining
room, his rifle at his side, and a blanket over him, already
dreaming of the events of the last few days. There was a
lamp burning in the ark; for the family was accustomed to
indulge in this luxury on extraordinary occasions, and
possessed
the means, the vessel being of a form and material
to render it probable it had once been an occupant of the
chest.
As soon as the girl got a glimpse of the canoe, she ceased
her hurried walk up and down the platform, and stood ready
to receive the young man, whose return she had now been
anxiously expecting for some time. She helped him to
fasten
the canoe, and by aiding in the other little similar
employments
,
manifested her desire to reach a moment of
liberty as soon as possible. When this was done, in
answer
to an inquiry of his, she informed him of the
manner
in which their companions had disposed of themselves.
He listened attentively, for the manner of the girl was so
earnest and impressive as to apprise him that she had
something
on her mind of more than common concern.
And now, Deerslayer, Judith continued, you see I
have lighted the lamp, and put it in the cabin of the ark.
That is never done with us, unless on great occasions, and
I consider this night as the most important of my life. Will
you follow me and see what I have to show youhear what
I have to say?
The hunter was a little surprised; but making no
objections
,
both were soon in the scow, and in the room that
contained
the light. Here two stools were placed at the side of
the chest, with the lamp on another, and a table near by to
receive the different articles as they might be brought to
view. This arrangement had its rise in the feverish
impatience
of the girl, which could brook no delay that it was
in her power to obviate. Even all the padlocks were
removed
,
and it only remained to raise the heavy lid, and
to expose the treasures of this long-secreted hoard.
I see, in part, what all this means, observed
Deerslayer
,
yes, I see through it, in part. But why is not
Hetty present; now Thomas Hutter is gone, she is one of
the owners of these cur'osities, and ought to see them
opened
and handled.
Hetty sleeps, answered Judith, hastily. Happily for
her, fine clothes and riches have no charms. Besides, she
has this night given her share of all that the chest may hold,
to me, that I may do with it as I please.
Is poor Hetty composs enough for that, Judith?
demanded
the just-minded young man. It's a good rule,
and a righteous one, never to take when those that give don't
know the valie of their gifts; and such as God has visited
heavily in their wits, ought to be dealt with as carefully as
children that haven't yet come to their understandings.
Judith was hurt at this rebuke, coming from the person it
did; but she would have felt it far more keenly, had not her
conscience fully acquitted her of any unjust intentions
towards
her feeble-minded, but confiding sister. It was not
a moment, however, to betray any of her usual mountings
of the spirit, and she smothered the passing sensation in the
desire to come to the great object she had in view.
Hetty will not be wronged, she mildly answered; she
even knows not only what I am about to do, Deerslayer,
but
why
I do it. So take your seat, raise the lid of the
chest, and this time we will go to the bottom. I shall be
disappointed
if something is not found to tell us more of the
history of Thomas Hutter and my mother.
Why Thomas Hutter, Judith, and not your father? The
dead ought to meet with as much reverence as the living!
I have long suspected that Thomas Hutter was not
my
father, though I did think he might have been Hetty's; but
now we know he was the father of neither. He
acknowledged
that much in his dying moments. I am old enough
to remember better things than we have seen on this lake,
though they are so faintly impressed on my memory, that
the earlier part of my life seems like a dream.
Dreams are but miserable guides when one has to
detarmine
about realities, Judith, returned the other,
admonishingly
.
Fancy nothing, and hope nothing on their account;
though I've known chiefs that thought 'em useful.
I expect nothing for the future, from them, my good
friend, but cannot help remembering what has been. This
is idle, however, when half an hour of examination may tell
us all, or even more than I want to know.
Deerslayer, who comprehended the girl's impatience, now
took his seat, and proceeded once more to raise the different
articles that the chest contained from their places. As a
matter of course, all that had been previously examined, were
found where they had been last deposited; and they excited
much less interest, or comment, than when formerly exposed
to view. Even Judith laid aside the rich brocade with an
air of indifference, for she had a far higher aim before her,
than the indulgence of vanity, and was impatient to come
at the still hidden, or rather unknown, treasures.
All these we have seen before, she said, and will not
stop to open. The bundle under your hand, Deerslayer, is
a fresh one; that we will look into. God send it may
contain
something to tell poor Hetty and myself, who we really
are!
Ay, if some bundles could speak, they might tell
wonderful
secrets, returned the young man, deliberately
undoing
the folds of another piece of coarse canvass, in order to
come at the contents of the roll that lay on his knees;
though this doesn't seem to be one of that family, seeing't is
neither more nor less than a sort of flag; though of what
nation, it passes my l'arnin' to say.
That flag must have some meaning to it, Judith
hurriedly
interposed. Open it wider, Deerslayer, that we may
see the colours.
Well, I pity the ensign that has to shoulder this cloth,
and to parade it about in the field. Why 't is large enough,
Judith, to make a dozen of them colours the King's officers
set so much store by. These can be no ensign's colours,
but a gineral's!
A ship might carry it, Deerslayer; and ships I know do
use such things. Have you never heard any fearful stories
about Thomas Hutter's having once been concerned with the
people they call buccaneers?
Buck-and-near! Not Inot II never heard him
mentioned
as good at a buck far off, or near by. Hurry Harry
did tell me something about its being supposed that he had
formerly, in some way or other, dealings with sartain
sea-robbers
;
but, Lord, Judith, it can't surely give you any
satisfaction
to make out that ag'in your mother's own husband,
though he isn't your father.
Any thing will give me satisfaction that tells me who I
am, and helps to explain the dreams of childhood. My
mother's husband! Yes, he must have been that, though
why a woman like
her
should have chosen a man like
him,
is more than mortal reason can explain. You never saw
mother, Deerslayer, and can't feel the vast, vast difference
there was between them!
Such things
do
happen, howsever;yes, they
do
happen
;
though why Providence lets them come to pass, is
more than I understand. I've knew the f'ercest warriors
with the gentlest wives of any in the tribe, and awful scolds
fall to the lot of Indians fit to be missionaries.
That was not it, Deerslayer; that was not it. Oh! if it
should prove thatno; I cannot wish she should not have
been his wife at all.
That
no daughter can wish for her
own mother! Go on, now, and let us see what the
square-looking
bundle holds.
Deerslayer complied, and he found that it contained a
small trunk of pretty workmanship, but fastened. The next
point was to find a key; but search proving ineffectual, it
was determined to force the lock. This Deerslayer soon
effected by the aid of an iron instrument, and it was found
that the interior was nearly filled with papers. Many were
letters; some fragments of manuscripts, memorandums,
accounts, and other similar documents. The hawk does not
pounce upon the chicken with a more sudden swoop, than
Judith
sprang forward to seize this mine of hitherto concealed
knowledge. Her education, as the reader will have
perceived
,
was far superior to her situation in life, and her eye
glanced over page after page of the letters, with a readiness
that her schooling supplied, and with an avidity that found
its origin in her feelings. At first, it was evident that the
girl was gratified, and, we may add, with reason; for the
letters, written by females, in innocence and affection, were
of a character to cause her to feel proud of those with whom
she had every reason to think she was closely connected by
the ties of blood. It does not come within the scope of our
plan to give more of these epistles, however, than a general
idea of their contents, and this will best be done by
describing
the effect they produced on the manner, appearance,
and feeling of her who was so eagerly perusing them.
It has been said, already, that Judith was much gratified
with the letters that first met her eye. They contained the
correspondence of an affectionate and intelligent mother to
an absent daughter, with such allusions to the answers as
served, in a great measure, to fill up the vacuum left by the
replies. They were not without admonitions and warnings,
however, and Judith felt the blood mounting to her temples,
and a cold shudder succeeding, as she read one in which
the propriety of the daughter's indulging in as much
intimacy
,
as had evidently been described in one of the
daughter's
own letters, with an officer who came from Europe,
and who could hardly be supposed to wish to form an
honourable
connection in America, was rather coldly
commented
Vol. II.13
on by the mother. What rendered it singular, was
the fact that the signatures had been carefully cut from
every one of these letters, and wherever a name occurred
in the body of the epistles, it had been erased with so much
diligence as to render it impossible to read it. They had
all been enclosed in envelopes, according to the fashion of
the age, and not an address either was to be found. Still,
the letters themselves had been religiously preserved, and
Judith thought she could discover traces of tears remaining
on several. She now remembered to have seen the little
trunk in her mother's keeping, previously to her death, and
she supposed it had first been deposited in the chest, along
with the other forgotten, or concealed objects, when the
letters
could no longer contribute to that parent's grief or
happiness
.
Next came another bundle, and these were filled with the
protestations of love, written with passion certainly, but also
with that deceit which men so often think it justifiable to
use to the other sex. Judith had shed tears abundantly over
the first packet, but now she felt a sentiment of indignation
and pride better sustaining her. Her hand shook, however,
and cold shivers again passed through her frame, as she
discovered a few points of strong resemblance between these
letters and some it had been her own fate to receive. Once,
indeed, she laid the packet down, bowed her head to her
knees, and seemed nearly convulsed. All this time,
Deerslayer
sat a silent, but attentive observer of every thing that
passed. As Judith read a letter, she put it into his hands
to hold, until she could peruse the next; but this seemed in
no degree to enlighten her companion, as he was totally
unable
to read. Nevertheless, he was not entirely at fault in
discovering the passions that were contending in the bosom
of the fair creature by his side, and, as occasional sentences
escaped her in murmurs, he was nearer the truth, in his
divinations, or conjectures, than the girl would have been
pleased at discovering.
Judith had commenced with the earliest letters, luckily for
a ready comprehension of the tale they told; for they were
carefully arranged in chronological order, and, to any one
who would take the trouble to peruse them, would have
revealed a sad history of gratified passion, coldness, and,
finally, of aversion. As she obtained the clue to their
import
,
her impatience could not admit of delay, and she soon
got to glancing her eyes over a page, by way of coming at
the truth in the briefest manner possible. By adopting this
expedient, one to which all who are eager to arrive at
results
,
without encumbering themselves with details, are so
apt to resort, Judith made a rapid progress in this
melancholy
revelation of her mother's failings and punishment.
She saw that the period of her own birth was distinctly
referred
to, and even learned that the homely name she bore
was given her by the father of whose person she retained so
faint an impression as to resemble a dream. This name
was not obliterated from the text of the letters, but stood as
if nothing was to be gained by erasing it. Hetty's birth
was mentioned once, and in that instance the name was the
mother's; but ere this period was reached came the signs
of coldness, shadowing forth the desertion that was so soon
to follow. It was in this stage of the correspondence that
her mother had recourse to the plan of copying her own
epistles. They were but few, but were eloquent with the
feelings of blighted affection, and contrition. Judith sobbed
over them, until again and again she felt compelled to lay
them aside, from sheer physical inability to see, her eyes
being literally obscured with tears. Still she returned to
the task, with increasing interest, and finally succeeded in
reaching the end of the latest communication that had
probably
ever passed between her parents.
All this occupied fully an hour; for near a hundred
letters
were glanced at, and some twenty had been closely
read. The truth now shone clear upon the acute mind of
Judith, so far as her own birth and that of Hetty were
concerned
.
She sickened at the conviction, and, for the
moment
,
the rest of the world seemed to be cut off from her,
and she had now additional reasons for wishing to pass the
remainder of her life on the lake, where she had already
seen so many bright and so many sorrowing days.
There yet remained more letters to examine. Judith
found these were a correspondence between her mother and
Thomas Hovey. The originals of both parties were
carefully
arranged, letter and answer, side by side; and they
told the early history of the connection between the
ill-assorted
pair far more plainly than Judith wished to learn it.
Her mother made the advances towards a marriage, to the
surprise, not to say horror, of her daughter; and she
actually
found a relief when she discovered traces of what struck
her as insanity, or a morbid disposition, bordering on that
dire calamity, in the earlier letters of that ill-fated woman.
The answers of Hovey were coarse and illiterate, though
they manifested a sufficient desire to obtain the hand of a
woman of singular personal attractions, and whose great
error he was willing to overlook, for the advantage of
possessing
one, every way so much his superior, and who, it
also appeared, was not altogether destitute of money. The
remainder of this part of the correspondence was brief; and
it was soon confined to a few communications on business,
in which the miserable wife hastened the absent husband
in his preparations to abandon a world which there was
sufficient reason to think was as dangerous to one of the
parties as it was disagreeable to the other. But a single
expression
had escaped her mother, by which Judith could get
a clue to the motives that had induced her to marry Hovey,
or Hutter; and this she found was that feeling of resentment
which so often tempts the injured to inflict wrongs on
themselves
,
by way of heaping coals on the heads of those
through whom they have suffered. Judith had enough of
the spirit of that mother to comprehend this sentiment, and
for a moment did she see the exceeding folly which
permitted
such revengeful feelings to get the ascendency.
There, what may be called the historical part of the
papers
ceased. Among the loose fragments, however, was an
old newspaper that contained a proclamation offering a
reward
for the apprehension of certain freebooters by name,
among which was that of Thomas Hovey. The attention
of the girl was drawn to the proclamation and to this
particular
name, by the circumstance that black lines had been
drawn under both, in ink. Nothing else was found among
the papers that could lead to a discovery of either the name
or the place of residence of the wife of Hutter. All the
dates, signatures, and addresses, had been cut from the
letters
,
and wherever a word occurred in the body of the
communications
,
that might furnish a clue, it was scrupulously
erased. Thus Judith found all her hopes of ascertaining
who her parents were, defeated, and she was obliged to fall
back on her own resources and habits for every thing
connected
with the future. Her recollection of her mother's
manners, conversation, and sufferings, filled up many a gap
in the historical facts she had now discovered; and the truth,
in its outlines, stood sufficiently distinct before her, to take
away all desire, indeed, to possess any more details.
Throwing
herself back in her seat, she simply desired her
companion
to finish the examination of the other articles in the
chest, as it might yet contain something of importance.
I'll do it, Judith; I'll do it, returned the patient
Deerslayer
;
but if there's many more letters to read, we shall
see the sun ag'in, afore you've got through with the
reading
of them! Two good hours have you been looking at
them bits of papers!
They tell me of my parents, Deerslayer, and have
settled
my plans for life. A girl may be excused who reads
about her
own
father and mother, and that too for the first
time in her life. I am sorry to have kept you waiting.
Never mind me, gal; never mind me. It matters little
whether I sleep or watch; but, though you be pleasant to
look at, and are so handsome, Judith, it is not altogether
agreeable to sit so long to behold you shedding tears. I
know that tears don't kill, and that some people are better
for shedding a few, now and then, especially women; but
I'd rather see you smile, at any time, Judith, than see you
weep.
This gallant speech was rewarded with a sweet, though
a melancholy smile; and then the girl again desired her
companion to finish the examination of the chest. The
search necessarily continued some time, during which
Judith
collected her thoughts, and regained her composure.
She took no part in the search, leaving every thing to the
young man, looking listlessly, herself, at the different
articles
that came uppermost. Nothing further of much
interest
,
or value, however, was found. A sword or two, such
as were then worn by gentlemen, some buckles of silver,
or so richly plated as to appear silver, and a few handsome
articles of female dress, composed the principal discoveries.
It struck both Judith and the Deerslayer, notwithstanding,
that some of these things might be made useful in effecting a
13*
negotiation with the Iroquois, though the latter saw a
difficulty
in the way that was not so apparent to the former.
The conversation was first renewed in connection with this
point.
And now, Deerslayer, said Judith, we may talk of
yourself, and of the means of getting you out of the hands
of the Hurons. Any part, or all of what you have seen in
the chest, will be cheerfully given by me and Hetty, to set
you at liberty.
Well, that's ginerousyes, 't is downright free-hearted,
and free-handed, and ginerous. This is the way with
women
;
when they take up a fri'ndship, they do nothing by
halves, but are as willing to part with their property, as if
it had no valie in their eyes. Howsever, while I thank
you both, just as much as if the bargain was made, and
Rivenoak, or any of the other vagabonds, was here to
accept
and close the treaty, there's two principal reasons why
it can never come to pass, which may be as well told at
once, in order no onlikely expectations may be raised in
you, or any onjustifiable hopes in me.
What reason
can
there be, if Hetty and I are willing
to part with the trifles for your sake, and the savages are
willing to receive them?
That's it, Judithyou've got the idees, but they're a
little out of their places, as if a hound should take the
back'ard instead of the leading scent. That the Mingos
will be willing to receive these things, or any more like 'em,
you may have to offer, is probable enough; but whether
they'll pay valie for 'em, is quite another matter. Ask
yourself, Judith, if any one should send you a message to
say that, for such or such a price, you and Hetty might
have that chist and all it holds, whether you'd think it worth
your while to waste many words on the bargain?
But this chest and all it holds, are already ours; there
is no reason why we should purchase what is already our
own.
Just so the Mingos calculate! They say the chist is
theirs already; or, as good as theirs, and they'll not thank
anybody for the key.
I understand you, Deerslayer; surely we are yet in
possession
of the lake, and we can keep possession of it, until
Hurry sends troops to drive off the enemy. This we may
certainly do, provided you will stay with us, instead of going
back and giving yourself up a prisoner, again, as you now
seem determined on.
That Hurry Harry should talk in this way, is nat'ral,
and according to the gifts of the man. He knows no better,
and therefore, he is little likely to feel, or to act any better;
but, Judith, I put it to your heart and conscience,would
you,
could
you think of me as favourably, as I hope and
believe you now do, was I to forget my furlough and not go
back to the camp?
To think
more
favourably of you than I now do,
Deerslayer
,
would not be easy; but I might continue to think
as
favourablyat least it seems soI hope I could; for a
world wouldn't tempt me to let you do any thing that might
change my real opinion of you.
Then don't try to entice me to overlook my furlough,
gal! A furlough is a sacred thing among warriors, and men
that carry their lives in their hands, as we of the forests do;
and what a grievous disapp'intment would it be to old
Tamenund, and to Uncas, the father of the Sarpent, and to
my other fri'nds in the tribe, if I was so to disgrace myself,
on my very first war-path? This you will pairceive,
moreover
,
Judith, is without laying any stress on nat'ral gifts,
and a white man's duties, to say nothing of conscience. The
last is king with me, and I try never to dispute his orders.
I believe you are right, Deerslayer, returned the girl,
after a little reflection, and in a saddened voice; a man
like
you,
ought not to act, as the selfish and dishonest would
be apt to act;
you
must, indeed, go back. We will talk no
more of this, then; should I persuade you to any thing for
which you would be sorry hereafter, my own regret would
not be less than yours. You shall not have it to say,
Judith
I
scarce know by what name to call myself,
now!
And why not?why not, gal? Children take the names
of their parents, nat'rally, and by a sort of gift, like; and
why shouldn't you and Hetty do, as others have done afore
ye? Hutter was the old man's name, and Hutter should be
the name of his darters;at least until you are given away
in lawful and holy wedlock.
I am Judith, and Judith only, returned the girl,
positively
;
until the law gives me a right to another name.
Never will I use that of Thomas Hutter again; nor, with
my consent, shall Hetty! Hutter was not his own name, I
find; but had he a thousand rights to it, it would give none
to me.
He
was not my father, thank heaven; though I
may have no reason to be proud of him that
was!
This is strange, said Deerslayer, looking steadily at
the excited girl, anxious to know more, but unwilling to
inquire into matters that did not properly concern him;
yes, this is very strange and oncommon! Thomas Hutter
wasn't Thomas Hutter, and his darters weren't his darters!
Who, then, could Thomas Hutter be, and who are his
darters
?
Did you never hear any thing whispered against the
former life of this person, Deerslayer? demanded Judith.
Passing, as I did, for his child, such reports reached even
me.
I'll not deny it, Judith; no, I'll not deny it. Sartain
things have been said, as I've told you; but I'm not very
credible as to reports. Young as I am, I've lived long
enough to l'arn there's two sorts of characters in the
world. Them that is 'arned by deeds, and them that is
'arned by tongues; and so I prefer to see and judge for
myself
,
instead of letting every jaw that chooses to wag
become
my judge. Hurry Harry spoke pretty plainly of the
whole family, as we journeyed this-a-way; and he did hint
something consarning Thomas Hutter's having been a
free-liver
on the water, in his younger days. By free-liver, I
mean that he made free to live on other men's goods.
He told you he was a piratethere is no need of
mincing
matters between friends. Read that, Deerslayer, and
you will see that he told you no more than the truth.
This Thomas Hovey was the Thomas Hutter you knew, as
is seen by these letters.
As Judith spoke, with a flushed cheek and eyes
dazzling
with the brilliancy of excitement, she held the
newspaper
towards her companion, pointing to the proclamation
of a Colonial governor, already mentioned.
Bless you, Judith! answered the other, laughing; you
might as well ask me to print thator, for that matter, to
write it. My edication has been altogether in the woods;
the only book I read, or care about reading, is the one
which God has opened afore all his creatur's, in the noble
forests, broad lakes, rolling rivers, blue skies, and the winds,
and tempests, and sunshine, and other glorious marvels of
the land! This book I can read, and I find it full of
wisdom
and knowledge.
I crave your pardon, Deerslayer, said Judith, earnestly,
more abashed than was her wont, in finding that she had,
inadvertently, made an appeal that might wound her
companion's
pride. I had forgotten your manner of life, and
least of all did I wish to hurt your feelings.
Hurt my feelin's!why should it hurt my feelin's to
ask me to read, when I can't read? I'm a hunterand I
may now begin to say a warrior, and no missionary; and,
therefore, books and papers are of no account with such as I.
No, no, Judith, and here the young man laughed cordially;
not even for wads, seeing that your true deerkiller always
uses the hide of a fa'an, if he's got one, or some other bit of
leather suitably prepared. There's some that
do
say, all
that stands in print is true; in which case, I'll own an
unl'arned
man must be somewhat of a loser; nevertheless, it
can't be truer than that which God has printed with his own
hand, in the sky, and the woods, and the rivers, and the
springs.
Well, then, Hutter, or Hovey, was a pirate; and being
no father of mine, I cannot wish to call him one. His name
shall no longer be my name.
If you dislike the name of that man, there's the name
of your mother, Judith. Her name may serve you just as
good a turn.
I do not know it. I've looked through those papers,
Deerslayer, in the hope of finding some hint by which I
might discover who my mother was; but there is no more
trace of the past, in that respect, than the bird leaves in the
air by its flight.
That's both oncommon, and onreasonable. Parents
are bound to give their offspring a name, even though they
give 'em nothing else. Now, I come of a humble stock,
though we have white gifts and a white natur'; but we are
not so poorly off, as to have no name. Bumppo we are
called, and I've heard it said, a touch of human vanity
glowing on his cheek, that the time has been when the
Bumppos had more standing and note among mankind than
they have just now.
They never deserved them more, Deerslayer, and the
name is a good one; either Hetty, or myself, would a
thousand
times rather be called Hetty Bumppo, or Judith
Bumppo
,
than to be called Hetty or Judith Hutter.
That's a moral impossible, returned the hunter,
good-humouredly
,
unless one of you should so far demean
herself as to marry me.
Judith could not refrain from smiling, when she found
how simply and naturally the conversation had come round
to the very point at which she had aimed to bring it.
Although
far from unfeminine or forward, in either her
feelings
or her habits, the girl was goaded by a sense of wrongs
not altogether merited, incited by the helplessness of a future
that seemed to contain no resting-place, and still more
influenced
by feelings that were as novel to her, as they
proved to be active and engrossing. The opening was too
good, therefore, to be neglected, though she came to the
subject
with much of the indirectness and, perhaps, justifiable,
address of a woman.
I do not think Hetty will ever marry, Deerslayer, she
said; if your name is to be borne by either of us, it must
be borne by me.
There's been handsome women, too, they tell me,
among the Bumppos, Judith, afore now; and should you
take up with the name, oncommon as you be, in this
particular
,
them that knows the family won't be altogether
surprised
.
This is not talking as becomes either of us, Deerslayer;
for whatever is said on such a subject, between man and
woman, should be said seriously, and in sincerity of heart.
Forgetting the shame that ought to keep girls silent, until
spoken to, in most cases, I will deal with you as frankly as
I know one of your generous nature will most like to be
dealt by. Can youdo you think, Deerslayer, that you
could be happy with such a wife as a woman like myself
would make?
A woman like you, Judith! But where's the sense in
trifling about such a thing? A woman like you, that is
handsome enough to be a captain's lady, and fine enough,
and, so far as I know, edication enough, would be little apt
to think of becoming my wife. I suppose young gals that
feel themselves to be smart, and know themselves to be
handsome, find a sartain satisfaction in passing their jokes
ag'in them that's neither, like a poor Delaware hunter.
This was said good-naturedly, but not without a betrayal
of feeling which showed that something like mortified
sensibility
was blended with the reply. Nothing could have
occurred more likely to awaken all Judith's generous
regrets
,
or to aid her in her purpose, by adding the stimulant
of a disinterested desire to atone, to her other impulses, and
clothing all under a guise so winning and natural, as greatly
to lessen the unpleasant feature of a forwardness
unbecoming
the sex.
You do me injustice if you suppose I have any such
thought, or wish, she answered, earnestly. Never was
I more serious in my life, or more willing to abide by any
agreement that we may make to-night. I have had many
suitors, Deerslayernay, scarce, an unmarried trapper or
hunter has been in at the lake these four years, who has
not offered to take me away with him, and I fear some that
were married, too
Ay, I'll warrant that! interrupted the otherI'll
warrant all that! Take 'em as a body, Judith, 'arth don't
hold a set of men more given to theirselves, and less given
to God and the law.
Not one of them would Icould I listen to; happily for
myself, perhaps, has it been that such was the case. There
have been well-looking youths among them, too, as you
may have seen in your acquaintance, Henry March.
Yes, Harry is sightly to the eye, though, to my idees,
less so to the judgment. I thought, at first, you meant to
have him, Judith, I did; but, afore he went, it was easy
enough to verify that the same lodge wouldn't be big enough
for you both.
You have done me justice in that at least, Deerslayer.
Hurry is a man I could never marry, though he were ten
times more comely to the eye, and a hundred times more
stout of heart, than he really is.
Why not, Judithwhy not? I own I'm cur'ous to
know why a youth like Hurry shouldn't find favour with a
maiden like you?
Then you shall know, Deerslayer, returned the girl,
gladly availing herself of the opportunity of extolling the
qualities which had so strongly interested her in her listener;
hoping by these means covertly to approach the subject
nearest her heart. In the first place, looks in a man are
of no importance with a woman, provided he is manly, and
not disfigured, or deformed.
There I can't altogether agree with you, returned the
other, thoughtfully, for he had a very humble opinion of his
own personal appearance; I have noticed that the comeliest
warriors commonly get the best-looking maidens of the tribe
for wives; and the Sarpent, yonder, who is sometimes
wonderful
in his paint, is a gineral favourite with all the
Delaware
young women, though he takes to Hist, himself, as if
she was the only beauty on 'arth!
It may be so with Indians, but it is different with white
girls. So long as a young man has a straight and manly
frame, that promises to make him able to protect a woman,
and to keep want from the door, it is all they ask of the
figure. Giants like Hurry may do for grenadiers, but are
of little account as lovers. Then as to the face, an honest
look, one that answers for the heart within, is of more value
than any shape or colour, or eyes, or teeth, or trifles like
them. The last may do for girls, but who thinks of them
at all, in a hunter, or a warrior, or a husband! If there
are women so silly, Judith's not among them.
Well, this is wonderful! I always thought that
handsome
liked handsome, as riches love riches!
It may be so with you men, Deerslayer, but it is not
always so with us women. We like stout-hearted men, but
we wish to see them modest; sure on a hunt, or the
warpath
,
ready to die for the right, and unwilling to yield to
the wrong. Above all, we wish for honestytongues that
are not used to say what the mind does not mean, and hearts
that feel a little for others, as well as for themselves. A
true-hearted girl could die for such a husband! while the
boaster, and the double-tongued suitor, gets to be as hateful
to the sight, as he is to the mind.
Judith spoke bitterly, and with her usual force, but her
listener was too much struck with the novelty of the
sensations
he experienced to advert to her manner. There was
something so soothing to the humility of a man of his
temperament
,
to hear qualities that he could not but know he
possessed himself, thus highly extolled by the loveliest female
he had ever beheld, that, for the moment, his faculties
seemed suspended in a natural and excusable pride. Then
it was that the idea of the possibility of such a creature as
Judith becoming his companion for life, first crossed his
mind. The image was so pleasant, and so novel, that he
continued completely absorbed by it, for more than a minute,
totally regardless of the beautiful reality that was seated
before
him, watching the expression of his upright and truth
telling countenance with a keenness that gave her a very
fair, if not an absolutely accurate clue to his thoughts.
Never before had so pleasing a vision floated before the
mind's-eye of the young hunter; but, accustomed most to
practical things, and little addicted to submitting to the
power of his imagination, even while possessed of so much
true poetical feeling in connection with natural objects in
particular, he soon recovered his reason, and smiled at his
own weakness, as the fancied picture faded from his mental
sight, and left him the simple, untaught, but highly moral
being he was, seated in the ark of Thomas Hutter, at
midnight
,
with the lovely countenance of its late owner's reputed
daughter, beaming on him with anxious scrutiny, by the
light of the solitary lamp.
You're wonderful handsome, and enticing, and
pleasing
to look on, Judith! he exclaimed, in his simplicity, as
fact resumed its ascendency over fancy. Wonderful! I
don't remember ever to have seen so beautiful a gal, even
among the Delawares; and I'm not astonished that Hurry
Harry went away soured as well as disapp'inted!
Would you have had me, Deerslayer, become the wife
of such a man as Henry March?
There's that which is in his favour, and there's that
which is ag'in him. To my taste, Hurry wouldn't make the
best of husbands, but I fear that the tastes of most young
women, hereaway, wouldn't be so hard upon him.
NonoJudith without a name, would never consent
Vol. II.14
to be called Judith March! Any thing would be better than
that
.
Judith Bumppo wouldn't sound as well, gal; and there's
many names that would fall short of March, in pleasing the
ear.
Ah! Deerslayer, the pleasantness of the sound, in such
cases, does not come through the ear, but through the heart.
Every thing is agreeable when the heart is satisfied. Were
Natty Bumppo, Henry March, and Henry March, Natty
Bumppo, I might think the name of March better than it is;
or were he, you, I should fancy the name of Bumppo
horrible
!
That's just ityes, that's the reason of the matter.
Now, I'm nat'rally avarse to sarpents, and I hate even the
word, which, the missionaries tell me, comes from human
natur', on account of a sartain sarpent at the creation of
the 'arth, that outwitted the first woman; yet, ever since
Chingachgook has 'arned the title he bears, why the sound
is as pleasant to my ears as the whistle of the
whip-poor-will
of a calm evening,it is. The feelin's make all the
difference in the world, Judith, in the natur' of sounds; ay,
even in that of looks, too.
This is so true, Deerslayer, that I am surprised you
should think it remarkable a girl, who may have some
comeliness herself, should not think it necessary that her
husband should have the same advantage, or what you fancy
an advantage. To me, looks in a man are nothing,
provided
his countenance be as honest as his heart.
Yes, honesty is a great advantage, in the long-run; and
they that are the most apt to forget it, in the beginning, are
the most apt to I'arn it in the end. Nevertheless, there's
more, Judith, that look to present profit than to the benefit
that is to come after a time. One they think a sartainty,
and the other an onsartainty. I'm glad, howsever, that
you
look at the thing in its true light, and not in the way
in which so many is apt to deceive themselves.
I do thus look at it, Deerslayer, returned the girl with
emphasis, still shrinking with a woman's sensitiveness from
a direct offer of her hand, and can say, from the bottom
of my heart, that I would rather trust my happiness to a
man whose truth and feelings may be depended on, than to
a false-tongued and false-hearted wretch that had chests of
gold, and houses and landsyes, though he were even
seated
on a throne!
These are brave words, Judith; they're downright
brave words; but do you think that the feelin's would keep
'em company, did the ch'ice actually lie afore you? If a gay
gallant in a scarlet coat stood on one side, with his head
smelling like a deer's foot, his face smooth and blooming as
your own, his hands as white and soft as if God hadn't
bestowed
'em that man might live by the sweat of his brow,
and his step as lofty as dancing-teachers and a light heart
could make it; and on the other side stood one that has
passed his days in the open air 'till his forehead is as red as
his cheek; had cut his way through swamps and bushes
till his hand was as rugged as the oaks he slept under; had
trodden on the scent of game 'till his step was as stealthy
as the catamount's, and had no other pleasant odour about
him than such as natur' gives in the free air and the forest
now, if both these men stood here, as suitors for your
feelin's, which do you think would win your favour?
Judith's fine face flushed; for the picture that her
companion
had so simply drawn of a gay officer of the garrisons
had once been particularly grateful to her imagination, though
experience and disappointment had not only chilled all her
affections, but given them a backward current, and the
passing
image had a momentary influence on her feelings; but
the mounting colour was succeeded by a paleness, so deadly
as to make her appear ghastly.
As God is my judge, the girl solemnly answered, did
both these men stand before me, as I may say one of them
does, my choice, if I know my own heart, would be the
latter
.
I have no wish for a husband who is any way better
than myself.
This is pleasant to listen to, and might lead a young
man, in time, to forget his own onworthiness, Judith!
However, you hardly think all that you say. A man like
me is too rude and ignorant for one that has had such a
mother to teach her; vanity is nat'ral, I do believe; but
vanity like that would surpass reason!
Then you do not know of what a woman's heart is
capable
!
Rude
you
are not, Deerslayer; nor can one be
called ignorant that has studied what is before his eyes as
closely as you have done. When the affections are
concerned
,
all things appear in their pleasantest colours, and
trifles are overlooked, or are forgotten. When the heart
feels a sunshine, nothing is gloomy, even dull-looking
objects
seeming gay and bright; and so it would be between
you and the woman who should love you, even though your
wife might happen, in some matters, to possess what the
world calls the advantage over you.
Judith, you come of people altogether above mine, in the
world; and onequal matches, like onequal fri'ndships, can't
often tarminate kindly. I speak of this matter altogether as
a fanciful thing, since it's not very likely that
you,
at least,
would be able to treat it as a matter that can ever come to
pass.
Judith fastened her deep blue eyes on the open, frank
countenance of her companion, as if she would read his
soul. Nothing there betrayed any covert meaning, and she
was obliged to admit to herself that he regarded the
conversation
as argumentative, rather than positive, and that he
was still without any active suspicion that her feelings were
seriously involved in the issue. At first she felt offended;
then she saw the injustice of making the self-abasement and
modesty of the hunter a charge against him; and this novel
difficulty gave a piquancy to the state of affairs that rather
increased her interest in the young man. At that critical
instant, a change of plan flashed on her mind, and, with a
readiness of invention that is peculiar to the quick-witted
and ingenious, she adopted a scheme by which she hoped
effectually to bind him to her person. This scheme partook
equally of her fertility of invention, and of the decision and
boldness of her character. That the conversation might not
terminate too abruptly, however, or any suspicion of her
design
exist, she answered the last remark of Deerslayer as
earnestly and as truly as if her original intention remained
unaltered.
I, certainly, have no reason to boast of parentage, after
what I have seen this night, said the girl, in a saddened
voice. I had a mother, it is true; but of her name, even,
I am ignorant: and as for my father, it is better, perhaps,
that I should never know who he was, lest I speak too
bitterly
of him!
Judith, said Deerslayer, taking her hand kindly, and
with a manly sincerity that went directly to the girl's heart,
'tis better to say no more to-night. Sleep on what you've
seen and felt; in the morning, things that now look gloomy
may look more cheerful. Above all, never do any thing in
bitterness, or because you feel as if you'd like to take
revenge
on yourself for other people's backslidings. All that
has been said or done atween us, this night, is your secret,
and shall never be talked of by me, even with the Sarpent;
and you may be sartain if he can't get it out of me, no man
can. If your parents have been faulty, let the darter be less
so; remember that you're young, and the youthful may
always
hope for better times; that you're more quick-witted
than usual, and such ginerally get the better of difficulties;
and that as for beauty, you're oncommon; this is an
advantage
with all. It is time to get a little rest, for to-morrow is
like to prove a trying day to some of us.
Deerslayer arose as he spoke, and Judith had no choice
but to comply. The chest was closed and secured, and they
parted in silence; she to take her place by the side of Hist
and Hetty, and he to seek a blanket on the floor of the
cabin he was in. It was not five minutes ere the young man
was in a deep sleep; but the girl continued awake for a long
time. She scarce knew whether to lament, or to rejoice, at
having failed in making herself understood. On the one
hand, were her womanly sensibilities spared; on the other,
was the disappointment of defeated, or at least of delayed
expectations, and the uncertainty of a future that looked so
dark. Then came the new resolution, and the bold project
for the morrow; and when drowsiness finally shut her eyes,
they closed on a scene of success and happiness, that was
pictured by the fancy, under the influence of a sanguine
temperament and a happy invention.
14*
CHAPTER X.
But, mother, now a shade has past
Athwart my brightest visions here,
A cloud of darkest gloom has wrapt
The remnant of my brief career!
No song, no echo can I win;
The sparkling fount has dried within.
Margaret Davidson
.
Hist
and Hetty arose with the return of light, leaving
Judith still buried in sleep. It took but a minute for the
first to complete her toilet. Her long coal-black hair was
soon adjusted in a simple knot, the calico dress belted tight
to her slender waist, and her little feet concealed in their
gaudily-ornamented moccasins. When attired, she left her
companion employed in household affairs, and went herself
on the platform, to breathe the pure air of the morning.
Here she found Chingachgook studying the shores of the
lake, the mountains, and the heavens, with the sagacity of
a man of the woods, and the gravity of an Indian.
The meeting between the lovers was simple, but
affectionate
.
The chief showed a manly kindness, equally
removed
from boyish weakness and haste; while the girl
betrayed in her smile and half-averted looks, the bashful
tenderness of her sex. Neither spoke, unless it were with
the eyes, though each understood the other as fully as if a
vocabulary of words and protestations had been poured out.
Hist seldom appeared to more advantage than at that
moment
;
for, just from her rest and ablutions, there was a
freshness about her youthful form and face, that the toils of
the wood do not always permit to be exhibited, by even the
juvenile and pretty. Then Judith had not only imparted
some of her own skill in the toilet, during their short
intercourse
,
but she had actually bestowed a few well-selected
ornaments from her own stores, that contributed not a little
to set off the natural graces of the Indian maid. All this
the lover saw and felt, and for a moment his countenance
was illuminated with a look of pleasure; but it soon grew
grave, again, and became saddened and anxious. The
stools used the previous night were still standing on the
platform; placing two against the walls of the hut, he
seated himself on one, making a gesture to his companion
to take the other. This done, he continued thoughtful and
silent, for quite a minute, maintaining the reflecting dignity
of one born to take his seat at the council-fire, while Hist
was furtively watching the expression of his face, patient
and submissive, as became a woman of her people. Then
the young warrior stretched his arm before him, as if to
point out the glories of the scene at that witching hour,
when the whole panorama, as usual, was adorned by the
mellow distinctness of early morning, sweeping with his
hand slowly over lake, hills and heavens. The girl
followed
the movement with pleased wonder, smiling as each new
beauty met her gaze.
Hugh! exclaimed the chief, in admiration of a scene
so unusual even to him, for this was the first lake he had
ever beheld. This is the country of the Manitou! It is
too good for Mingos, Hist; but the curs of that tribe are
howling in packs through the woods. They think that the
Delawares are asleep, over the mountains.
All but one of them is, Chingachgook. There is one
here; and he is of the blood of Uncas!
What is one warrior against a tribe?The path to our
villages is very long and crooked, and we shall travel it
under a cloudy sky. I am afraid, too, Honeysuckle of the
Hills, that we shall travel it alone!
Hist understood the allusion, and it made her sad; though
it sounded sweet to her ears to be compared, by the warrior
she so loved, to the most fragrant, and the pleasantest of all
the wild-flowers of her native woods. Still she continued
silent
,
as became her when the allusion was to a grave interest
that men could best control, though it exceeded the power of
education to conceal the smile that gratified feeling brought
to her pretty mouth.
When the sun is thus, continued the Delaware,
pointing
to the zenith, by simply casting upward a hand and
finger, by a play of the wrist, the great hunter of our tribe
will go back to the Hurons, to be treated like a bear, that
they roast and skin, even on full stomachs.
The Great Spirit may soften their hearts, and not suffer
them to be so bloody-minded. I have lived among the
Hurons
,
and know them. They have hearts, and will not
forget
their own children, should they fall into the hands of
the Delawares.
A wolf is for ever howling; a hog will always eat.
They have lost warriors; even their women will call out
for vengeance. The pale-face has the eyes of an eagle, and
can see into a Mingo's heart; he looks for no mercy. There
is a cloud over his spirit, though it is not before his face.
A long, thoughtful pause succeeded, during which Hist
stealthily took the hand of the chief, as if seeking his
support
,
though she scarce ventured to raise her eyes to a
countenance
that was now literally becoming terrible, under the
conflicting passions, and stern resolution that were
struggling
in the breast of its owner.
What will the Son of Uncas do? the girl at length
timidly asked. He is a chief, and is already celebrated
in council, though so young; what does his heart tell him
is wisest; does the head, too, speak the same words as the
heart?
What does Wah-ta!-Wah say, at a moment when my
dearest friend is in such danger. The smallest birds sing
the sweetest; it is always pleasant to hearken to their songs.
I wish I could hear the Wren of the Woods in my difficulty;
its note would reach deeper than the ear.
Again Hist experienced the profound gratification that the
language of praise can always awaken, when uttered by
those we love. The Honeysuckle of the Hills was a
term often applied to the girl, by the young men of the
Delawares, though it never sounded so sweet in her ears, as
from the lips of Chingachgook; but the latter alone had ever
styled her the Wren of the Woods. With him, however, it
had got to be a familiar phrase, and it was past expression
pleasant to the listener, since it conveyed to her mind the
idea that her advice and sentiments were as acceptable to
her future husband, as the tones of her voice and modes of
conveying them were agreeable; uniting the two things most
prized by an Indian girl, as coming from her betrothed,
admiration
for a valued physical advantage, with respect for her
opinion. She pressed the hand she held between both her
own, and answered
Wah-ta!-Wah says that neither she nor the Great
Serpent
could ever laugh again, or ever sleep without dreaming
of the Hurons, should the Deerslayer die under a Mingo
tomahawk, and they do nothing to save him. She would
rather go back, and start on her long path alone, than let
such a dark cloud pass before her happiness.
Good! The husband and the wife will have but one heart;
they will see with the same eyes, and feel with the same
feelings.
What further was said, need not be related here. That
the conversation was of Deerslayer, and his hopes, has been
seen already, but the decision that was come to, will better
appear in the course of the narrative. The youthful pair
were yet conversing when the sun appeared above the tops
of the pines, and the light of a brilliant American day
streamed down into the valley, bathing in deep joy the
lake, the forests and the mountain sides. Just at this instant
Deerslayer came out of the cabin of the ark, and stepped
upon the platform. His first look was at the cloudless
heavens
,
then his rapid glance took in the entire panorama of
land and water, when he had leisure for a friendly nod at
his friends, and a cheerful smile for Hist.
Well, he said, in his usual, composed manner, and
pleasant voice; he that sees the sun set in the west, and
wakes 'arly enough in the morning, will be sartain to find
him coming back ag'in in the east, like a buck that is hunted
round his ha'nts. I dare say, now, Hist, you've beheld
this, time and ag'in, and yet it never entered into your galish
mind to ask the reason?
Both Chingachgook and his betrothed looked up at the
luminary, with an air that betokened sudden wonder, and
then they gazed at each other, as if to seek the solution of
the difficulty. Familiarity deadens the sensibilities, even as
connected with the gravest natural phenomena; and never
before had these simple beings thought of inquiring into a
movement that was of daily occurrence, however puzzling
it might appear on investigation. When the subject was thus
suddenly started, it struck both alike, and at the same
instant
,
with some such force, as any new and brilliant
proposition
in the natural sciences would strike the scholar.
Chingachgook alone saw fit to answer.
The pale-faces know every thing, he said; can they
tell us why the sun hides his face, when he goes back, at
night.
Ay, that is downright red-skin l'arnin', returned the
other, laughing; though he was not altogether insensible to
the pleasure of proving the superiority of his race, by solving
the difficulty, which he set about doing, in his own peculiar
manner. Hark'ee, Sarpent, he continued more gravely,
though too simply for affectation; this is easierly explained
than an Indian brain may fancy. The sun, while he seems
to keep travelling in the heavens, never budges, but it is the
'arth that turns round; and any one can understand, if he
is placed on the side of a mill-wheel, for instance, when it's
in motion, that he must sometimes see the heavens, while he
is at other times under water. There's no great secret in
that, but plain natur'; the difficulty being in setting the 'arth
in motion.
How does my brother know that the earth turns round?
demanded the Indian. Can he see it?
Well, that's been a puzzler, I will own, Delaware; for
I've often tried, but never could fairly make it out.
Sometimes
I've consaited that I could; and then ag'in, I've been
obliged to own it an onpossibility. Howsever, turn it does,
as all my people say, and you ought to believe 'em, since
they can foretell eclipses, and other prodigies, that used to
fill the tribes with terror, according to your own traditions
of such things.
Good. This is true; no red man will deny it. When
a wheel turns, my eyes can see itthey do not see the earth
turn.
Ay, that's what I call sense-obstinacy! Seeing is
believing
,
they say; and what they can't see, some men won't
in the least give credit to. Nevertheless, chief, that isn't
quite as good reason as it may at first seem. You believe
in the Great Spirit, I know; and yet, I conclude, it would
puzzle you to show where you see him!
Chingachgook can see Him everywhereeverywhere in
good
thingsthe Evil Spirit in
bad
. Here, in the lake;
there, in the forest; yonder, in the clouds; in Hist, in the
son of Uncas, in Tamenund, in Deerslayer. The Evil Spirit
is in the Mingos. That I know; I do not see the earth turn
round.
I don't wonder they call you the Sarpent, Delaware; no,
I don't! There's always a meaning in your words, and
there's often a meaning in your countenance, too!
Notwithstanding
,
your answers doesn't quite meet my idee.
That God is obsarvable in all nat'ral objects is allowable;
but then he is not parceptible in the way I mean.
You
know
there is a Great Spirit, by his works, and the pale-faces
know that the 'arth turns round by its works. This is the
reason of the matter, though how it is to be explained, is
more than I can exactly tell you. This I know; all my
people consait that fact; and what all the pale-faces consait,
is very likely to be true.
When the sun is in the top of that pine to-morrow,
where will my brother Deerslayer be?
The hunter started, and he looked intently, though totally
without alarm, at his friend. Then he signed for him to
follow
,
and led the way into the ark, where he might pursue
the subject unheard by those, whose feelings he feared might
get the mastery over their reason. Here he stopped, and
pursued the conversation in a more confidential tone.
'Twas a little onreasonable in you, Sarpent, he said,
to bring up such a subject afore Hist, and when the young
woman of my own colour might overhear what was said.
Yes, 'twas a little more onreasonable than most things that
you do. No matter; Hist didn't comprehend, and the other
didn't hear. Howsever, the question is easier put than
answered
.
No mortal can say where he will be when the sun
rises to-morrow. I will ask you the same question,
Sarpent
,
and should like to hear what answer you can give.
Chingachgook will be with his friend Deerslayer; if he
be in the land of spirits, the Great Serpent will crawl at his
side; if beneath yonder sun, its warmth and light shall fall
on both.
I understand you, Delaware, returned the other,
touched
with the simple self-devotion of his friend. Such
language
is as plain in one tongue as in another; it comes
from the heart, and goes to the heart, too. 'Tis well to
think so, and it may be well to
say
so, for that matter, but
it would not be well to
do
so, Sarpent. You are no longer
alone in life; for, though you have the lodges to change,
and other ceremonies to go through, afore Hist becomes
your lawful wife, yet are you as good as married, in all that
bears on the feelin's, and joy, and misery. No, no; Hist
must not be desarted, because a cloud is passing atween you
and me, a little onexpectedly, and a little darker than we
may have looked for.
Hist is a daughter of the Mohicans; she knows how to
obey her husband. Where he goes, she will follow.
Both
will be with the Great Hunter of the Delawares, when the
sun shall be in the pine to-morrow.
The Lord bless and protect you! Chief; this is
down-right
madness. Can either, or both, of you alter a Mingo
natur'? Will your grand looks, or Hist's tears and beauty,
change a wolf into a squirrel, or make a catamount as
innocent
as a fa'an! No, Sarpent, you will think better of
this matter, and leave me in the hands of God. After all,
it's by no means sartain that the scamps design the
torments
,
for they may yet be pitiful, and bethink them of the
wickedness of such a course; though it
is
but a hopeless
expectation to look forward to a Mingo's turning aside from
evil, and letting marcy get uppermost in his heart.
Nevertheless
,
no one knows to a sartainty what will happen; and
young creatur's, like Hist, ar'n't to be risked on
onsartainties
.
This marrying is altogether a different undertaking
from what some young men fancy. Now, if you was
single
,
or as good as single, Delaware, I should expect you to
be act
y
ve and stirring about the camp of the vagabonds,
from sunrise to sunset, sarcumventing, and contriving, as
restless as a hound off the scent, and doing all manner of
things to help me, and to distract the inimy; but two are
oftener feebler than one, and we must take things as they
are, and not as we want 'em to be.
Listen, Deerslayer, returned the Indian, with an
emphasis
so decided, as to show how much he was in earnest.
If Chingachgook was in the hands of the Hurons, what
would my pale-face brother do? Sneak off to the
Delaware
villages, and say to the chiefs, and old men, and young
warriors`See; here is Wah-ta!-wah; she is safe, but a
little tired; and here is the Son of Uncas, not as tired as the
Honeysuckle, being stronger, but just as safe.' Would he
do this?
Well, that's oncommon ingen'ous; it's cunning enough
for a Mingo himself. The Lord only knows what put it
into your head to ask such a question. What would I do?
Why, in the first place, Hist wouldn't be likely to be in my
company at all, for she would stay as near you as possible
and therefore all that part about
her
couldn't be said without
talking nonsense. As for her being tired, that would fall
through, too, if she didn't go, and no part of your speech
would be likely to come from me: so, you see, Sarpent,
reason is ag'in you, and you may as well give it up, since
to hold out ag'in reason, is no way becoming a chief of your
character and repitation.
My brother is not himself; he forgets that he is talking
to one who has sat at the council-fires of his nation,
returned
the other, kindly. When men speak, they should
say that which does not go in at one side of the head, and
out at the other. Their words shouldn't be feathers, so light
that a wind, which does not ruffle the water, can blow them
away. He has not answered my question; when a chief
puts a question, his friend should not talk of other things.
I understand you, Delaware; I understand well enough
what you mean, and truth won't allow me to say otherwise.
Still, it's not as easy to answer as you seem to think, for
this plain reason. You wish me to say what I would do, if
I had a betrothed, as you have, here, on the lake, and a
fri'nd yonder, in the Huron camp, in danger of the torments.
That's it, isn't it?
The Indian bowed his head silently, and always with
unmoved
gravity, though his eye twinkled at the sight of the
other's embarrassment.
Well, I never had a betrothed; never had the kind of
feelin's, towards any young woman, that you have towards
Hist; though the Lord knows my feelin's are kind enough
towards 'em all! Still, my heart, as they call it, in such
matters isn't touched, and therefore I can't say what I would
do. A fri'nd pulls strong; that I know by exper'ence,
Sarpent
;
but, by all that I've seen and heard consarning love,
I'm led to think that a betrothed pulls stronger.
Vol. II.15
True; but the betrothed of Chingachgook does not pull
towards the lodges of the Delawares; she pulls towards the
camp of the Hurons.
She's a noble gal, for all her little feet, and hands that
an't bigger than a child's, and a voice that's as pleasant as
a mocker's; she's a noble gal, and like the stock of her sires!
Well, what is it, Sarpent? for I conclude she hasn't changed
her mind, and mean to give herself up, and turn Huron
wife. What is it you want?
Wah-ta!-wah will never live in the wigwam of an
Iroquois
,
answered the Delaware, drily. She has little
feet, but they can carry her to the villages of her people;
she has small hands, too, but her mind is large. My brother
will see what we can do, when the time shall come, rather
than let him die under Mingo torments.
Attempt nothing heedlessly, Delaware, said the other,
earnestly; I suppose you must and will have your way;
and, on the whole, it's right you should; for you'd neither
be happy, unless something was undertaken. But attempt
nothing heedlessly. I didn't expect you'd quit the lake,
while my matter remained in unsartainty; but remember,
Sarpent, that no torments that Mingo ingenuity can invent,
no ta'ntings, and revilings, no burnings, and roastings, and
nail-tearings, nor any other onhuman contrivance, can so
soon break down my spirit, as to find that you and Hist
have fallen into the power of the inemy, in striving to do
something for my good.
The Delawares are prudent. The Deerslayer will not
find them running into a strange camp with their eyes shut.
Here the dialogue terminated. Hetty soon announced
that the breakfast was ready, and the whole party were soon
seated around the simple board, in the usual primitive
manner
of borderers. Judith was the last to take her seat, pale,
silent, and betraying in her countenance that she had passed
a painful if not a sleepless night. At this meal scarce a
syllable was exchanged, all the females manifesting want of
appetite, though the two men were unchanged in this
particular
.
It was early when the party arose, and there still
remained several hours before it would be necessary for the
prisoner to leave his friends. The knowledge of this
circumstance
,
and the interest all felt in his welfare, induced
the whole to assemble on the platform again, in the desire to
be near the expected victim, to listen to his discourse, and,
if possible, to show their interest in him by anticipating his
wishes. Deerslayer, himself, so far as human eyes could
penetrate, was wholly unmoved, conversing cheerfully and
naturally, though he avoided any direct allusion to the
expected
and great event of the day. If any evidence could
be discovered of his thoughts reverting to that painful
subject
at all, it was in the manner in which he spoke of death
and the last great change.
Grieve not, Hetty, he said; for it was while consoling
this simple-minded girl for the loss of her parents that he
thus betrayed his feelings; since God has app'inted that
all must die. Your parents, or them you fancied your
parents
,
which is the same thing, have gone afore you; this
is only in the order of natur', my good gal, for the aged
go first, and the young follow. But one that had a mother
like your'n, Hetty, can be at no loss to hope the best, as
to how matters will turn out in another world. The
Delaware
,
here, and Hist, believe in happy hunting-grounds, and
have idees befitting their notions and gifts, as red-skins;
but we, who are of white blood, hold altogether to a different
doctrine. Still, I rather conclude, our heaven is their land
of spirits, and that the path which leads to it will be travelled
by all colours alike. 'Tis onpossible for the wicked to enter
on it, I will allow; but fri'nds can scarce be separated,
though they are not of the same race on 'arth. Keep up
your spirits, poor Hetty, and look forward to the day when
you will meet your mother ag'in, and that without pain or
sorrowing.
I do expect to see mother, returned the truth-telling
and simple girl, but what will become of father?
That's a non-plusser, Delaware, said the hunter, in
the Indian dialectyes, that is a downright non-plusser!
The Muskrat was not a saint on 'arth, and it's fair to guess
he'll not be much of one hereafter! Howsever, Hetty,
dropping into the English by an easy transition
howsever
,
Hetty, we must all hope for the best. That is wisest,
and it is much the easiest to the mind, if one can only do it.
I recommend to you, trusting to God, and putting down all
misgivings and faint-hearted feelin's. It's wonderful,
Judith
,
how different people have different notions about the
futur', some fancying one change, and some fancying
another
.
I've known white teachers that have thought all
was spirit, hereafter; and them, ag'in, that believed the body
will be transported to another world, much as the red-skins
themselves imagine, and that we shall walk about, in the
flesh, and know each other, and talk together, and be fri'nds
there, as we've been fri'nds here.
Which of these opinions is most pleasing to
you,
Deerslayer
?
asked the girl, willing to indulge his melancholy
mood, and far from being free from its influence herself.
Would it be disagreeable to think that you should meet
all who are now on this platform in another world? Or,
have you known enough of us here, to be glad to see us no
more?
The last would make death a bitter portion; yes, it
would. It's eight good years since the Sarpent and I
began
to hunt together, and the thought that we were never to
meet ag'in, would be a hard thought to me. He looks
forward
to the time when we shall chase a sort of spirit-deer,
in company, on plains where there's no thorns, or
brambles
,
or marshes, or other hardships to overcome; whereas,
I can't fall into all these notions, seeing that they appear to
be ag'in reason. Spirits can't eat, nor have they any use
for clothes; and deer can only rightfully be chased to be
slain, or slain, unless it be for the venison, or the hides.
Now, I find it hard to suppose that blessed spirits can be
put to chasing game, without an object, tormenting the
dumb animals just for the pleasure and agreeableness of
their own amusements. I never yet pulled a trigger on
buck or doe, Judith, unless when food or clothes was
wanting
.
The recollection of which, Deerslayer, must now be a
great consolation to you.
It is the thought of such things, my fri'nds, that
enables
a man to keep his furlough. It might be done without
it, I own; for the worst red-skins sometimes do their duty
in this matter; but it makes that which might otherwise be
hard, easy, if not altogether to our liking. Nothing truly
makes a bolder heart, than a light conscience.
Judith turned paler than ever, but she struggled for
self-command
,
and succeeded in obtaining it. The conflict had
been severe, however, and it left her so little disposed to
speak, that Hetty pursued the subject. This was done in
the simple manner natural to the girl.
It would be cruel to kill the poor deer, she said, in
this world, or any other, when you don't want their venison,
or their skins. No good white-man, and no good red-man
would do it. But it's wicked for a Christian to talk about
chasing any thing in heaven. Such things are not done
before the face of God, and the missionary that teaches
these doctrines, can't be a true missionary. He must be a
wolf in sheep's clothing. I suppose you know what a sheep
is, Deerslayer?
That I do, gal; and a useful creatur' it is, to such as
like cloths better than skins, for winter garments. I
understand
the natur' of sheep, though I've had but little to do
with 'em; and the natur' of wolves too, and can take the
idee of a wolf in the fleece of a sheep, though I think it
would be likely to prove a hot jacket for such a beast, in
the warm months!
And sin, and hypocrisy are hot jackets, as
they
will
find, who put them on, returned Hetty, positively; so the
wolf would be no worse off than the sinner. Spirits don't
hunt, nor trap, nor fish, nor do any thing that vain men
undertake
,
since they've none of the longings of this world
to feed. Oh! mother told me all that, years ago, and I
didn't wish to hear it denied.
Well, my good Hetty, in that case, you'd better not
broach your doctrine to Hist, when she and you are alone,
and the young Delaware maiden is inclined to talk religion.
It's her fixed idee, I know, that the good warriors do
nothing
but hunt and fish, in the other world, though I don't
believe that she fancies any of them are brought down to
trapping, which is no empl'yment for a brave. But of
hunting
and fishing, accordin' to her notion, they've their fill;
and that, too, over the most agreeablest hunting-grounds,
and among game that is never out of season, and which is
just act
y
ve and instinct
y
ve enough to give a pleasure to
death. So I wouldn't recommend it to you to start Hist on
that idee.
Hist can't be so wicked as to believe any such thing,
15*
returned the other earnestly. No Indian hunts after he
is dead.
No wicked Indian, I grant you; no wicked Indian,
sartainly
.
He is obliged to carry the ammunition, and to look
on without sharing in the sport, and to cook, and to light
the fires, and to do every thing that isn't manful. Now
mind; I don't tell you these are my idees, but they are
Hist's idees, and, therefore, for the sake of peace, the less
you say to her ag'in 'em the better.
And what are your ideas of the fate of an Indian in
the other world? demanded Judith, who had just found her
voice.
Ah! gal, any thing but that! I am too christianized to
expect any thing so fanciful as hunting and fishing after
death; nor do I believe there is one Manitou for the red-skin,
and another for a pale-face. You find different colours on
'arth, as any one may see, but you don't find different
natur's
.
Different gifts, but only one natur.
In what is a gift different from a nature? Is not nature
itself a gift from God?
Sartain; that's quick-thoughted and creditable, Judith,
though the main idee is wrong. A natur' is the creatur'
itself
;
its wishes, wants, idees and feelin's, as all are born in
him. This natur' never can be changed in the main, though
it may undergo some increase or lessening. Now, gifts
come of sarcumstances. Thus, if you put a man in a town,
he gets town gifts; in a settlement, settlement gifts; in a
forest, gifts of the woods. A soldier has soldierly gifts, and
a missionary preaching gifts. All these increase and
strengthen, until they get to fortify natur' as it might be,
and excuse a thousand acts and idees. Still the creatur' is
the same at the bottom; just as a man who is clad in
regimentals
is the same as the man that is clad in skins. The
garments make a change to the eye, and some change in
the conduct perhaps; but none in the man. Herein lies the
apology for gifts; seein' that you expect different conduct
from one in silks and satins, from one in homespun; though
the Lord, who didn't make the dresses, but who made the
creatur's themselves, looks only at his own work. This
isn't ra'al missionary doctrine, but it's as near it as a man
of white colour need be. Ah's! me; little did I think to be
talking of such matters to-day, but it's one of our
weaknesses
never to know what will come to pass. Step into
the ark with me, Judith, for a minute. I wish to convarse with
you.
Judith complied with a willingness she could scarce
conceal
.
Following the hunter into the cabin, she took a seat
on a stool, while the young man brought Killdeer, the rifle
she had given him, out of a corner, and placed himself on
another, with the weapon laid upon his knees. After
turning
the piece round and round, and examining its lock and
its breech with a sort of affectionate assiduity, he laid it
down and proceeded to the subject which had induced him
to desire the interview.
I understood you, Judith, to say that you gave me this
rifle, he said. I agreed to take it because a young
woman
can have no great use for fire-arms. The we'pon has
a great name, and it desarves it, and ought of right to be
carried by some known and sure hand, for the best
reputation
may be lost by careless and thoughtless handling.
Can it be in better hands than those in which it is now,
Deerslayer? Thomas Hutter seldom missed with it: with
you, it must turn out to be
Sartain death! interrupted the hunter, laughing. I
once know'd a beaver-man that had a piece he called by
that very name, but 'twas all boastfulness, for I've seen
Delawares that were as true with arrows at a short range.
Howsever, I'll not deny my giftsfor
this
is a gift, Judith,
and not natur'but I'll not deny my gifts, and therefore
allow that the rifle couldn't well be in better hands than it
is at present. But how long will it be likely to remain
there? Atween us, the truth may be said, though I shouldn't
like to have it known to the Sarpent and Hist; but to
you
the truth may be spoken, since
your
feelin's will not be as
likely to be tormented by it as those of them that have
known me longer and better. How long am I like to own
this rifle, or any other? That is a serious question for our
thoughts to rest on, and should that happen which is so
likely
to happen, Killdeer would be without an owner.
Judith listened with apparent composure, though the
conflict
within came near overpowering her. Appreciating the
singular character of her companion, however, she
succeeded
in appearing calm; though, had not his attention been
drawn exclusively to the rifle, a man of his keenness of
observation
could scarce have failed to detect the agony of
mind with which the girl had hearkened to his words. Her
great self-command, notwithstanding, enabled her to pursue
the subject in a way still to deceive him.
What would you have me do with the weapon, she
asked, should that which you seem to expect, take place?
That's just what I wanted to speak to you about, Judith
that's just it. There's Chingachgook, now, though far
from being perfect sartainty with a riflefor few red-skins
ever get to be
that
though far from being perfect sartainty,
he is respectable, and is coming on. Nevertheless, he is my
fri'nd; and all the better fri'nd, perhaps, because there never
can be any hard feelin's atween us, touchin' our gifts; his'n
bein' red, and mine bein' altogether white. Now, I should
like to leave Killdeer to the Sarpent, should any thing
happen
to keep me from doing credit and honour to your
precious
gift, Judith.
Leave it to whom you please, Deerslayer; the rifle is
your own, to do with as you please; Chingachgook shall
have it, should you never return to claim it, if that be your
wish.
Has Hetty been consulted in this matter? Property
goes from the parent to the children, and not to one child in
partic'lar.
If you place your right on that of the law, Deerslayer,
I fear none of us can claim to be the owner. Thomas
Hutter was no more the father of Esther, than he was the
father of Judith. Judith and Esther we are, truly, having
no other name.
There may be law in that, but there's no great reason,
gal. Accordin' to the custom of families, the goods are
your'n, and there's no one here to gainsay it. If Hetty
would only say that she is willing, my mind would be quite
at ease in the matter. It's true, Judith, that your sister
has neither your beauty nor your wit; but we should be
the tenderest of the rights and welfare of the most
weakminded
.
The girl made no answer; but placing herself at a
window
,
she summoned her sister to her side. When the
question
was put to Hetty, her simple-minded and affectionate
nature cheerfully assented to the proposal to confer on
Deerslayer
a full right of ownership to the much-coveted rifle.
The latter now seemed perfectly happy, for the time being,
at least; and after again examining and re-examining his
prize, he expressed a determination to put its merits to a
practical test before he left the spot. No boy could have
been more eager to exhibit the qualities of his trumpet, or
his cross-bow, than this simple forester was to prove those
of his rifle. Returning to the platform, he first took the
Delaware aside, and informed him that this celebrated piece
was to become his property, in the event of any thing serious
befalling himself.
This is a new reason why you should be wary,
Sarpent
,
and not run into any oncalculated danger, the hunter
added, for it will be a victory of itself, to a tribe, to own
such a piece as this! The Mingos will turn green with
envy; and, what is more, they will not ventur' heedlessly
near a village where it is known to be kept. So look well
to it, Delaware, and remember that you've now to watch
over a thing that has all the valie of a creatur', without its
failin's. Hist may be, and should be precious to you, but
Killdeer will have the love and veneration of your whole
people.
One rifle like another, Deerslayer, returned the Indian,
in English, the language used by the other, a little hurt at
his friend's lowering his betrothed to the level of a gun.
All kill; all wood and iron. Wife dear to heart; rifle
good to shoot.
And what is a man in the woods, without something to
shoot with?a miserable trapper, or a forlorn broom and
basket maker, at the best. Such a man may hoe corn, and
keep soul and body together, but he can never know the
savoury morsels of venison, or tell a bear's ham from a
hog's. Come, my fri'nd, such another occasion may never
offer ag'in, and I feel a strong craving for a trial with this
celebrated piece. You shall bring out your own rifle, and
I will just sight Killdeer in a careless way, in order that we
may know a few of its secret vartues.
As this proposition served to relieve the thoughts of the
whole party, by giving them a new direction, while it was
likely to produce no unpleasant result, every one was
willing
to enter into it; the girls bringing forth the fire-arms
with an alacrity, bordering on cheerfulness. Hutter's
armory
was well supplied, possessing several rifles, all of
which were habitually kept loaded, in readiness to meet any
sudden demand for their use. On the present occasion, it
only remained to freshen the primings, and each piece was
in a state for service. This was soon done, as all assisted
in it, the females being as expert in this part of the system
of defence, as their male companions.
Now, Sarpent, we'll begin in an humble way, using old
Tom's commoners first, and coming to your we'pon and
Killdeer
as the winding-up observations, said Deerslayer,
delighted
to be again, weapon in hand, ready to display his
skill. Here's birds in abundance, some in, and some over
the lake, and they keep at just a good range, hovering round
the hut. Speak your mind, Delaware, and p'int out the
creatur' you wish to alarm. Here's a diver nearest in, off
to the eastward, and that's a creatur' that buries itself at
the flash, and will be like enough to try both piece and
powder.
Chingachgook was a man of few words. No sooner was
the bird pointed out to him, than he took his aim and fired.
The duck dove at the flash, as had been expected, and the
bullet skipped harmlessly along the surface of the lake, first
striking the water within a few inches of the spot where the
bird had so lately swum. Deerslayer laughed, cordially and
naturally; but, at the same time, he threw himself into an
attitude of preparation, and stood keenly watching the sheet
of placid water. Presently a dark spot appeared, and then
the duck arose to breathe, and shook its wings. While in
this act, a bullet passed directly through its breast, actually
turning it over lifeless, on its back. At the next moment,
Deerslayer stood with the breech of his rifle on the platform,
as tranquil as if nothing had happened, though laughing in
his own peculiar manner.
There's no great trial of the pieces in that! he said, as
if anxious to prevent a false impression of his own merit.
No, that proof's neither for, nor ag'in the rifles, seeing it
was all quickness of hand and eye. I took the bird at a
disadvantage
,
or he might have got under, again, afore the
bullet
reached him. But the Sarpent is too wise to mind such
tricks, having long been used to them. Do you remember
the time, chief, when you thought yourself sartain of the
wild-goose, and I took him out of your very eyes, as it
might be, with a little smoke! Howsever, such things pass
for nothing, atween fri'nds, and young folk will have their
fun, Judith. Ay, here's just the bird we want, for it's as
good for the fire, as it is for the aim, and nothing should be
lost that can be turned to just account. There, farther north,
Delaware.
The latter looked in the required direction, and he soon
saw a large black duck, floating in stately repose on the
water. At that distant day, when so few men were present
to derange the harmony of the wilderness, all the smaller
lakes with which the interior of New York so abounds, were
places of resort for the migratory aquatic birds; and this
sheet, like the others, had once been much frequented by all
the varieties of the duck, by the goose, the gull, and the
loon. On the appearance of Hutter, the spot was
comparatively
deserted for other sheets, more retired and remote,
though some of each species continued to resort thither, as
indeed they do to the present hour. At that instant, a
hundred
birds were visible from the castle, sleeping on the water,
or laving their feathers in the limpid element, though no other
offered so favourable a mark as that Deerslayer had just
pointed out to his friend. Chingachgook, as usual, spared
his words, and proceeded to execution. This time his aim
was more careful than before, and his success in proportion.
The bird had a wing crippled, and fluttered along the water
screaming, materially increasing its distance from its
enemies
.
That bird must be put out of pain, exclaimed
Deerslayer
,
the moment the animal endeavoured to rise on the
wing; and this is the rifle and the eye to do it.
The duck was still floundering along, when the fatal bullet
overtook it, severing the head from the neck, as neatly as if
it had been done with an axe. Hist had indulged in a low
cry of delight, at the success of the young Indian; but now
she affected to frown and resent the greater skill of his
friend. The chief, on the contrary, uttered the usual
exclamation
of pleasure, and his smile proved how much he
admired, and how little he envied.
Never mind the gal, Sarpent; never mind Hist's feelin's,
which will neither choke, nor drown, slay nor beautify,
said Deerslayer, laughing. 'Tis nat'ral for women to
enter into their husband's victories and defeats, and you are
as good as man and wife, so far as prejudice and fri'ndship
go. Here is a bird over head, that will put the pieces to the
proof; I challenge you to an upward aim, with a flying
target
.
That's a ra'al proof, and one that needs sartain rifles,
as well as sartain eyes.
The species of eagle that frequents the water, and lives
on fish, was also present, and one was hovering at a
considerable
height above the hut, greedily watching for an
opportunity to make a swoop; its hungry young elevating
their heads from a nest that was in sight, in the naked
summit of a dead pine. Chingachgook silently turned a
new piece against this bird, and after carefully watching his
time, fired. A wider circuit than common, denoted that the
messenger had passed through the air, at no great distance
from the bird, though it missed its object. Deerslayer, whose
aim was not more true than it was quick, fired as soon as
it was certain his friend had missed, and the deep swoop
that followed left it momentarily doubtful whether the eagle
was hit or not. The marksman himself, however,
proclaimed
his own want of success, calling on his friend to
seize another rifle, for he saw signs on the part of the bird
of an intention to quit the spot.
I made him wink, Sarpent; I do think his feathers were
ruffled, but no blood has yet been drawn, nor is that old
piece fit for so nice and quick a sight. Quick, Delaware;
you've now a better rifle, and, Judith, bring out Killdeer,
for this is the occasion to try his merits, if he has 'em!
A general movement followed, each of the competitors
got ready, and the girls stood in eager expectation of the
result. The eagle had made a wide circuit after his low
swoop, and fanning his way upward, once more hovered
nearly over the hut, at a distance even greater than before.
Chingachgook gazed at him, and then expressed his opinion
of the impossibility of striking a bird at that great height,
and while he was so nearly perpendicular, as to the range.
But a low murmur from Hist, produced a sudden impulse,
and he fired. The result showed how well he had
calculated
,
the eagle not even varying his flight, sailing round
and round in his airy circle, and looking down, as if in
contempt, at his foes.
Now, Judith, cried Deerslayer, laughing, with
glistening
and delighted eyes, we'll see if Killdeer isn't Killeagle,
too! Give me room, Sarpent, and watch the reason of the
aim, for by reason any thing may be l'arned.
A careful sight followed, and was repeated again and
again, the bird continuing to rise higher and higher. Then
followed the flash and the report. The swift messenger
sped upward, and, at the next instant, the bird turned on its
side, and came swooping down, now struggling with one
wing and then with another, sometimes whirling in a circuit,
next fanning desperately as if conscious of its injury, until,
having described several complete circles around the spot,
it fell heavily into the end of the ark. On examining the
body, it was found that the bullet had pierced it about half
way between one of its wings and the breast-bone.
CHAPTER XI
Upon two stony tables, spread before her,
She lean'd her bosom, more than stony hard;
There slept th' impartial judge, and strict restorer
Of wrong, or right, with pain or with reward;
There hung the score of all our debts, the card
Where good, and bad, and life, and death, were painted;
Was never heart of mortal so untainted,
But when the roll was read, with thousand terrors fainted.
Giles Fletcher
.
We've
done an unthoughtful thing, Sarpentyes,
Judith
,
we've done an unthoughtful thing in taking life with
an object no better than vanity! exclaimed Deerslayer,
when the Delaware held up the enormous bird, by its wings,
and exhibited the dying eyes riveted on its enemies with the
Vol. II.16
gaze that the helpless ever fasten on their destroyers.
'T was more becomin' two boys to gratify their feelin's in
this onthoughtful manner, than two warriors on a war-path,
even though it be their first. Ah's! me; well, as a
punishment
I'll quit you at once, and when I find myself alone
with them bloody-minded Mingos, it's more than like I'll
have occasion to remember that life is sweet, even to the
beasts of the woods and the fowls of the air. Here,
Judith
;
there's Killdeer; take him back ag'in, and keep him
for some hand that's more desarving to own such a piece.
I know of none as deserving as your own, Deerslayer,
answered the girl in haste; none but yours shall keep the
rifle.
If it depended on skill, you might be right enough, gal,
but we should know
when
to use fire-arms, as well as
how
to use 'em. I haven'
t
l'arnt the first duty yet, it seems;
so keep the piece till I have. The sight of a dyin' and
distressed creatur', even though it be only a bird, brings
wholesome thoughts to a man who don't know how soon his
own time may come, and who
is
pretty sartain that it will
come afore the sun sets; I'd give back all my vain feelin's,
and rej'icin's in hand and eye, if that poor eagle was only
on its nest ag'in, with its young, praisin' the Lord, for
any thing that we can know about the matter, for health
and strength!
The listeners were confounded with this proof of sudden
repentance in the hunter, and that, too, for an indulgence
so very common, that men seldom stop to weigh its
consequences
,
or the physical suffering it may bring on the
unoffending
and helpless. The Delaware understood what was
said, though he scarce understood the feelings which had
prompted the words, and by way of disposing of the
difficulty
,
he drew his keen knife, and severed the head of the
sufferer from its body.
What a thing is power! continued the hunter, and
what a thing it is, to have it, and not to know how to use
it! It's no wonder, Judith, that the great so often fail of
their duties, when even the little and the humble find it so
hard to do what's right, and not to do what's wrong. Then,
how one evil act brings others after it! Now, wasn't it for
this furlough of mine, which must soon take me back to the
Mingos, I'd find this creatur's nest, if I travelled the woods
a fortnightthough an eagle's nest is soon found by them
that understands the bird's natur',but I'd travel a
fortnight
rather than not find it, just to put the young, too, out
of their pain.
I'm glad to hear you say this, Deerslayer, observed
Hetty, and God will be more apt to remember your
sorrow
for what you've done, than the wickedness itself. I
thought how wicked it was to kill harmless birds, while you
were shooting, and meant to tell you so; but, I don't know
how it happened,I was so curious to see if you
could
hit
an eagle at so great a height, that I forgot altogether to
speak, till the mischief was done.
That's it; that's just it, my good Hetty. We can all
see our faults and mistakes when it's too late to help them!
Howsever, I'm glad you didn't speak, for I don't think a
word or two would have stopped me, just at that moment;
and so the sin stands in its nakedness, and not aggravated
by any unheeded calls to forbear. Well, well, bitter thoughts
are hard to be borne at all times, but there's times when
they're harder than at others.
Little did Deerslayer know, while thus indulging in
feelings
that were natural to the man, and so strictly in
accordance
with his own unsophisticated and just principles, that,
in the course of the inscrutable Providence, which so
uniformly
and yet so mysteriously covers all events with its
mantle, the very fault he was disposed so severely to
censure
,
was to be made the means of determining his own
earthly fate. The mode and the moment in which he was
to feel the influence of this interference, it would be
premature
to relate, but both will appear in the course of the
succeeding
chapters. As for the young man, he now slowly
left the ark, like one sorrowing for his misdeeds, and seated
himself in silence on the platform. By this time the sun
had ascended to some height, and its appearance, taken in
connection with his present feelings, induced him to prepare
to depart. The Delaware got the canoe ready for his friend,
as soon as apprised of his intention, while Hist busied
herself
in making the few arrangements that were thought
necessary
to his comfort. All this was done without
ostentation
,
but in a way that left Deerslayer fully acquainted with,
and equally disposed to appreciate, the motive. When all
was ready, both returned to the side of Judith and Hetty
neither of whom had moved from the spot where the young
hunter sat.
The best fri'nds must often part, the last began, when
he saw the whole party grouped around him. Yes,
fri'ndship
can't alter the ways of Providence; and let our feelin's
be as they may, we must part. I've often thought there's
moments when our words dwell longer on the mind than
common, and when advice is remembered, just because the
mouth that gives it, isn't likely to give it ag'in. No one
knows what will happen in the world; and therefore it may
be well, when fri'nds separate under a likelihood that the
parting may be long, to say a few words in kindness, as a
sort of keepsakes. If all but one will go into the ark, I'll
talk to each in turn, and what is more, I'll listen to what
you may have to say back ag'in; for it's a poor counsellor
that won't take as well as give.
As the meaning of the speaker was understood, the two
Indians immediately withdrew as desired, leaving the sisters,
however, still standing at the young man's side. A look of
Deerslayer's induced Judith to explain.
You can advise Hetty as you land, she said hastily;
I intend that she shall accompany you to the shore.
Is this wise, Judith? It's true that, under common
sarcumstances
,
a feeble mind is a great protection among
red-skins
;
but when their feelin's are up, and they're bent on
revenge, it's hard to say what may come to pass.
Besides
What were you about to say, Deerslayer? asked
Judith
,
whose gentleness of voice and manner amounted nearly
to tenderness, though she struggled hard to keep her
emotions
and apprehensions in subjection.
Why, simply that there are sights and doin's that one
even as little gifted with reason and memory as Hetty, here,
might better not witness. So, Judith, you would do well to
let me land alone, and to keep your sister back.
Never fear for me, Deerslayer, put in Hetty, who
comprehended enough of the discourse to know its general
drift; I'm feeble-minded, and that, they say, is an excuse
for going anywhere; and what that won't excuse will be
overlooked, on account of the bible I always carry. It is
wonderful, Judith, how all sorts of men, the trappers as well
as the hunters, red men as well as white, Mingos as well as
Delawares, do reverence and fear the bible!
I think you have not the least ground to fear any
injury
,
Hetty, answered the sister, and therefore I shall
insist on your going to the Huron camp with our friend.
Your being there can do no harm, not even to yourself, and
may do great good to Deerslayer.
This is not a moment, Judith, to dispute; and so have
the matter your own way, returned the young man.
Get yourself ready, Hetty, and go into the canoe, for I've
a few parting words to say to your sister, which can do you
no good.
Judith and her companion continued silent until Hetty had
so far complied as to leave them alone, when Deerslayer
took up the subject as if it had been interrupted by some
ordinary
occurrence, and in a very matter-of-fact way.
Words spoken at parting, and which may be the last we
ever hear from a fri'nd, are not soon forgotten, he repeated,
and so, Judith, I intend to speak to you like a brother,
seein' I'm not old enough to be your father. In the first
place, I wish to caution you ag'in your inemies, of which
two may be said to ha'nt your very footsteps, and to beset
your ways. The first is oncommon good looks, which is
as dangerous a foe to some young women as a whole tribe
of Mingos could prove, and which calls for great
watchfulness
;
not to admire and praise; but to distrust and
sarcumvent
.
Yes, good looks may be sarcumvented, and fairly
outwitted, too. In order to do this, you've only to
remember
that they melt like the snows; and, when once gone,
they never come back ag'in. The seasons come and go,
Judith; and if we have winter, with storms and frosts, and
spring, with chills and leafless trees, we have summer, with
its sun and glorious skies, and fall, with its fruits, and a
garment thrown over the forest that no beauty of the town
could rummage out of all the shops in America. `Arth is
in an eternal round, the goodness of God bringing back the
pleasant when we've had enough of the onpleasant. But
it's not so with good looks.
They
are lent for a short time
in youth, to be used and not abused; and, as I never met
16*
with a young woman to whom Providence has been as
bountiful as it has to you, Judith, in this partic'lar, I warn
you, as it might be with my dyin' breath, to beware of the
inimy; fri'nd or inimy, as we deal with the gift.
It was so grateful to Judith to hear these unequivocal
admissions
of her personal charms, that much would have been
forgiven to the man who made them, let him be who he
might. But, at that moment, and from a far better feeling,
it would not have been easy for Deerslayer seriously to
offend
her; and she listened with a patience which, had it
been foretold only a week earlier, it would have excited her
indignation to hear.
I understand your meaning, Deerslayer, returned the
girl, with a meekness and humility that a little surprised her
listener, and hope to be able to profit by it. But you have
mentioned only one of the enemies I have to fear; who, or
what, is the other?
The other is givin' way afore your own good sense and
judgment, I find, Judith; yes, he's not as dangerous as I
supposed. Howsever, havin' opened the subject, it will be
as well to end it honestly. The first inimy you have to be
watchful of, as I've already told you, Judith, is oncommon
good looks, and the next is an oncommon knowledge of the
sarcumstance. If the first is bad, the last doesn't, in any
way, mend the matter, so far as safety and peace of mind
are consarned.
How much longer the young man would have gone on in
his simple and unsuspecting, but well-intentioned manner,
it might not be easy to say, had he not been interrupted by
his listener's bursting into tears, and giving way to an
out-break
of feeling, which was so much the more violent
from the fact that it had been with so much difficulty
suppressed
.
At first her sobs were so violent and
uncontrollable
that Deerslayer was a little appalled, and he was
abundantly
repentant from the instant that he discovered how
much greater was the effect produced by his words than he
had anticipated. Even the austere and exacting are usually
appeased by the signs of contrition, but the nature of
Deerslayer
did not require proofs of intense feeling so strong, in
order to bring him down to a level with the regrets felt by
the girl herself. He arose as if an adder had stung him,
and the accents of the mother that soothes her child were
scarcely more gentle and winning than the tones of his
voice, as he now expressed his contrition at having gone
so far.
It was well meant, Judith, he said, but it was not
intended
to hurt your feelin's so much. I have overdone the
advice, I see; yes, I've overdone it, and I crave your
pardon
for the same. Fri'ndship's an awful thing! Sometimes
it chides us for not having done enough; and then ag'in it
speaks in strong words for havin' done too much.
Howsever
,
I acknowledge I've overdone the matter, and as I've
a ra'al and strong regard for you, I rej'ice to say it,
inasmuch
as it proves how much better you are than my own
vanity and consaits had made you out to be.
Judith now removed her hands from her face, her tears
had ceased, and she unveiled a countenance so winning, with
the smile which rendered it even radiant, that the young
man gazed at her, for a moment, with speechless delight.
Say no more, Deerslayer, she hastily interposed, it
pains me to hear you find fault with yourself. I know my
own weakness all the better, now I see that you have
discovered
it; the lesson, bitter as I have found it for a
moment
,
shall not be forgotten. We will not talk any
longer
of these things, for I do not feel myself brave enough for
the undertaking, and I should not like the Delawares, or
Hist, or even Hetty, to notice my weakness. Farewell,
Deerslayer, may God bless and protect you as your honest
heart deserves blessing and protection, and as I must think
he will.
Judith had so far regained the superiority that properly
belonged to her better education, high spirit, and surpassing
personal advantages, as to preserve the ascendency she had
thus accidentally obtained, and effectually prevented any
return
to the subject that was as singularly interrupted as it
had been singularly introduced. The young man permitted
her to have every thing her own way, and when she
pressed
his hard hand in both her own, he made no resistance,
but submitted to the homage as quietly, and with quite as
matter of course a manner, as a sovereign would have
received
a similar tribute from a subject, or the mistress from
her suitor. Feeling had flushed the face and illuminated
the whole countenance of the girl, and her beauty was
never
more resplendent than when she cast a parting glance
at the youth. That glance was filled with anxiety, interest,
and gentle pity. At the next instant she darted into the hut
and was seen no more; though she spoke to Hist from a
window, to inform her that their friend expected her
appearance
.
You know enough of red-skin natur', and red-skin
usages, Wah-ta!-Wah, to see the condition I am in on
account
of this furlough, commenced the hunter, in
Delaware
,
as soon as the patient and submissive girl of that
people
had moved quietly to his side; you will therefore best
understand how onlikely I am ever to talk with you ag'in.
I've but little to say; but that little comes from long livin'
among your people, and from havin' obsarved and noted
their usages. The life of a woman is hard at the best, but,
I must own, though I'm not opinionated in favour of my
own colour, that it is harder among the red-men than it is
among the pale-faces. This is a p'int on which Christians
may well boast, if boasting can be set down for Christianity
in any manner or form, which I rather think it cannot.
Howsever, all women have their trials. Red women have
their'n in what I should call the nat'ral way, while white
women take 'em inoculated like. Bear your burthen, Hist,
becomingly, and remember, if it be a little toilsome, how
much lighter it is than that of most Indian women. I know
the Sarpent wellwhat I call cordiallyand he will never
be a tyrant to any thing he loves, though he will expect to
be treated himself like a Mohican chief. There will be
cloudy days in your lodge, I suppose, for they happen
under
all usages, and among all people; but, by keepin' the
windows of the heart open, there will always be room for
the sunshine to enter. You come of a great stock yourself,
and so does Chingachgook. It's not very likely that either
will ever forget the sarcumstance, and do any thing to
disgrace
your forefathers. Nevertheless, likin' is a tender
plant, and never thrives long when watered with tears. Let
the 'arth around your married happiness be moistened by
the dews of kindness.
My pale brother is very wise; Wah will keep in her
mind all that his wisdom tells her.
That's judicious and womanly, Hist. Care in
listening
,
and stout-heartedness in holding to good counsel, is a
wife's great protection. And, now, ask the Sarpent to come
and speak with me, for a moment, and carry away with
you all my best wishes and prayers. I shall think of you,
Hist, and of your intended husband, let what may come to
pass, and always wish you well, here and hereafter, whether
the last is to be according to Indian idees, or Christian
doctrines
.
Hist shed no tear at parting. She was sustained by the
high resolution of one who had decided on her course; but
her dark eyes were luminous with the feelings that glowed
within, and her pretty countenance beamed with an
expression
of determination that was in marked and singular
contrast
to its ordinary gentleness. It was but a minute ere
the Delaware advanced to the side of his friend with the
light, noiseless tread of an Indian.
Come, this-a-way, Sarpent, here more out of sight of
the woman, commenced the Deerslayer, for I've several
things to say that mustn't so much as be suspected, much
less overheard.
You
know too well the natur' of furloughs
and Mingos to have any doubts or misgivin's consarnin'
what is likely to happen, when I get back to the camp. On
them two p'ints, therefore, a few words will go a great way.
In the first place, chief, I wish to say a little about Hist, and
the manner in which you red men treat your wives. I
suppose
it's accordin' to the gifts of your people that the women
should work, and the men hunt; but there's such a thing
as moderation in all matters. As for huntin', I see no good
reason why any limits need be set to
that,
but Hist comes
of too good a stock to toil like a common drudge. One of
your means and standin' need never want for corn, or
potatoes
,
or any thing that the fields yield; therefore, I hope
the hoe will never be put into the hands of any wife of
your'n. You know I am not quite a beggar, and all I own,
whether in ammunition, skins, arms, or calicoes, I give to
Hist, should I not come back to claim them by the end of
the season. This will set the maiden up, and will buy labour
for her, for a long time to come. I suppose I needn't tell
you to love the young woman, for that you do already, and
whomsoever the man ra'ally loves, he'll be likely enough to
cherish. Nevertheless, it can do no harm to say that kind
words never rankle, while bitter words do. I know you're
a man, Sarpent, that is less apt to talk in his own lodge,
than to speak at the council fire; but forgetful moments
may overtake us all, and the pract
y
ce of kind doin', and
kind talkin', is a wonderful advantage in keepin' peace in
a cabin, as well as on a hunt.
My ears are open, returned the Delaware, gravely;
the words of my brother have entered so far that they
never can fall out again. They are like rings, that have no
end, and cannot drop. Let him speak on; the song of the
wren and the voice of a friend never tire.
I will speak a little longer, chief, but you will excuse it
for the sake of old companionship, should I now talk about
myself. If the worst comes to the worst, it's not likely
there'll be much left of me but ashes; so a grave would be
useless, and a sort of vanity. On that score I'm no way
partic'lar, though it might be well enough to take a look at
the remains of the pile, and should any bones, or pieces be
found, 't would be more decent to gather them together, and
bury them, than to let them lie for the wolves to gnaw at,
and howl over. These matters can make no great
difference
in the end, but men of white blood and Christian
feelin's
have rather a gift for graves.
It shall be done as my brother says, returned the
Indian
,
gravely. If his mind is full, let him empty it in the
bosom of a friend.
Thank you, Sarpent; my mind's easy enough; yes,
it's tolerable easy. Idees will come uppermost that I'm not
apt to think about in common, it's true; but by striving ag'in
some, and lettin' others come out, all will be right in the
long run. There's one thing, howsever, chief, that
does
seem to me to be
on
reasonable, and ag'in natur', though the
missionaries say it's true; and bein' of my religion and
colour, I feel bound to believe them. They say an Indian
may torment and tortur' the body to the heart's content, and
scalp and cut, and tear, and burn, and consume all his
inventions
and deviltries, until nothin' is left but ashes, and
they shall be scattered to the four winds of heaven, yet,
when the trumpet of God shall sound, all will come together
ag'in, and the man will stand forth in his flesh, the same
creatur' as to looks, if not as to feelin's, that he was afore
he was harmed!
The missionaries are good men; they mean well,
returned
the Delaware, courteously; they are not great
medicines
.
They think all they say, Deerslayer; that is no
reason why warriors and orators should be all ears. When
Chingachgook shall see the father of Tamenund standing in
his scalp, and paint, and war-lock, then will he believe the
missionaries.
Seein'
is
believin', of a sartainty  Ah's me! and
some of us may see these things sooner than we thought. I
comprehend your meanin' about Tamenund's father,
Sarpent
,
and the idee's a close idee. Tamenund is now an
elderly man, say eighty, every day of it; and his father
was scalped, and tormented, and burnt, when the present
prophet was a youngster. Yes, if one could see
that
come
to pass, there wouldn't be much difficulty in yieldin' faith
to all that the missionaries say. Howsever, I am not ag'in
the opinion now; for you must know, Sarpent, that the
great principle of Christianity is to believe
without
seeing;
and a man should always act up to his religion and
principles
,
let them be what they may.
That is strange, for a wise nation, said the Delaware,
with emphasis. The red man looks hard, that he may
see
and understand.
Yes, that's plauserble, and is agreeable to mortal pride;
but it's not as deep as it seems. If we could understand
all
we see, Sarpent, there might be not only sense, but safety,
in refusin' to give faith to any
one
thing that we might find
oncomprehensible; but when there's so many things, about
which, it may be said, we know nothin' at all, why, there's
little use, and no reason, in bein' difficult touchin' any one
in partic'lar. For my part, Delaware, all my thoughts
haven't been on the game, when outlyin' in the hunts and
scoutin's of our youth. Many's the hour I've passed
pleasantly
enough, too, in what is tarmed conterplation by my
people. On such occasions, the mind is act
y
ve, though the
body seems lazy and listless. An open spot on a mountain
side, where a wide look can be had at the heavens and the
'arth, is a most judicious place for a man to get a just idee
of the power of the Manitou, and of his own littleness. At
such times, there isn't any great disposition to find fault with
little difficulties, in the way of comperhension, as there are
so many big ones to hide them. Believin' comes easy
enough to me, at such times; and, if the Lord made man
first, out of'arth, as they tell me it is written in the bible,
then turns him into dust, at death, I see no great difficulty
in the way to bringin' him back in the body, though ashes
be the only substance left. These things lie beyond our
understandin', though they may, and do, lie so close to our
feelin's. But of all the doctrines, Sarpent, that which
disturbs
me, and disconsarts my mind the most, is the one
which teaches us to think that a pale-face goes to one
heaven
,
and a red-skin to another; it may separate in death,
them which lived much together, and loved each other well,
in life!
Do the missionaries teach their white brethren to think
it is so? demanded the Indian, with serious earnestness.
The Delawares believe that good men and brave warriors
will hunt together in the same pleasant woods, let them
belong
to whatever tribe they may; that all the unjust Indians,
and cowards, will have to sneak in with the dogs and the
wolves, to get venison for their lodges.
'T is wonderful how many consaits mankind have
consarnin'
happiness and misery, hereafter! exclaimed the
hunter, borne away by the power of his own thoughts.
Some believe in burnin's and flames, and some think
punishment
is to eat with the wolves and dogs. Then, ag'in,
some fancy heaven to be only the carryin' out of their own
'arthly longin's; while others fancy it all gold and shinin'
lights! Well, I've an idee of my own, in that matter, which
is just this, Sarpent. Whenever I've done wrong, I've
ginirally
found 't was owin' to some blindness of the mind,
which hid the right from view, and when sight has returned,
then has come sorrow and repentance. Now, I consait that,
after death, when the body is laid aside, or, if used at all, is
purified and without its longin's, the spirit sees all things in
their ra'al light, and never becomes blind to truth and
justice
.
Such bein' the case, all that has been done in life, is
beheld as plainly as the sun is seen at noon; the good brings
joy, while the evil brings sorrow. There's nothin'
onreasonable
in that, but it's agreeable to every man's
exper'ence
.
I thought the pale-faces believed
all
men were wicked;
who then could ever find the white man's heaven?
That's ingen'ous, but it falls short of the missionary
teachin's. You'll be christianized one day, I make no
doubt, and then 'twill all come plain enough. You must
know, Sarpent, that there's been a great deed of salvation
done, that, by God's help, enables all men to find a pardon
for their wickednesses, and
that
is the essence of the white
man's religion. I can't stop to talk this matter over with
you any longer, for Hetty's in the canoe, and the furlough
takes me away; but the time will come I hope, when you'll
feel
these things; for, after all, they must be
felt,
rather
than reasoned about. Ah's! me; well, Delaware, there's
my hand; you know it's that of a fri'nd, and will shake it
as such, though it never has done you one-half the good its
owner wishes it had.
The Indian took the offered hand, and returned its
pressure
warmly. Then falling back on his acquired stoicism
of manner, which so many mistake for constitutional
indifference
,
he drew up in reserve, and prepared to part from
his friend with dignity. Deerslayer, however, was more
natural; nor would he have at all cared about giving way to
his feelings, had not the recent conduct and language of
Judith
given him some secret, though ill-defined apprehensions
of a scene. He was too humble to imagine the truth
concerning
the actual feelings of that beautiful girl, while he
was too observant not to have noted the struggle she had
maintained with herself, and which had so often led her to
the very verge of discovery. That something extraordinary
was concealed in her breast, he thought obvious enough;
and, through a sentiment of manly delicacy that would have
done credit to the highest human refinement, he shrunk from
any exposure of her secret that might subsequently cause
regret
to the girl, herself. He, therefore, determined to depart,
now, and that without any further manifestations of feeling
either from himself, or from others.
God bless you! Sarpent  God bless you! cried the
hunter, as the canoe left the side of the platform. Your
Manitou and my God, only know when and where we shall
Vol. II.17
meet ag'n; I shall count it a great blessing, and a full
reward
for any little good I may have done on 'arth, if we
shall be permitted to know each other, and to consort
together
,
hereafter, as we have so long done in these pleasant
woods afore us!
Chingachgook waved his hand. Drawing the light blanket
he wore over his head, as a Roman would conceal his grief
in his robes, he slowly withdrew into the ark, in order to
indulge
his sorrow and his musings, alone. Deerslayer did
not speak again, until the canoe was half-way to the shore.
Then he suddenly ceased paddling, at an interruption that
came from the mild, musical voice of Hetty.
Why do
you
go back to the Hurons, Deerslayer?
demanded
the girl. They say
I
am feeble-minded, and such
they never harm; but you have as much sense as Hurry
Harry; and more too, Judith thinks, though I don't see how
that can well be.
Ah! Hetty, afore we land, I must convarse a little with
you, child; and that too, on matters touching your own
welfare
,
principally. Stop paddlingor, rather, that the Mingos
needn't think we are plotting and contriving, and so treat us
accordingly, just dip your paddle lightly, and give the canoe
a little motion and no more. That's just the idee and the
movement; I see you're ready enough at an appearance,
and might be made useful in a sarcumvention, if it was
lawful
now to use onethat's just the idee and the movement!
Ah's! me. Desait and a false-tongue are evil things, and
altogether onbecoming our colour, Hetty; but it
is
a pleasure
and a satisfaction to outdo the contrivances of a red-skin, in
the strife of lawful warfare. My path has been short, and
is like soon to have an end; but I can see that the
wanderings
of a warrior aren't altogether among brambles and
difficulties
.
There's a bright side to a war-path, as well as to
most other things, if we'll only have the wisdom to see it,
and the ginerosity to own it.
And why should your war-path, as you call it, come so
near to an end, Deerslayer?
Because, my good girl, my furlough comes so near to
an end. They're likely to have pretty much the same
tarmination
,
as regards timeone following on the heels of
the other, as a matter of course.
I don't understand your meaning, Deerslayer, returned
the girl, looking a little bewildered. Mother always said
people ought to speak more plainly to me than to most other
persons, because I'm feeble-minded. Those that are
feeble-minded
,
don't understand as easily as those that have sense.
Well then, Hetty, the simple truth is this. You know
that I'm now a capt
y
ve to the Hurons, and capt
y
ves can't
do, in all things, as they please
But how can you be a captive, eagerly interrupted the
girl, when you are out here on the lake, in father's bark
canoe, and the Indians are in the woods, with no canoe at
all?
That
can't be true, Deerslayer!
I wish with all my heart and soul, Hetty, that you was
right, and that I was wrong, instead of your bein' all wrong,
and my bein' only too near the truth. Free as I seem to
your eyes, gal, I'm bound hand and foot, in ra'ality.
Well it
is
a great misfortune not to have sense! Now,
I can't see, or understand, that you are a captive, or bound
in any manner. If you are bound, with what are your
hands and feet fastened?
With a furlough, gal; that's a thong that binds tighter
than any chain. One
may
be broken, but the other can't.
Ropes and chains allow of knives, and desait, and
contrivances
;
but a furlough can be neither cut, slipped, nor
sarcumvented
.
What sort of a thing is a furlough, then, if it be stronger
than hemp or iron? I never saw a furlough.
I hope you may never feel one, gal; the tie is
altogether
in the feelin's, in these matters, and therefore is to be
felt and not seen. You can understand what it is to give a
promise, I dare to say, good little Hetty?
Certainly. A promise is to say you will do a thing,
and that binds you to be as good as your word. Mother
always kept her promises to me, and then she said it would
be wicked if I didn't keep my promises to her, and to
everybody else.
You have had a good mother, in some matters, child,
whatever she may have been in other some. That is a
promise, and, as you say, it must be kept. Now, I fell into
the hands of the Mingos last night, and they let me come
off to see my fri'nds and send messages in to my own
colour
,
if any such feel consarn on my account, on condition
that I shall be back, when the sun is up to-day, and take
whatever their revenge and hatred can contrive, in the way
of torments, in satisfaction for the life of a warrior that fell
by my rifle, as well as for that of the young woman shot
by Hurry, and other disapp'intments met with on and about
this lake. What is called a promise atween a mother and
darter, or even atween strangers, in the settlements is called
a furlough, when given by one soldier to another, on a
war-path
.
And now I suppose you understand my situation,
Hetty?
The girl made no answer for some time, but she ceased
paddling altogether, as if the novel idea distracted her mind
too much to admit of other employment. Then she
resumed
the dialogue earnestly and with solicitude.
Do you think the Hurons will have the heart to do what
you say, Deerslayer? she asked. I have found them
kind and harmless.
That's true enough as consarns one like you, Hetty;
but it's a very different affair, when it comes to an open
inimy, and he too the owner of a pretty sartain rifle. I
don't say that they bear me special malice on account of
any expl'ites already performed, for that would be bragging,
as it might be, on the varge of the grave; but it's no vanity
to believe that they know one of their bravest and
cunnin'est
chiefs fell by my hands. Such bein' the case, the tribe
would reproach them if they failed to send the spirit of a
pale-face to keep the company of the spirit of their red
brother
;
always supposin' that he can catch it. I look for
no marcy, Hetty, at their hands; and my principal sorrow
is, that such a calamity should befal me on my first
war-path
:
that it would come sooner or later, every soldier
counts on and expects.
The Hurons shall
not
harm you, Deerslayer, cried the
girl, much excited. 'T is wicked as well as cruel; I have
the bible, here, to tell them so. Do you think I would stand
by and see you tormented?
I hope not, my good Hetty, I hope not; and, therefore,
when the moment comes, I expect you will move off, and
not be a witness of what you can't help, while it would
grieve you. But, I haven't stopped the paddles to talk of
my own afflictions and difficulties, but to speak a little
plainly to you, gal, consarnin' your own matters.
What can you have to say to me, Deerslayer! Since
mother died, few talk to me of such things.
So much the worse, poor gal; yes, 't is so much the
worse, for one of your state of mind needs frequent talking
to, in order to escape the snares and desaits of this wicked
world. You haven't forgotten Hurry Harry, gal, so soon,
I calculate?
I!I forget Henry March! exclaimed Hetty, starting.
Why should I forget him, Deerslayer, when he is our friend,
and only left us last night. Then, the large bright star that
mother loved so much to gaze at, was just over the top of
yonder tall pine on the mountain, as Hurry got into the
canoe; and when you landed him on the point, near the
east bay, it wasn't more than the length of Judith's
handsomest
riband above it.
And how can you know how long I was gone, or how
far I went to land Hurry, seein' you were not with us, and
the distance was so great, to say nothing of the night?
Oh! I knew when it was, well enough, returned Hetty,
positively. There's more ways than one for counting
time and distance. When the mind is engaged, it is better
than any clock. Mine is feeble, I know, but it goes true
enough in all that touches poor Hurry Harry. Judith will
never marry March, Deerslayer.
That's the p'int, Hetty; that's the very p'int I want to
come to. I suppose you know, that it's nat'ral for young
people to have kind feelin's for one another, more especially
when one happens to be a youth and t'other a maiden. Now,
one of your years and mind, gal, that has neither father nor
mother, and who lives in a wilderness frequented by hunters
and trappers, needs be on her guard against evils she little
dreams of.
What harm can it be to think well of a fellow-creature,
returned Hetty, simply, though the conscious blood was
stealing to her cheeks in spite of a spirit so pure that it
scarce knew why it prompted the blush; the bible tells us
to love them who despitefully use us, and why shouldn't we
like them that do not?
Ah! Hetty, the love of the missionaries isn't the sort of
17*
likin' I mean. Answer me one thing, child; do you believe
yourself to have mind enough to become a wife, and a
mother
?
That's not a proper question to ask a young woman,
Deerslayer, and I'll not answer it, returned the girl, in a
reproving mannermuch as a parent rebukes a child for
an act of indiscretion. If you have any thing to say about
Hurry, I'll hear
that
but you must not speak evil of him;
he is absent, and 't is unkind to talk evil of the absent.
Your mother has given you so many good lessons,
Hetty, that my fears for you are not as great as they were.
Nevertheless, a young woman without parents, in your state
of mind, and who is not without beauty, must always be in
danger in such a lawless region as this. I would say
nothin'
amiss of Hurry, who, in the main, is not a bad man
for one of his callin', but you ought to know one thing,
which it may not be altogether pleasant to tell you, but
which must be said. March has a desperate likin' for your
sister Judith.
Well, what of that? Everybody admires Judith, she's
so handsome, and Hurry has told me, again and again, how
much he wishes to marry her. But that will never come
to pass, for Judith don't like Hurry. She likes another, and
talks about him in her sleep; though you need not ask me
who he is, for all the gold in King George's crown, and all
the jewels, too, wouldn't tempt me to tell you his name. If
sisters can't keep each other's secrets, who can?
Sartainly; I do not wish you to tell me, Hetty, nor
would it be any advantage to a dyin' man to know. What
the tongue says when the mind's asleep, neither head nor
heart is answerable for.
I wish I knew why Judith talks so much in her sleep
about officers, and honest hearts, and false tongues; but I
suppose she don't like to tell me, as I'm feeble-minded. Isn't
it odd, Deerslayer, that Judith don't like Hurryhe who is
the bravest-looking youth that ever comes upon the lake,
and is as handsome as she is herself. Father always said
they would be the comeliest couple in the country, though
mother didn't fancy March any more than Judith. There's
no telling what will happen, they say, until things actually
come to pass.
Ah's! mewell, poor Hetty, 'tis of no great use to
talk to them that can't understand you, and so I'll say no
more about what I did wish to speak of, though it lay heavy
on my mind. Put the paddle in motion ag'in, gal, and
we 'll push for the shore, for the sun is nearly up, and my
furlough is almost out.
The canoe now glided ahead, holding its way towards
the point where Deerslayer well knew that his enemies
expected
him, and where, he now began to be afraid, he might
not arrive in season to redeem his plighted faith. Hetty,
perceiving his impatience, without very clearly
comprehending
its cause, however, seconded his efforts in a way that
soon rendered their timely return no longer a matter of
doubt. Then, and then only, did the young man suffer his
exertions to flag, and Hetty began, again, to prattle in her
simple confiding manner, though nothing farther was
uttered
that it may be thought necessary to relate.
CHAPTER XII.
Thou hast been busy, Death, this day, and yet
But half thy work is done! The gates of hell
Are thronged, yet twice ten thousand spirits move,
Who, from their warm and healthful tenements,
Fear no divorce, must, ere the sun go down,
Enter the world of woe!
Southey
.
One
experienced in the signs of the heavens, would have
seen that the sun wanted but two or three minutes of the
zenith, when Deerslayer landed on the point where the
Hurons
were now encamped, nearly abreast of the castle. This
spot was similar to the one already described, with the
exception
that the surface of the land was less broken and
less crowded with trees. Owing to these two circumstances,
it was all the better suited to the purpose for which it had
been selected, the space beneath the branches bearing some
resemblance to a densely wooded lawn. Favoured by its
position
and its spring, it had been much resorted to by
savages
and hunters, and the natural grasses had succeeded their
fires, leaving an appearance of sward in places, a very
unusual
accompaniment of the virgin forest. Nor was the
margin of water fringed with bushes, as on so much of its
shore, but the eye penetrated the woods immediately on
reaching the strand, commanding nearly the whole area of
the projection.
If it was a point of honour with the Indian warrior to
redeem
his word, when pledged to return and meet his death
at a given hour, so was it a point of characteristic pride to
show no womanish impatience, but to re-appear as nearly
as possible at the appointed moment. It was well not to
exceed the grace accorded by the generosity of the enemy,
but it was better to meet it to a minute. Something of this
dramatic effect mingles with most of the graver usages of
the American aborigines, and no doubt, like the prevalence
of a similar feeling among people more sophisticated and
refined, may be referred to a principle of nature. We all
love the wonderful, and when it comes attended by
chivalrous
self-devotion and a rigid regard to honour, it presents
itself to our admiration in a shape doubly attractive. As
respects Deerslayer, though he took a pride in showing his
white blood, by often deviating from the usages of the
redmen
,
he frequently dropped into their customs, and oftener
into their feelings, unconsciously to himself, in consequence
of having no other arbiters to appeal to, than their
judgments
and tastes. On the present occasion, he would have
abstained from betraying a feverish haste by a too speedy
return, since it would have contained a tacit admission that
the time asked for was more than had been wanted; but, on
the other hand, had the idea occurred to him, he would have
quickened his movements a little, in order to avoid the
dramatic
appearance of returning at the precise instant set as
the utmost limit of his absence. Still, accident had
interfered
to defeat the last intention, for when the young man
put his foot on the point, and advanced with a steady tread
towards the group of chiefs that was seated in grave array
on a fallen tree, the oldest of their number cast his eye
upward
at an opening in the trees, and pointed out to his
companions
the startling fact that the sun was just entering a
space that was known to mark the zenith. A common,
but low exclamation of surprise and admiration escaped
every mouth, and the grim warriors looked at each other;
some with envy and disappointment, some with
astonishment
,
at the precise accuracy of their victim, and others
with a more generous and liberal feeling. The American
Indian always deemed his moral victories the noblest,
prizing
the groans and yielding of his victim under torture
more than the trophy of his scalp; and the trophy itself
more than his life. To slay, and not to bring off the proof
of victory, indeed, was scarcely deemed honourable; even
these rude and fierce tenants of the forest, like their more
nurtured brethren of the court and the camp, having set up
for themselves imaginary and arbitrary points of honour, to
supplant the conclusions of the right, and the decisions of
reason.
The Hurons had been divided in their opinions
concerning
the probability of their captive's return. Most among
them, indeed, had not expected it possible for a pale-face to
come back voluntarily, and meet the known penalties of an
Indian torture; but a few of the seniors expected better things
from one who had already shown himself so singularly cool,
brave, and upright. The party had come to its decision,
however, less in the expectation of finding the pledge
redeemed
,
than in the hope of disgracing the Delawares by
casting into their teeth the delinquency of one bred in their
villages. They would have greatly preferred that
Chingachgook
should be their prisoner, and prove the traitor;
but the pale-face scion of the hated stock, was no bad
substitute
,
for their purposes, failing in their designs against the
ancient stem. With a view to render the triumph as signal
as possible, in the event of the hour's passing without the
re-appearance of the hunter, all the warriors and scouts of
the party had been called in; and the whole band, men,
women
,
and children, was now assembled at this single point,
to be a witness of the expected scene. As the castle was in
plain view, and by no means distant, it was easily watched
by day-light; and it being thought that its inmates were
now limited to Hurry, the Delaware, and the two girls, no
apprehensions were felt of their being able to escape unseen.
A large raft, having a breast-work of logs, had been
prepared
,
and was in actual readiness to be used against either
ark or castle, as occasion might require, so soon as the fate
of Deerslayer was determined; the seniors of the party
having come to the opinion that it was getting to be
hazardous
to delay their departure for Canada, beyond the coming
night. In short, the band waited merely to dispose of this
single affair, ere it brought matters to a crisis, and prepared
to commence its retreat towards the distant waters of
Ontario
.
It was an imposing scene, into which Deerslayer now
found himself advancing. All the older warriors were
seated
on the trunk of the fallen tree, waiting his approach with
grave decorum. On the right, stood the young men, armed,
while the left was occupied by the women and children,
In the centre was an open space of considerable extent,
always
canopied by leaves, but from which the underbrush,
dead wood, and other obstacles had been carefully removed.
The more open area had probably been much used by former
parties, for this was the place where the appearance of a
sward was the most decided. The arches of the woods,
even at high noon, cast their sombre shadows,on the spot,
which the brilliant rays of the sun that struggled through
the leaves contributed to mellow, and, if such an expression
can be used, to illuminate. It was probably from a similar
scene that the mind of man first got its idea of the effects
of Gothic tracery and churchly hues; this temple of nature
producing some such effect, so far as light and shadows
were concerned, as the well-known offspring of human
invention.
As was not unusual among the tribes and wandering bands
of the aborigines, two chiefs shared, in nearly equal degrees,
the principal and primitive authority that was wielded over
these children of the forest. There were several who might
claim the distinction of being chief men, but the two in
question
were so much superior to all the rest in influence, that,
when they agreed, no one disputed their mandates; and
when they were divided, the band hesitated, like men who
had lost their governing principle of action. It was also in
conformity with practice,perhaps we might add, in
conformity
with nature, that one of the chiefs was indebted to
his mind for his influence, whereas the other owed his
distinction
altogether to qualities that were physical. One was
a senior, well known for eloquence in debate, wisdom in
council, and prudence in measures; while his great
competitor
,
if not his rival, was a brave, distinguished in war,
notorious
for ferocity, and remarkable, in the way of intellect,
for nothing but the cunning and expedients of the war-path.
The first was Rivenoak, who has already been introduced
to the reader, while the last was called le Panthre, in
the language of the Canadas; or the Panther, to resort to
the vernacular of the English colonies. The appellation of
the fighting chief was supposed to indicate the qualities of
the warrior, agreeably to a practice of the red man's
nomenclature
;
ferocity, cunning, and treachery, being, perhaps,
the distinctive features of his character. The title had been
received from the French, and was prized so much the more
from that circumstance, the Indian submitting profoundly to
the greater intelligence of his pale-face allies, in most things
of this nature. How well the
sobriquet
was merited, will
be seen in the sequel.
Rivenoak and the Panther sat side by side, awaiting the
approach of their prisoner, as Deerslayer put his moccasined
foot on the strand; nor did either move, or utter a syllable,
until the young man had advanced into the centre of the
area, and proclaimed his presence with his voice. This was
done firmly, though in the simple manner that marked the
character of the individual.
Here I am, Mingos, he said, in the dialect of the
Delawares
,
a language that most present understood; here I
am, and there is the sun. One is not more true to the laws
of natur', than the other has proved true to his word. I am
your prisoner; do with me what you please. My business
with man and 'arth is settled; nothing remains now but to
meet the white man's God, accordin' to a white man's
duties
and gifts.
A murmur of approbation escaped even the women, at this
address, and, for an instant there was a strong and pretty
general desire to adopt into the tribe, one who owned so
brave a spirit. Still there were dissenters from this wish,
among the principal of whom might be classed the Panther,
and his sister, le Sumach, so called from the number of her
children, who was the widow of le Loup Cervier, now known
to have fallen by the hand of the captive. Native ferocity
held one in subjection, while the corroding passion of
revenge
prevented the other from admitting any gentler feeling
at the moment. Not so with Rivenoak. This chief arose,
stretched his arm before him, in a gesture of courtesy, and
paid his compliments with an ease and dignity that a prince
might have envied. As, in that band, his wisdom and
eloquence
were confessedly without rivals, he knew that on
himself would properly fall the duty of first replying to the
speech of the pale-face.
Pale-face, you are honest, said the Huron orator. My
people are happy in having captured a man, and not a
skulking
fox. We now know you; we shall treat you like a
brave. If you have slain one of our warriors, and helped
to kill others, you have a life of your own ready to give
away in return. Some of my young men thought that the
blood of a pale-face was too thin; that it would refuse to
run under the Huron knife. You will show them it is not
so; your heart is stout as well as your body. It is a
pleasure to make such a prisoner; should my warriors say
that the death of le Loup Cervier ought not to be forgotten,
and that he cannot travel towards the land of spirits alone,
that his enemy must be sent to overtake him, they will
remember that he fell by the hand of a brave, and send you
after him with such signs of our friendship as shall not make
him ashamed to keep your company. I have spoken; you
know what I have said.
True enough, Mingo, all true as the gospel, returned
the simple-minded hunter; you
have
spoken, and I
do
know not only what you have
said,
but, what is still more
important, what you
mean
. I dare to say your warrior
the Lynx, was a stout-hearted brave, and worthy of your
fri'ndship and respect, but I do not feel unworthy to keep
his company, without any passport from your hands.
Nevertheless
,
here I am, ready to receive judgment from your
council, if, indeed, the matter was not detarmined among
you, afore I got back.
My old men would not sit in council over a pale-face
until they saw him among them, answered Rivenoak,
looking
around him a little ironically; they said it would be
like sitting in council over the winds; they go where they
will, and come back as they see fit, and not otherwise.
There was one voice that spoke in your favour, Deerslayer,
but it was alone, like the song of the wren whose mate has
been struck by the hawk.
I thank that voice whosever it may have been, Mingo,
and will say it was as true a voice, as the rest were lying
voices. A furlough is as binding on a pale-face, if he be
honest, as it is on a red-skin; and was it not so, I would
never bring disgrace on the Delawares, among whom I may
be said to have received my edication. But words are
useless
,
and lead to braggin' feelin's; here I am; act your will
on me.
Rivenoak made a sign of acquiescence, and then a short
conference was privately held among the chiefs. As soon as
the latter ended, three or four young men fell back from
among the armed group, and disappeared. Then it was
signified to the prisoner that he was at liberty to go at large
on the point, until a council was held concerning his fate.
There was more of seeming, than of real confidence,
however
,
in this apparent liberality, inasmuch as the young men
mentioned, already formed a line of sentinels across the
breadth of the point, inland, and escape from any other part
was out of the question. Even the canoe was removed
beyond
this line of sentinels, to a spot where it was considered
safe from any sudden attempt. These precautions did not
proceed from a failure of confidence, but from the
circumstance
that the prisoner had now complied with all the
required
conditions of his parole, and it would have been
considered
a commendable and honourable exploit to escape
from his foes. So nice, indeed, were the distinctions drawn
by the savages, in cases of this nature, that they often gave
their victims a chance to evade the torture, deeming it as
creditable to the captors to overtake, or to out-wit a fugitive,
when his exertions were supposed to be quickened by the
extreme jeopardy of his situation, as it was for him to get
clear from so much extraordinary vigilance.
Nor was Deerslayer unconscious of, or forgetful of, his
rights, and of his opportunities. Could he now have seen
any probable opening for an escape, the attempt would not
have been delayed a minute. But the case seemed
desperate
.
He was aware of the line of sentinels, and felt the
Vol. II.18
difficulty of breaking through it, unharmed. The lake
offered
no advantages, as the canoe would have given his foes
the greatest facilities for overtaking him; else would he have
found it no difficult task to swim as far as the castle. As
he walked about the point, he even examined the spot to
ascertain if it offered no place of concealment; but its
openness
,
its size, and the hundred watchful glances that were
turned towards him, even while those who made them
affected
not to see him, prevented any such expedient from
succeeding. The dread and disgrace of failure had no
influence
on Deerslayer, who deemed it ever a point of honour
to reason and feel like a white man, rather than as an Indian,
and who felt it a sort of duty to do all he could, that did not
involve a dereliction from principle, in order to save his life.
Still he hesitated about making the effort, for he also felt
that he ought to see the chance of success before he
committed
himself.
In the mean time the business of the camp appeared to
proceed in its regular train. The chiefs consulted apart,
admitting no one but the Sumach to their councils; for she,
the widow of the fallen warrior, had an exclusive right to
be heard on such an occasion. The young men strolled
about in indolent listlessness, awaiting the result with Indian
patience, while the females prepared the feast that was to
celebrate the termination of the affair, whether it proved
fortunate
,
or otherwise, for our hero. No one betrayed
feeling
;
and an indifferent observer, beyond the extreme
watchfulness
of the sentinels, would have detected no extraordinary
movement or sensation to denote the real state of things.
Two or three old women put their heads together, and, it
appeared, unfavourably to the prospect of Deerslayer, by
their scowling looks and angry gestures; but a group of
Indian
girls were evidently animated by a different impulse,
as was apparent by stolen glances that expressed pity and
regret. In this condition of the camp, an hour soon glided
away.
Suspense is, perhaps, the feeling, of all others, that is
most difficult to be supported. When Deerslayer landed, he
fully, in the course of a few minutes, expected to undergo the
tortures of an Indian revenge, and he was prepared to meet
his fate manfully; but the delay proved far more trying
than the nearer approach of suffering, and the intended
victim
began seriously to meditate some desperate effort at
escape
,
as it might be from sheer anxiety to terminate the
scene, when he was suddenly summoned to appear, once
more, in front of his judges, who had already arranged the
band in its former order, in readiness to receive him.
Killer of the Deer, commenced Rivenoak, as soon as
his captive stood before him, my aged men have listened
to wise words; they are ready to speak. You are a man
whose fathers came from beyond the rising sun; we are
children of the setting sun; we turn our faces towards the
Great Sweet Lakes, when we look towards our villages. It
may be a wise country and full of riches, towards the
morning
;
but it is very pleasant towards the evening. We love
most to look in that direction. When we gaze at the east,
we feel afraid, canoe after canoe bringing more and more of
your people in the track of the sun, as if their land was so full
as to run over. The red men are few already; they have
need of help. One of our best lodges has lately been
emptied
by the death of its master: it will be a long time
before his son can grow big enough to sit in his place.
There is his widow; she will want venison to feed her and
her children, for her sons are yet like the young of the
robin before they quit the nest. By your hand has this
great calamity befallen her. She has two duties; one to
le Loup Cervier, and one to his children. Scalp for scalp,
life for life, blood for blood, is one law; to feed her young,
another. We know you, Killer of the Deer. You are
honest
;
when you say a thing, it is so. You have but one
tongue, and that is not forked, like a snake's. Your head
is never hid in the grass; all can see it. What you say,
that will you do. You are just. When you have done
wrong, it is your wish to do right, again, as soon as you
can. Here is the Sumach; she is alone in her wigwam,
with children crying around her for food; yonder is a rifle;
it is loaded and ready to be fired. Take the gun; go
forth and shoot a deer; bring the venison and lay it before
the widow of le Loup Cervier; feed her children; call
yourself
her husband. After which, your heart will no longer
be Delaware, but Huron; le Sumach's ears will not hear
the cries of her children; my people will count the proper
number of warriors.
I fear'd this, Rivenoak, answered Deerslayer, when
the other had ceased speaking: yes, I did dread that it
would come to this. Howsever, the truth is soon told, and
that will put an end to all expectations on this head.
Mingo, I'm white, and Christian-born; 't would ill become
me to take a wife, under red-skin forms, from among
heathen
.
That which I wouldn't do in peaceable times, and
under a bright sun, still less would I do behind clouds, in
order to save my life. I may never marry; most likely
Providence, in putting me up here in the woods, has
intended
I should live single, and without a lodge of my own: but
should such a thing come to pass, none but a woman of my
own colour and gifts shall darken the door of my wigwam.
As for feeding the young of your dead warrior, I would do
that cheerfully, could it be done without discredit; but it
cannot, seeing that I can never live in a Huron village.
Your own young men must find the Sumach in venison, and
the next time she marries, let her take a husband whose legs
are not long enough to overrun territory that don't belong
to him. We fou't a fair battle, and he fell; in this there is
nothin' but what a brave expects, and should be ready to
meet. As for getting a Mingo heart, as well might you
expect
to see grey hairs on a boy, or the blackberry growing
on the pine. No, no, Huron; my gifts are white, so far as
wives are consarned; it is Delaware in all things touchin'
Indians.
These words were scarcely out of the mouth of
Deerslayer
,
before a common murmur betrayed the
dissatisfaction
with which they had been heard. The aged women, in
particular, were loud in their expressions of disgust; and the
gentle Sumach, herself, a woman quite old enough to be our
hero's mother, was not the least pacific in her denunciations.
But all the other manifestations of disappointment and
discontent
were thrown into the back-ground, by the fierce
resentment
of the Panther. This grim chief had thought it a
degradation to permit his sister to become the wife of a
pale-face
of the Yengeese, at all, and had only given a reluctant
consent to the arrangementone by no means unusual
among the Indians, howeverat the earnest solicitations of
the bereaved widow; and it goaded him to the quick, to find
his condescension slighted, the honour he had with so much
regret been persuaded to accord, contemned. The animal
from which he got his name, does not glare on his intended
prey, with more frightful ferocity, than his eyes gleamed on
the captive; nor was his arm backward in seconding the
fierce resentment that almost consumed his breast.
Dog of the pale-faces! he exclaimed, in Iroquois, go
yell among the curs of your own evil hunting-grounds!
The denunciation was accompanied by an appropriate
action. Even while speaking, his arm was lifted, and the
tomahawk hurled. Luckily the loud tones of the speaker
had drawn the eye of Deerslayer towards him, else would
that moment have probably closed his career. So great was
the dexterity with which this dangerous weapon was thrown,
and so deadly the intent, that it would have riven the skull
of the prisoner, had he not stretched forth an arm, and
caught the handle in one of its turns, with a readiness quite
as remarkable, as the skill with which the missile had been
hurled. The projectile force was so great, notwithstanding,
that when Deerslayer's arm was arrested, his hand was
raised above and behind his own head, and in the very
attitude
necessary to return the attack. It is not certain whether
the circumstance of finding himself unexpectedly in this
menacing posture and armed, tempted the young man to
retaliate
,
or whether sudden resentment overcame his
forbearance
and prudence. His eye kindled, however, and a small
red spot appeared on each cheek, while he cast all his energy
in the effort of his arm, and threw back the weapon at his
assailant. The unexpectedness of this blow contributed to
its success; the Panther neither raising an arm, nor bending
his head to avoid it. The keen little axe struck the victim
in a perpendicular line with the nose, directly between the
eyes, literally braining him on the spot. Sallying forward,
as the serpent darts at its enemy even while receiving its
own death-wound, this man of powerful frame, fell his length
into the open area formed by the circle, quivering in death.
A common rush to his relief, left the captive, for a single
instant
,
quite without the crowd; and, willing to make one
desperate
effort for life he bounded off, with the activity of a
18*
deer. There was but a breathless instant, when the whole
band, old and young, women and children, abandoning the
lifeless body of the Panther, where it lay, raised the yell of
alarm, and followed in pursuit.
Sudden as had been the event which induced Deerslayer
to make this desperate trial of speed, his mind was not wholly
unprepared for the fearful emergency. In the course of the
past hour, he had pondered well on the chances of such an
experiment, and had shrewdly calculated all the details of
success and failure. At the first leap, therefore, his body
was completely under the direction of an intelligence that
turned all its efforts to the best account, and prevented every
thing like hesitation or indecision, at the important instant of
the start. To this alone was he indebted for the first great
advantage
,
that of getting through the line of sentinels
unharmed
.
The manner in which this was done, though
sufficiently
simple, merits a description.
Although the shores of the point were not fringed with
bushes, as was the case with most of the others on the lake,
it was owing altogether to the circumstance that the spot
had been so much used by hunters and fishermen. This
fringe commenced on what might be termed the main land,
and was as dense as usual, extending in long lines both north
and south. In the latter direction, then, Deerslayer held his
way; and, as the sentinels were a little without the
commencement
of this thicket, before the alarm was clearly
communicated to them, the fugitive had gained its cover.
To run among the bushes, however, was out of the
question
,
and Deerslayer held his way for some forty or fifty
yards, in the water which was barely knee keep, offering as
great an obstacle to the speed of his pursuers, as it did to
his own. As soon as a favourable spot presented, he darted
through the line of bushes, and issued into the open woods.
Several rifles were discharged at Deerslayer while in the
water, and more followed as he came out into the
comparative
exposure of the clear forest. But the direction of his
line of flight, which partially crossed that of the fire, the
haste with which the weapons had been aimed, and the
general
confusion that prevailed in the camp, prevented any
harm from being done. Bullets whistled past him, and
many cut twigs from the branches at his side, but not one
touched even his dress. The delay caused by these
fruitless
attempts was of great service to the fugitive, who had
gained more than a hundred yards on even the leading men
of the Hurons, ere something like concert and order had
entered
into the chase. To think of following with rifle in
hand was out of the question; and after emptying their
pieces in vague hopes of wounding their captive, the best
runners of the Indians threw them aside, calling out to the
women and boys to recover and load them again, as soon as
possible.
Deerslayer knew too well the desperate nature of the
struggle in which he was engaged, to lose one of the
precious
moments. He also knew that his only hope was to
run in a straight line, for as soon as he began to turn, or
double, the greater number of his pursuers would put escape
out of the question. He held his way, therefore, in a
diagonal
direction up the acclivity, which was neither very high
nor very steep, in this part of the mountain, but which was
sufficiently toilsome for one contending for life, to render it
painfully oppressive. There, however, he slackened his
speed, to recover breath, proceeding even at a quick walk, or
a slow trot, along the more difficult parts of the way. The
Hurons were whooping and leaping behind him; but this
he disregarded, well knowing they must overcome the
difficulties
he had surmounted, ere they could reach the
elevation
to which he had attained. The summit of the first hill
was now quite near him, and he saw, by the formation of
the land, that a deep glen intervened, before the base of a
second hill could be reached. Walking deliberately to the
summit, he glanced eagerly about him, in every direction,
in quest of a cover. None offered in the ground; but a
fallen tree lay near him, and desperate circumstances
require
desperate remedies. This tree lay in a line parallel
to the glen, at the brow of the hill; to leap on it, and then
to force his person as close as possible under its lower side,
took but a moment. Previously to disappearing from his
pursuers, however, Deerslayer stood on the height, and gave
a cry of triumph, as if exulting at the sight of the descent
that lay before him.In the next instant he was stretched
beneath the tree.
No sooner was this expedient adopted, than the young
man ascertained how desperate had been his own efforts, by
the violence of the pulsations in his frame. He could hear
his heart beat, and his breathing was like the action of a
bellows in quick motion. Breath was gained, however, and
the heart soon ceased to throb, as if about to break through
its confinement. The footsteps of those who toiled up the
opposite side of the acclivity were now audible, and
presently
voices and treads announced the arrival of the
pursuers
.
The foremost shouted as they reached the height;
then, fearful that their enemy would escape under
favour
of the descent, each leaped upon the fallen tree, and
plunged into the ravine, trusting to get a sight of the
pursued
,
ere he reached the bottom. In this manner, Huron
followed
Huron, until Natty began to hope the whole had
passed
.
Others succeeded, however, until quite forty had leaped
over the tree; and then he counted them, as the surest mode
of ascertaining how many could be behind. Presently all
were in the bottom of the glen, quite a hundred feet below
him, and some had even ascended part of the opposite hill,
when it became evident an inquiry was making, as to the
direction he had taken. This was the critical moment; and
one of nerves less steady, or of a training that had been
neglected
,
would have seized it to rise, and fly. Not so with
Deerslayer. He still lay quiet, watching with jealous
vigilance
every movement below, and fast regaining his breath.
The Hurons now resembled a pack of hounds, at fault.
Little was said, but each man ran about, examining the
dead leaves, as the hound hunts for the lost scent. The
great number of moccasins that had passed made the
examination
difficult, though the in-toe of an Indian was easily
to be distinguished from the freer and wider step of a
white man. Believing that no more pursuers remained
behind
,
and hoping to steal away unseen, Deerslayer
suddenly
threw himself over the tree, and fell on the upper
side. This achievement appeared to be effected
successfully
,
and hope beat high in the bosom of the fugitive.
Rising to his hands and feet, after a moment lost in
listening
to the sounds in the glen, in order to ascertain if he had
been seen, the young man next scrambled to the top of the
hill, a distance of only ten yards, in the expectation of
getting
its brow between him and his pursuers, and himself so
far under cover. Even this was effected, and he rose to
his feet, walking swiftly but steadily along the summit, in a
direction opposite to that in which he had first fled. The
nature of the calls in the glen, however, soon made him
uneasy
,
and he sprang upon the summit, again, in order to
reconnoitre. No sooner did he reach the height than he
was seen, and the chase renewed. As it was better footing
on the level ground, Deerslayer now avoided the side-hill,
holding his flight along the ridge; while the Hurons,
judging
from the general formation of the land, saw that the
ridge would soon melt into the hollow, and kept to the
latter
,
as the easiest mode of heading the fugitive. A few, at
the same time, turned south, with a view to prevent his
escaping
in that direction; while some crossed his trail towards
the water, in order to prevent his retreat by the lake, running
southerly.
The situation of Deerslayer was now more critical than
it ever had been. He was virtually surrounded on three
sides, having the lake on the fourth. But he had pondered
well on all the chances, and took his measures with
coolness
,
even while at the top of his speed. As is generally
the case with the vigorous border-men, he could outrun any
single Indian among his pursuers, who were principally
formidable to him on account of their numbers, and the
advantages
they possessed in position; and he would not have
hesitated to break off, in a straight line, at any spot, could
he have got the whole band again fairly behind him. But
no such chance did, or indeed could now offer; and when
he found that he was descending towards the glen, by the
melting away of the ridge, he turned short, at right angles
to his previous course, and went down the declivity with
tremendous velocity, holding his way towards the shore.
Some of his pursuers came panting up the hill, in direct
chase, while most still kept on, in the ravine, intending to
head him at its termination.
Deerslayer had now a different, though a desperate
project
in view. Abandoning all thoughts of escape by the
woods, he made the best of his way towards the canoe.
He knew where it lay: could it be reached, he had only to
run the gauntlet of a few rifles, and success would be
certain
.
None of the warriors had kept their weapons, which
would have retarded their speed, and the risk would come
either from the uncertain hands of the women, or from
those of some well-grown boy; though most of the latter
were already out in hot pursuit. Every thing seemed
propitious
to the execution of this plan, and the course being
a continued descent, the young man went over the ground
at a rate that promised a speedy termination to his toil.
As Deerslayer approached the point, several women and
children were passed, but, though the former endeavoured
to cast dried branches between his legs, the terror inspired
by his bold retaliation on the redoubted Panther, was so
great, that none dared come near enough seriously to
molest
him. He went by all triumphantly, and reached the
fringe of bushes. Plunging through these, our hero found
himself once more in the lake, and within fifty feet of the
canoe. Here he ceased to run, for he well understood that
his breath was now all-important to him. He even stooped,
as he advanced, and cooled his parched mouth, by scooping
up water in his hand, to drink. Still the moments pressed, and
he soon stood at the side of the canoe. The first glance told
him that the paddles had been removed! This was a sore
disappointment, after all his efforts, and, for a single
moment
,
he thought of turning, and of facing his foes by
walking
with dignity into the centre of the camp, again. But an
infernal yell, such as the American savage alone can raise,
proclaimed the quick approach of the nearest of his
pursuers
,
and the instinct of life triumphed. Preparing himself
duly, and giving a right direction to its bows, he ran off into
the water bearing the canoe before him, threw all his
strength and skill into a last effort, and cast himself forward
so as to fall into the bottom of the light craft, without
materially
impeding its way. Here he remained on his back,
both to regain his breath, and to cover his person from the
deadly rifle. The lightness, which was such an advantage
in paddling the canoes, now operated unfavourably. The
material was so like a feather, that the boat had no
momentum
;
else would the impulse in that smooth and placid sheet
have impelled it to a distance from the shore, that would
have rendered paddling with the hands safe. Could such a
point once be reached, Deerslayer thought he might get far
enough out to attract the attention of Chingachgook and
Judith
,
who would not fail to come to his relief with other canoes,
a circumstance that promised every thing. As the young
man lay in the bottom of the canoe, he watched its
movements
,
by studying the tops of the trees on the
mountain-side
,
and judged of his distance by the time and the motion.
Voices on the shore were now numerous, and he heard
something said about manning the raft, which, fortunately
for the fugitive, lay at a considerable distance, on the other
side of the point.
Perhaps the situation of Deerslayer had not been more
critical that day, than it was at this moment. It certainly
had not been one half as tantalizing. He lay perfectly
quiet, for two or three minutes, trusting to the single sense
of hearing, confident that the noise in the lake would reach
his ears, did any one venture to approach by swimming.
Once or twice, he fancied that the element was stirred by
the cautions movement of an arm, and then he perceived it
was the wash of the water on the pebbles of the strand; for,
in mimicry of the ocean, it is seldom that those little lakes
are so totally tranquil, as not to possess a slight heaving and
setting on their shores. Suddenly all the voices ceased, and
a death-like stillness pervaded the spot; a quietness as
profound
as if all lay in the repose of inanimate life. By this
time, the canoe had drifted so far as to render nothing
visible
to Deerslayer, as he lay on his back, except the blue
void of space, and a few of those brighter rays that proceed
from the effulgence of the sun, marking his proximity. It
was not possible to endure this uncertainty long. The young
man well knew that the profound stillness foreboded evil, the
savages never being so silent, as when about to strike a
blow; resembling the stealthy foot of the panther ere he
takes his leap. He took out a knife, and was about to cut
a hole through the bark, in order to get a view of the shore,
when he paused from a dread of being seen in the operation,
which would direct the enemy where to aim their bullets.
At this instant a rifle
was
fired, and the ball pierced both
sides of the canoe, within eighteen inches of the spot where
his head lay. This was close work, but our hero had too
lately gone through that which was closer, to be appalled.
He lay still half a minute longer, and then he saw the
summit
of an oak coming slowly within his narrow horizon.
Unable to account for this change, Deerslayer could
restrain
his impatience no longer. Hitching his body along,
with the utmost caution, he got his eye at the bullet-hole,
and fortunately commanded a very tolerable view of the
point. The canoe, by one of those imperceptible impulses
that so often decide the fate of men as well as the course
of things, had inclined southerly, and was slowly drifting
down the lake. It was lucky that Deerslayer had given it
a shove sufficiently vigorous to send it past the end of
the point ere it took this inclination, or it must have gone
ashore again. As it was, it drifted so near it as to bring
the tops of two or three trees within the range of the young
man's view, as has been mentioned, and, indeed, to come in
quite as close proximity with the extremity of the point as
was at all safe. The distance could not much have
exceeded
a hundred feet, though fortunately a light current of air,
from the south-west, began to set it slowly off shore.
Deerslayer now felt the urgent necessity of resorting to
some expedient to get farther from his foes, and, if possible,
to apprise his friends of his situation. The distance
rendered
the last difficult, while the proximity to the point
rendered
the first indispensable. As was usual in such craft,
a large, round, smooth stone was in each end of the canoe,
for the double purposes of seats and ballast; one of these
was within reach of his feet. This stone he contrived to
get so far between his legs as to reach it with his hands,
and then he managed to roll it to the side of its fellow in
the bows, where the two served to keep the trim of the light
boat, while he worked his own body as far aft as possible.
Before quitting the shore, and as soon as he perceived that
the paddles were gone, Deerslayer had thrown a bit of dead
branch into the canoe, and this was within reach of his arm.
Removing the cap he wore, he put it on the end of this
stick, and just let it appear over the edge of the canoe, as
far as possible from his own person. This
ruse
was
scarcely
adopted, before the young man had a proof how much
he had underrated the intelligence of his enemies. In
contempt
of an artifice so shallow and common-place, a
bullet
was fired directly through another part of the canoe,
which actually razed his skin. He dropped the cap, and
instantly raised it immediately over his head, as a safeguard.
It would seem that this second artifice was unseen, or what
was more probable, the Hurons feeling certain of
recovering
their captive, wished to take him alive.
Deerslayer lay passive a few minutes longer, his eye at
the bullet-hole, however, and much did he rejoice at seeing
that he was drifting, gradually, farther and farther from the
shore. When he looked upward, the tree-tops had
disappeared
,
but he soon found that the canoe was slowly
turning
,
so as to prevent his getting a view of any thing at his
peep-hole but of the two extremities of the lake. He now
bethought him of the stick, which was crooked, and
offered
some facilities for rowing, without the necessity of
rising
.
The experiment succeeded, on trial, better even than
he had hoped, though his great embarrassment was to keep
the canoe straight. That his present manuvre was seen,
soon became apparent by the clamour on the shore, and a
bullet entering the stern of the canoe, traversed its length,
whistling between the arms of our hero, and passed out at the
head. This satisfied the fugitive that he was getting away
with tolerable speed, and induced him to increase his efforts.
He was making a stronger push than common, when
another
messenger from the point broke the stick out-board,
and at once deprived him of his oar. As the sound of
voices seemed to grow more and more distant, however,
Deerslayer determined to leave all to the drift until he
believed himself beyond the reach of bullets. This was
nervous work, but it was the wisest of all the expedients
that offered; and the young man was encouraged to
persevere
in it, by the circumstance that he felt his face fanned
by the air, a proof that there was a little more wind.
Vol. II.19
CHAPTER XIII.
Nor widows' tears, nor tender orphans' cries
Can stop th' invader's force;
Nor swelling seas, nor threatening skies,
Prevent the pirate's course:
Their lives to selfish ends decreed,
Through blood and rapine they proceed;
No anxious thoughts of ill-repute,
Suspend the impetuous and unjust pursuit;
But power and wealth obtained, guilty and great,
Their fellow-creatures' fears they raise, or urge their hate.
Congreve
.
By
this time, Deerslayer had been twenty minutes in the
canoe, and he began to grow a little impatient for some signs
of relief from his friends. The position of the boat still
prevented
his seeing in any direction, unless it were up or down
the lake; and, though he knew that his line of sight must
pass within a hundred yards of the castle, it, in fact, passed
that distance to the westward of the buildings. The
profound
stillness troubled him also, for he knew not whether
to ascribe it to the increasing space between him and the
Indians, or to some new artifice. At length, wearied with
fruitless watchfulness, the young man turned himself on his
back, closed his eyes, and awaited the result in determined
acquiescence. If the savages could so completely control
their thirst for revenge, he was resolved to be as calm as
themselves, and to trust his fate to the interposition of the
currents and air.
Some additional ten minutes may have passed in this
quiescent manner, on both sides, when Deerslayer thought
he heard a slight noise, like a low rubbing against the bottom
of his canoe. He opened his eyes of course, in expectation
of seeing the face or arm of an Indian rising from the water,
and found that a canopy of leaves was impending directly
over his head. Starting to his feet, the first object that met
his eye was Rivenoak, who had so far aided the slow
progress
of the boat, as to draw it on the point, the grating on
the strand being the sound that had first given our hero the
alarm. The change in the drift of the canoe had been
altogether
owing to the baffling nature of the light currents of
air, aided by some eddies in the water.
Come, said the Huron, with a quiet gesture of authority
to order his prisoner to land; my young friend has sailed
about till he is tired; he will forget how to run again, unless
he uses his legs.
You've the best of it, Huron, returned Deerslayer,
stepping steadily from the canoe, and passively following his
leader to the open area of the point; Providence has helped
you in an onexpected manner. I'm your prisoner ag'in,
and I hope you'll allow that I'm as good at breaking gaol,
as I am at keeping furloughs.
My young friend is a moose! exclaimed the Huron.
His legs are very long; they have given my young men
trouble. But he is not a fish; he cannot find his way in the
lake. We did not shoot him; fish are taken in nets, and not
killed by bullets. When he turns moose, again, he will be
treated like a moose.
Ay, have your talk, Rivenoak; make the most of your
advantage. 'T is your right, I suppose, and I know it is
your gift. On that p'int there'll be no words atween us;
for all men must and ought to follow their gifts. Howsever,
when your women begin to ta'nt and abuse me, as I suppose
will soon happen, let 'em remember that if a pale-face
struggles
for life so long as it's lawful and manful, he knows how
to loosen his hold on it, decently, when he feels that the
time has come. I'm your capt
y
ve; work your will on
me.
My brother has had a long run on the hills, and a
pleasant sail on the water, returned Rivenoak, more mildly,
smiling, at the same time, in a way that his listener knew
denoted pacific intentions. He has seen the woods; he
has seen the water; which does he like best? Perhaps,
he has seen enough, to change his mind, and make him
hear reason.
Speak out, Huron. Something is in your thoughts,
and the sooner it is said, the sooner you'll get my answer.
That is straight! There is no turning in the talk of
my pale-face friend, though he is a fox in running. I will
speak to him; his ears are now open wider than before, and
his eyes are not shut. The Sumach is poorer than ever.
Once she had a brother and a husband. She had children,
too. The time came, and the husband started for the happy
hunting-grounds, without saying farewell; he left her alone
with his children. This he could not help, or he would not
have done it; le Loup Cervier was a good husband. It was
pleasant to see the venison, and wild ducks, and geese, and
bear's meat, that hung in his lodge, in winter. It is now
gone; it will not keep in warm weather. Who shall bring
it back again? Some thought the brother would not forget
his sister, and that, next winter, he would see that the lodge
should not be empty. We thought this; but the Panther
yelled, and followed the husband on the path of death.
They are now trying which shall first reach the happy
hunting-grounds. Some think the Lynx can run fastest,
and some think the Panther can jump the farthest. The
Sumach
thinks both will travel so fast and so far, that neither
will ever come back. Who shall feed her and her young?
The man who told her husband and her brother to quit her
lodge, that there might be room for him to come into it.
He is a great hunter, and we know that the woman will
never want.
Ay, Huron, this is soon settled, accordin' to your
notions
;
but it goes sorely ag'in the grain of a white man's
feelin's. I've heard of men's saving their lives this-away,
and I've know'd them that would prefer death to such a sort
of captivity. For my part, I do not seek my end; nor do I
seek matrimony.
The pale-face will think of this while my people get
ready for the council. He will be told what will happen.
Let him remember how hard it is to lose a husband and a
brother. Go: when we want him, the name of Deerslayer
will be called.
This conversation had been held with no one near but the
speakers. Of all the band that had so lately thronged the
place, Rivenoak alone was visible. The rest seemed to
have totally abandoned the spot. Even the furniture, clothes,
arms, and other property of the camp had entirely
disappeared
,
and the place bore no other proofs of the crowd that
had so lately occupied it, than the traces of their fires and
resting-places, and the trodden earth, that still showed the
marks of their feet. So sudden and unexpected a change
caused Deerslayer a good deal of surprise and some
uneasiness
,
for he had never known it to occur, in the course of
his experience among the Delawares. He suspected,
however
,
and rightly, that a change of encampment was
intended
,
and that the mystery of the movement was resorted to,
in order to work on his apprehensions.
Rivenoak walked up the vista of trees, as soon as he
ceased speaking, leaving Deerslayer by himself. The chief
disappeared behind the covers of the forest, and one
unpractised
in such scenes might have believed the prisoner left to
the dictates of his own judgment. But the young man, while
he felt a little amazement at the dramatic aspect of things,
knew his enemies too well to fancy himself at liberty, or a
free agent. Still he was ignorant how far the Hurons meant
to carry their artifices, and he determined to bring the
question
,
as soon as practicable, to the proof. Affecting an
indifference
he was far from feeling, he strolled about the area,
gradually getting nearer and nearer to the spot where he
had landed, when he suddenly quickened his pace, though
carefully avoiding all appearance of flight, and, pushing
aside the bushes, he stepped upon the beach. The canoe
was gone, nor could he see any traces of it, after walking
to the northern and southern verges of the point, and
examining
the shores in both directions. It was evidently
removed
beyond his reach and knowledge, and under
circumstances
to show that such had been the intention of the
savages.
Deerslayer now better understood his actual situation.
He was a prisoner on the narrow tongue of land, vigilantly
watched beyond a question, and with no other means of
escape
than that of swimming. He again thought of this last
expedient, but the certainty that the canoe would be sent in
chase, and the desperate nature of the chances of success,
deterred him from the undertaking. While on the strand,
he came to a spot where the bushes had been cut, and
thrown into a small pile. Removing a few of the upper
branches, he found beneath them the dead body of the
Panther
.
He knew that it was kept until the savages might
find a place to inter it, when it would be beyond the reach
19*
of the scalping-knife. He gazed wistfully towards the
castle, but there all seemed to be silent and desolate; and a
feeling of loneliness and desertion came over him to increase
the gloom of the moment.
God's will be done! murmured the young man, as he
walked sorrowfully away from the beach, entering again
beneath the arches of the wood; God's will be done, on
'arth as it is in heaven! I did hope that my days would
not be numbered so soon; but it matters little, after all. A
few more winters, and a few more summers, and 't would
have been over, accordin to natur'. Ah's me! the young
and act
y
ve seldom think death possible, till he grins in their
faces, and tells 'em the hour is come!
While this solioquy was being pronounced, the hunter
advanced into the area, where to his surprise he saw Hetty
alone, evidently awaiting his return. The girl carried the
bible under her arm, and her face, over which a shadow of
gentle melancholy was usually thrown, now seemed sad and
downcast. Moving nearer, Deerslayer spoke.
Poor Hetty, he said, times have been so troublesome,
of late, that I'd altogether forgotten you; we meet, as it
might be, to mourn over what is to happen. I wonder what
has become of Chingachgook and Wah!
Why did you kill the Huron, Deerslayer, returned the
girl, reproachfully. Don't you know your
commandments
,
which say, `Thou shalt not kill!' They tell me
you have now slain the woman's husband and brother.
It's true, my good Hetty,'tis gospel truth, and I'll not
deny what has come to pass. But, you must remember,
gal, that many things are lawful in war, which would be
onlawful in peace. The husband was shot in open fight;
or, open so far as I was consarned, while he had a better
cover than common;and the brother brought his end on
himself, by casting his tomahawk at an unarmed prisoner.
Did you witness that deed, gal?
I saw it, and was sorry it happened, Deerslayer; for I
hoped you wouldn't have returned blow for blow, but good
for evil.
Ah, Hetty, that may do among the missionaries, but
'twould make an onsartain life in the woods. The Panther
craved my blood, and he was foolish enough to throw arms
into my hands, at the very moment he was striving after it.
'Twould have been ag'in natur' not to raise a hand in such
a trial, and 'twould have done discredit to my training and
gifts. No, no; I'm as willing to give every man his own,
as another; and so I hope you'll testify to them that will
be likely to question you as to what you've seen this day.
Deerslayer, do you mean to marry Sumach, now she
has neither husband nor brother to feed her?
Are such your idees of matrimony, Hetty? Ought the
young to wive with the oldthe pale-face with the red-skin
the Christian with the heathen? It's ag'in reason and
natur', and so you'll see, if you think of it a moment.
I've always heard mother say, returned Hetty,
averting
her face, more from a feminine instinct, than from any
consciousness of wrong, that people should never marry,
until they loved each other better than brothers and sisters;
and I suppose that is what you mean. Sumach
is
old, and
you
are
young.
Ay, and she's red, and I'm white. Besides, Hetty;
suppose you was a wife, now, having married some young
man of your own years, and state, and colourHurry
Harry
,
for instance,Deerslayer selected this example, simply
from the circumstance that he was the only young man
known to both,and that he had fallen on a war-path,
would you wish to take to your bosom, for a husband, the
man that slew him?
Oh! no, no, no, returned the girl, shuddering.
That
would be wicked, as well as heartless! No Christian girl
could, or would, do that. I never shall be the wife of
Hurry
,
I know; but were he my husband, no man should ever
be it again, after his death.
I thought it would get to this, Hetty, when you come to
understand sarcumstances. 'Tis a moral impossibility that
I should ever marry Sumach; and, though Indian weddin's
have no priests, and not much religion, a white man who
knows his gifts and duties, can't profit by that, and so make
his escape at the fitting time. I do think death would be
more nat'ral like, and welcome, than wedlock with this
woman.
Don't say it too loud, interrupted Hetty, impatiently;
I suppose she will not like to hear it. I'm sure Hurry
would rather marry even me, than suffer torments, though I
am
feeble-minded; and I am sure it would kill me to think
he'd prefer death to being my husband.
Ay, gal; you an't Sumach, but a comely young
Christian
,
with a good heart, pleasant smile, and kind eye. Hurry
might be proud to get you, and that, too, not in misery and
sorrow, but in his best and happiest days. Howsever, take
my advice, and never talk to Hurry about these things; he's
only a borderer, at the best.
I wouldn't tell him, for the world! exclaimed the girl,
looking about her, like one affrighted, and blushing, she
knew not why. Mother always said young women shouldn't
be forward, and speak their minds before they're asked;
oh! I never forget what mother told me. 'Tis a pity Hurry
is so handsome, Deerslayer; I do think fewer girls would
like him then, and he would sooner know his own mind.
Poor gal, poor gal, it's plain enough how it is; but the
Lord will bear in mind one of your simple heart, and kind
feelin's! We'll talk no more of these things; if you had
reason, you'd be sorrowful at having let others so much
into your secret. Tell me, Hetty, what has become of all
the Hurons, and why they let you roam about the p'int, as
if you, too, was a prisoner?
I'm no prisoner, Deerslayer, but a free girl, and go
when and where I please. Nobody dare hurt
me!
If they
did, God would be angryas I can show them in the Bible.
NonoHetty Hutter is not afraid;
she
's in good hands.
The Hurons are up yonder in the woods, and keep a good
watch on us both, I'll answer for it, since all the women
and children are on the look-out. Some are burying the
body of the poor girl who was shot last night, so that the
enemy
and the wild beasts can't find it. I told'em that father
and mother lay in the lake, but I wouldn't let them know in
what part of it, for Judith and I don't want any of their
heathenish company in our burying-ground.
Ah's! me;Well, it
is
an awful despatch to be
standing
here, alive and angry, and with the feelin's up and
furious
,
one hour, and then to be carried away at the next, and
put out of sight of mankind in a hole in the 'arth! No one
knows what will happen to him on a war-path, that's
sartain
.
Here the stirring of leaves and the cracking of dried
twigs interrupted the discourse, and apprised Deerslayer of
the approach of his enemies. The Hurons closed around
the spot that had been prepared for the coming scene, and
in the centre of which the intended victim now stood, in a
circlethe armed men being so distributed among the
feebler
members of the band, that there was no safe opening
through which the prisoner could break. But the latter no
longer contemplated flight; the recent trial having satisfied
him of his inability to escape, when pursued so closely by
numbers. On the contrary, all his energies were aroused,
in order to meet his expected fate, with a calmness that
should do credit to his colour and his manhood; one equally
removed from recreant alarm and savage boasting.
When Rivenoak reappeared in the circle, he occupied his
old place at the head of the area. Several of the elder
warriors
stood near him; but, now that the brother of Sumach
had fallen, there was no longer any recognised chief
present
,
whose influence and authority offered a dangerous
rivalry to his own. Nevertheless, it is well known that
little which could be called monarchical, or despotic,
entered
into the politics of the North American tribes, although
the first colonists, bringing with them to this hemisphere
the notions and opinions of their own countries, often
dignified
the chief men of those primitive nations with the titles
of kings and princes. Hereditary influence did certainly
exist; but there is much reason to believe it existed rather
as a consequence of hereditary merit and acquired
qualifications
,
than as a birth-right. Rivenoak, however, had not
even this claimhaving risen to consideration purely by
the force of talents, sagacity, and, as Bacon expresses it, in
relation to all distinguished statesmen, by a union of great
and mean qualities; a truth of which the career of the
profound Englishman himself furnishes so apt an
illustration
.
Next to arms, eloquence offers the great avenue to
popular
favour, whether it be in civilized or savage life; and
Rivenoak had succeeded, as so many have succeeded before
him, quite as much by rendering fallacies acceptable to his
listeners, as by any profound or learned expositions of
truth, or the accuracy of his logic. Nevertheless, he had
influence; and was far from being altogether without just
claims to its possession. Like most men who reason more
than they feel, the Huron was not addicted to the indulgence
of the mere ferocious passions of his people: he had been
commonly found on the side of mercy, in all the scenes of
vindictive torture and revenge that had occurred in his tribe,
since his own attainment to power. On the present
occasion
,
he was reluctant to proceed to extremities, although
the provocation was so great; still it exceeded his ingenuity
to see how that alternative could well be avoided. Sumach
resented her rejection more than she did the deaths of her
husband and brother, and there was little probability that
the woman would pardon a man who had so unequivocally
preferred death to her embraces. Without her forgiveness,
there was scarce a hope that the tribe could be induced to
overlook its loss; and even to Rivenoak, himself, much as
he was disposed to pardon, the fate of our hero now
appeared
to be almost hopelessly sealed.
When the whole band was arrayed around the captive, a
grave silence, so much the more threatening from its
profound
quiet, pervaded the place. Deerslayer perceived that
the women and boys had been preparing splinters of the fat
pine roots, which he well knew were to be stuck into his
flesh, and set in flames, while two or three of the young
men held the thongs of bark with which he was to be bound.
The smoke of a distant fire announced that the burning
brands were in preparation, and several of the elder
warriors
passed their fingers over the edges of their tomahawks,
as if to prove their keenness and temper. Even the knives
seemed loosened in their sheathes, impatient for the bloody
and merciless work to begin.
Killer of the Deer, recommenced Rivenoak, certainly
without any signs of sympathy or pity in his manner, though
with calmness and dignity; Killer of the Deer, it is time
that my people knew their minds. The sun is no longer
over our heads; tired of waiting on the Hurons, he has
begun to fall near the pines on this side of the valley. He
is travelling fast towards the country of our French fathers;
it is to warn his children that their lodges are empty, and
that they ought to be at home. The roaming wolf has his
den, and he goes to it, when he wishes to see his young.
The Iroquois are not poorer than the wolves. They have
villages, and wigwams, and fields of corn; the good spirits
will be tired of watching them alone. My people must go
back, and see to their own business. There will be joy in
the lodges when they hear our whoop from the forest! It
will be a sorrowful whoop; when it is understood, grief will
come after it. There will be one scalp-whoop, but there
will be only one. We have the fur of the Muskrat; his
body is among the fishes. Deerslayer must say whether
another scalp shall be on our pole. Two lodges are empty;
a scalp, living or dead, is wanted at each door.
Then take 'em dead, Huron, firmly, but altogether
without dramatic boasting, returned the captive. My hour
is come, I do suppose; and what must be, must. If you are
bent on the tortur', I'll do my indivours to bear up ag'in it,
though no man can say how far his natur' will stand pain,
until he's been tried.
The pale-face cur begins to put his tail between his
legs! cried a young and garrulous savage, who bore the
appropriate title of the Corbeau Rouge; a
sobriquet
he had
gained from the French, by his facility in making
unseasonable
noises, and an undue tendency to hear his own
voice: he is no warrior; he has killed the Loup Cervier
when looking behind him not to see the flash of his own rifle.
He grunts like a hog, already; when the Huron women
begin to torment him, he will cry like the young of the
catamount. He is a Delaware woman, dressed in the skin
of a Yengeese!
Have your say, young man; have your say, returned
Deerslayer, unmoved; you know no better, and I can
overlook
it. Talking may aggravate women, but can hardly
make knives sharper, fire hotter, or rifles more sartain.
Rivenoak now interfered, reproving the Red Crow for his
premature interference, and then directing the proper
persons
to bind the captive. This expedient was adopted, not
from any apprehensions that he would escape, or from any
necessity, that was yet apparent, of his being unable to
endure
the torture with his limbs free, but from an ingenious
design of making him feel his helplessness, and of gradually
sapping his resolution, by undermining it, as it might be,
little by little. Deerslayer offered no resistance. He
submitted
his arms and his legs, freely if not cheerfully, to the
ligaments of bark, which were bound around them, by order
of the chief, in a way to produce as little pain as possible.
These directions were secret, and given in the hope that the
captive would finally save himself from any serious bodily
suffering, by consenting to take the Sumach for a wife. As
soon as the body of Deerslayer was withed in bark
sufficiently
to create a lively sense of helplessness, he was
literally
carried to a young tree, and bound against it, in a way
that effectually prevented it from moving, as well as from
falling. The hands were laid flat against the legs, and
thongs were passed over all, in a way nearly to incorporate
the prisoner with the tree. His cap was then removed, and
he was left half-standing, half-sustained by his bonds, to face
the coming scene in the best manner he could.
Previously to proceeding to any thing like extremities, it
was the wish of Rivenoak to put his captive's resolution to
the proof, by renewing the attempt at a compromise. This
could be effected only in one manner, the acquiescence of
the Sumach being indispensably necessary to a compromise
of her right to be revenged. With this view, then, the woman
was next desired to advance, and to look to her own
interest
;
no agent being considered as efficient as the principal
herself in this negotiation. The Indian females, when girls,
are usually mild and submissive, with musical tones,
pleasant
voices, and merry laughs; but toil and suffering
generally
deprive them of most of these advantages by the time
they have reached an age which the Sumach had long
before
passed. To render their voices harsh, it would seem
to require active, malignant passions, though, when excited,
their screams can rise to a sufficiently conspicuous degree
of discordancy to assert their claim to possess this
distinctive
peculiarity of the sex. The Sumach was not altogether
without feminine attraction, however, and had so recently
been deemed handsome in her tribe, as not to have yet
learned
the full influence that time and exposure produce on
man as well as on woman. By an arrangement of
Rivenoak's
,
some of the women around her, had been employing
the time in endeavouring to persuade the bereaved widow
that there was still a hope Deerslayer might be prevailed on
to enter her wigwam, in preference to entering the world of
spirits, and this, too, with a success that previous symptoms
scarcely justified. All this was the result of a resolution
on the part of the chief to leave no proper means
unemployed
,
in order to get the greatest hunter that was then
thought to exist in all that region, transferred to his own
nation, as well as a husband for a woman who he felt would
be likely to be troublesome, were any of her claims to the
attention and care of the tribe overlooked.
In conformity with this scheme, the Sumach had been
secretly
advised to advance into the circle, and to make her
appeal to the prisoner's sense of justice before the band had
recourse to the last experiment. The woman, nothing loth,
consented; for there was some such attraction, in becoming
the wife of a noted hunter, among the females of the tribes,
as is experienced by the sex in more refined life, when they
bestow their hands on the affluent. As the duties of a
mother
were thought to be paramount to all other
considerations
,
the widow felt none of that embarrassment in
preferring
her claims, to which even a female fortune-hunter
among ourselves, might be liable. When she stood forth,
before the whole party, therefore, the children that she led
by the hand fully justified all she did.
You see me before you, cruel pale-face, the woman
commenced; your spirit must tell you my errand. I have
found
you;
I cannot find le Loup Cervier, nor the Panther.
I have looked for them, in the lake, in the woods, in the
clouds. I cannot say where they have gone.
No man knows, good Sumach, no man knows,
interposed
the captive. When the spirit leaves the body it
passes into a world beyond our knowledge, and the wisest
way, for them that are left behind, is to hope for the best.
No doubt both your warriors have gone to the happy
hunting-grounds
,
and at the proper time you will see 'em ag'in,
in their improved state. The wife and sister of braves
must have looked forward to some such tarmination of their
'arthly careers.
Cruel pale-face, what had my warriors done that you
should slay them? They were the best hunters, and the
boldest young men of their tribe; the Great Spirit intended
that they should live until they withered like the branches
of the hemlock, and fell of their own weight.
Vol. II.20
Nay, nay, good Sumach, interrupted the Deerslayer,
whose love of truth was too indomitable to listen to such
hyperbole, with patience, even though it came from the torn
breast of a widow,Nay, nay, good Sumach, this is a little
out-doing red-skin privileges. Young man was neither, any
more than you can be called a young woman; and as to the
Great Spirit's intending that they should fall otherwise than
they did, that's a grievous mistake, inasmuch as what the
Great Spirit intends, is sartain to come to pass. Then,
ag'in, it's plain enough neither of your fri'nds did me any
harm; I raised my hand ag'in 'em on account of what they
were
striving
to do, rather than what they did. This is
nat'ral law, `to do, lest you should be done by.'
It is so. Sumach has but one tongue; she can tell but
one story. The pale-face struck the Hurons, lest the
Hurons
should strike him. The Hurons are a just nation;
they will forget it. The chiefs will shut their eyes, and
pretend
not to have seen it. The young men will believe the
Panther and the Lynx have gone to far-off hunts; and the
Sumach will take her children by the hand, and go into the
lodge of the pale-face, and say, `See; these are
your
children
they
are also mine; feed us, and we will live with
you.'
The tarms are onadmissible, woman; and, though I
feel for your losses, which must be hard to bear, the tarms
cannot be accepted. As to givin' you ven'son, in case we
lived near enough together, that would be no great expl'ite;
but as for becomin' your husband, and the father of your
children, to be honest with you, I feel no callin'
that-a-way
.
Look at this boy, cruel pale-face; he has no father to
teach him to kill the deer, or to take scalps. See this girl;
what young man will come to look for a wife in a lodge
that has no head? There are more among my people in
the Canadas, and the Killer of Deer will find as many
mouths to feed, as his heart can wish for.
I tell you, woman, exclaimed Deerslayer, whose
imagination
was far from seconding the appeal of the widow,
and who began to grow restif under the vivid pictures she
was drawing, all this is nothing to me. People and
kindred
must take care of their own fatherless, leaving them
that have no children to their own loneliness. As for me,
I have no offspring, and I want no wife. Now, go away,
Sumach; leave me in the hands of your chiefs; for my
colour
,
and gifts, and natur' itself, cry out ag'in the idee of
taking you for a wife.
It is unnecessary to expatiate on the effect of this
down-right
refusal of the woman's proposals. If there was any
thing like tenderness in her bosom,and no woman was,
probably, ever entirely without that feminine quality,it all
disappeared at this plain announcement. Fury, rage,
mortified
pride, and a volcano of wrath, burst out at one explosion,
converting her into a sort of maniac, as it might be at the
touch of a magician's wand. Without deigning a reply in
words, she made the arches of the forest ring with screams,
and then flew forward at her victim, seizing him by the
hair, which she appeared resolute to draw out by the roots.
It was some time before her grasp could be loosened.
Fortunately
for the prisoner, her rage was blind, since his total
helplessness left him entirely at her mercy; had it been
better
directed, it might have proved fatal before any relief
could have been offered. As it was, she did succeed in
wrenching out two or three hands'-full of hair, before the
young men could tear her away from her victim.
The insult that had been offered to the Sumach was
deemed
an insult to the whole tribe; not so much, however, on
account of any respect that was felt for the woman, as on
account of the honour of the Huron nation. Sumach,
herself
,
was generally considered to be as acid as the berry
from which she derived her name; and now that her great
supporters, her husband and brother, were both gone, few
cared about concealing their aversion. Nevertheless, it had
become a point of honour to punish the pale-face who
disdained
a Huron woman, and more particularly, one who
coolly preferred death to relieving the tribe from the support
of a widow and her children. The young men showed
an impatience to begin to torture, that Rivenoak understood;
and as his elder associates manifested no disposition to
permit
any longer delay, he was compelled to give the signal
for the infernal work to proceed.
CHAPTER XIV.
The ugly bear now minded not the stake,
Nor how the cruel mastiffs do him tear;
The stag lay still, unroused from the brake,
The foamy boar feared not the hunter's spear:
All thing was still in desert, bush, and briar.
Lord Dorset
.
It
was one of the common expedients of the savages, on
such occasions, to put the nerves of their victims to the
severest
proofs. On the other hand, it was a matter of Indian
pride, to betray no yielding to terror, or pain; but for the
prisoner to provoke his enemies to such acts of violence as
would soonest produce death. Many a warrior had been
known to bring his own sufferings to a more speedy
termination
,
by taunting reproaches and reviling language, when
he found that his physical system was giving way under the
agony of sufferings, produced by a hellish ingenuity, that
might well eclipse all that has been said of the infernal
devices
of religious persecution. This happy expedient of
taking refuge from the ferocity of his foes, in their passions,
was denied Deerslayer, however, by his peculiar notions of
the duty of a white man; and he had stoutly made up his
mind to endure every thing, in preference to disgracing his
colour.
No sooner did the young men understand that they were
at liberty to commence, than some of the boldest and most
forward among them sprang into the arena, tomahawk in
hand. Here they prepared to throw that dangerous weapon,
the object being to strike the tree, as near as possible to the
victim's head, without absolutely hitting him. This was so
hazardous an experiment, that none but those who were
known to be exceedingly expert with the weapon, were
allowed
to enter the lists, at all, lest an early death might
interfere
with the expected entertainment. In the truest hands,
it was seldom that the captive escaped injury in these trials;
and it often happened that death followed, even when the
blow was not premeditated. In the particular case of our
hero, Rivenoak and the older warriors were apprehensive
that the example of the Panther's fate, might prove a motive
with some fiery spirit, suddenly to sacrifice his conqueror,
when the temptation of effecting it in precisely the same
manner
,
and possibly with the identical weapon with which the
warrior had fallen, offered. This circumstance, of itself,
rendered the ordeal of the tomahawk, doubly critical for the
Deerslayer.
It would seem, however, that all who now entered, what
we shall call the lists, were more disposed to exhibit their
own dexterity, than to resent the deaths of their comrades.
Each prepared himself for the trial, with the feelings of
rivalry
,
rather than with the desire for vengeance; and for
the first few minutes, the prisoner had little more connection
with the result, than grew out of the interest that necessarily
attached itself to a living target. The young men were
eager, instead of being fierce, and Rivenoak thought he still
saw signs of being able to save the life of the captive, when
the vanity of the young men had been gratified; always
admitting
,
that it was not sacrificed to the delicate experiments
that were about to be made.
The first youth who presented himself for the trial, was
called The Raven, having as yet had no opportunity of
obtaining
a more warlike
sobriquet
. He was remarkable for
high pretension, rather than for skill, or exploits; and those
who knew his character, thought the captive in imminent
danger, when he took his stand, and poised the tomahawk.
Nevertheless, the young man was good-natured, and no
thought was uppermost in his mind, other than the desire to
make a better cast, than any of his fellows. Deerslayer got
an inkling of this warrior's want of reputation, by the
injunctions
that he had received from the seniors; who, indeed,
would have objected to his appearing in the arena, at all, but
for an influence derived from his father, an aged warrior of
great merit, who was then in the lodges of the tribe. Still,
our hero maintained an appearance of self-possession. He
had made up his mind that his hour was come, and it would
have been a mercy, instead of a calamity, to fall by the
unsteadiness
of the first hand that was raised against him.
After a suitable number of flourishes, and gesticulations, that
20*
promised much more than he could perform, the Raven let
the tomahawk quit his hand. The weapon whirled through
the air, with the usual evolutions, cut a chip from the
sapling
to which the prisoner was bound, within a few inches
of his cheek, and stuck in a large oak that grew several
yards behind him. This was decidedly a bad effort, and a
common sneer proclaimed as much, to the great
mortification
of the young man. On the other hand, there was a
general, but suppressed murmur of admiration, at the
steadiness
with which the captive stood the trial. The head was
the only part he could move, and this had been purposely
left free, that the tormentors might have the amusement, and
the tormented endure the shame, of dodging, and
otherwise
attempting to avoid the blows. Deerslayer disappointed
these hopes, by a command of nerve that rendered his whole
body as immovable as the tree to which it was bound. Nor
did he even adopt the natural and usual expedient of shutting
his eyes; the firmest and oldest warrior of the red men
never having more disdainfully denied himself this advantage,
under similar circumstances.
The Raven had no sooner made his unsuccessful and
puerile effort, than he was succeeded by le Daim-Mose, or
The Moose; a middle-aged warrior, who was particularly
skilful in the use of the tomahawk, and from whose attempt
the spectators confidently looked for gratification. This
man had none of the good-nature of the Raven, but he
would gladly have sacrificed the captive to his hatred of the
pale-faces generally, were it not for the greater interest he
felt in his own success as one particularly skilful in the use
of this weapon. He took his stand quietly, but with an air
of confidence, poised his little axe but a single instant,
advanced
a foot with a quick motion, and threw. Deerslayer
saw the keen instrument whirling towards him, and
believed
all was over; still, he was not touched. The
tomahawk
had actually bound the head of the captive to the
tree, by carrying before it some of his hair; having buried
itself deep beneath the soft bark. A general yell expressed
the delight of the spectators, and the Moose felt his heart
soften a little towards the prisoner, whose steadiness of
nerve alone, enabled him to give this evidence of his
consummate
skill.
Le Daim-Mose was succeeded by the Bounding Boy, or
le Garon qui Bondi
, who came leaping into the circle, like
a hound, or a goat, at play. This was one of those elastic
youths, whose muscles seemed always in motion, and who
either affected, or who from habit was actually unable to
move in any other manner, than by showing the antics just
mentioned. Nevertheless, he was both brave and skilful,
and had gained the respect of his people, by deeds in war,
as well as success in the hunts. A far nobler name would
long since have fallen to his share, had not a Frenchman
of rank inadvertently given him this
sobriquet,
which he
religiously preserved as coming from his great father, who
lived beyond the wide salt lake. The Bounding Boy
skipped
about in front of the captive, menacing him with his
tomahawk, now on one side, and now on another, and then
again in front, in the vain hope of being able to extort some
sign of fear, by this parade of danger. At length
Deerslayer's
patience became exhausted by all this mummery,
and he spoke, for the first time since the trial had actually
commenced.
Throw away, Huron! he cried, or your tomahawk
will forget its ar'n'd. Why do you keep loping about like
a fa'a'n that's showing its dam how well it can skip, when
you're a warrior grown, yourself, and a warrior grown
defies
you and all your silly antics? Throw, or the Huron
gals will laugh in your face.
Although not intended to produce such an effect, the last
words aroused the Bounding warrior to fury. The same
nervous excitability which rendered him so active in his
person, made it difficult to repress his feelings, and the
words were scarcely past the lips of the speaker, than the
tomahawk left the hand of the Indian. Nor was it cast
without good-will, and a fierce determination to slay. Had
the intention been less deadly, the danger might have been
greater. The aim was uncertain, and the weapon glanced
near the cheek of the captive, slightly cutting the shoulder,
in its evolutions. This was the first instance in which any
other object, than that of terrifying the prisoner, and of
displaying
skill, had been manifested; and the Bounding Boy
was immediately led from the arena, and was warmly
rebuked
for his intemperate haste, which had come so near
defeating all the hopes of the band.
To this irritable person succeeded several other young
warriors, who not only hurled the tomahawk but who cast
the knife, a far more dangerous experiment, with reckless
indifference; yet they always manifested a skill that
prevented
any injury to the captive. Several times Deerslayer
was grazed, but in no instance did he receive what might
be termed a wound. The unflinching firmness with which
he faced his assailants, more especially in the sort of rally
with which this trial terminated, excited a profound respect
in the spectators; and when the chiefs announced that the
prisoner had well withstood the trials of the knife and the
tomahawk, there was not a single individual in the band
who really felt any hostility towards him, with the exception
of Sumach and the Bounding Boy. These two
discontented
spirits got together, it is true, feeding each other's ire;
but, as yet, their malignant feelings were confined very
much to themselves, though there existed the danger that
the others, ere long, could not fail to be excited by their own
efforts into that demoniacal state which usually
accompanied
all similar scenes among the red-men.
Rivenoak now told his people that the pale-face had proved
himself to be a man. He might live with the Delawares,
but he had not been made woman with that tribe. He
wished
to know whether it was the desire of the Hurons to
proceed
any further. Even the gentlest of the females,
however
,
had received too much satisfaction in the late trials
to forego their expectations of a gratifying exhibition;
and there was but one voice in the request to proceed. The
politic chief, who had some such desire to receive so
celebrated
a hunter into his tribe, as a European minister has
to devise a new and available means of taxation, sought
every plausible means of arresting the trial in season; for
he well knew, if permitted to go far enough to arouse the
more ferocious passions of the tormentors, it would be as
easy to dam the waters of the great lakes of his own
region
,
as to attempt to arrest them in their bloody career.
He therefore called four or five of the best marksmen to
him, and bid them put the captive to the proof of the rifle,
while, at the same time, he cautioned them touching the
necessity
of their maintaining their own credit, by the closest
attention to the manner of exhibiting their skill.
When Deerslayer saw the chosen warriors step into the
circle, with their arms prepared for service, he felt some
such relief as the miserable sufferer, who has long endured
the agonies of disease, feels at the certain approach of death.
Any trifling variance in the aim of this formidable weapon
would prove fatal; since, the head being the target, or
rather
the point it was desired to graze without injury, an inch
or two of difference in the line of projection, must at once
determine the question of life or death.
In the torture by the rifle there was none of the latitude
permitted that appeared in the case of even Gesler's apple,
a hair's-breadth being, in fact, the utmost limits that an
expert
marksman would allow himself on an occasion like
this. Victims were frequently shot through the head by
too eager or unskilful hands; and it often occurred that,
exasperated by the fortitude and taunts of the prisoner,
death was dealt intentionally in a moment of ungovernable
irritation. All this Deerslayer well knew, for it was in
relating
the traditions of such scenes, as well as of the battles
and victories of their people, that the old men beguiled the
long winter evenings in their cabins. He now fully
expected
the end of his career, and experienced a sort of
melancholy
pleasure in the idea that he was to fall by a weapon
as much beloved as the rifle. A slight interruption,
however
,
took place before the business was allowed to
proceed
.
Hetty Hutter witnessed all that passed, and the scene at
first had pressed upon her feeble mind in a way to paralyze
it entirely; but, by this time, she had rallied, and was
growing
indignant at the unmerited suffering the Indians were
inflicting on her friend. Though timid, and shy as the
young of the deer, on so many occasions, this right-feeling
girl was always intrepid in the cause of humanity; the
lessons
of her mother, and the impulses of her own heart,
perhaps we might say the promptings of that unseen and
pure spirit that seemed ever to watch over and direct her
actionsuniting to keep down the apprehensions of woman,
and to impel her to be bold and resolute. She now appeared
in the circle, gentle, feminine, even bashful in mien, as
usual, but earnest in her words and countenance, speaking
like one who knew herself to be sustained by the high
authority
of God.
Why do you torment Deerslayer, red men? she asked.
What has he done that you trifle with his life; who has
given you the right to be his judges? Suppose one of your
knives, or tomahawks, had hit him; what Indian among you
all could cure the wound you would make. Besides, in
harming Deerslayer, you injure your own friend; when
father and Hurry Harry came after your scalps, he refused
to be of the party, and staid in the canoe by himself. You
are tormenting your friend, in tormenting this young man!
The Hurons listened with grave attention, and one among
them, who understood English, translated what had been
said into their native tongue. As soon as Rivenoak was made
acquainted with the purport of her address, he answered it
in his own dialect; the interpreter conveying it to the girl
in English.
My daughter is very welcome to speak, said the stern
old orator, using gentle intonations and smiling as kindly
as if addressing a childthe Hurons are glad to hear her
voice; they listen to what she says. The Great Spirit often
speaks to men with such tongues. This time her eyes have
not been open wide enough, to see all that has happened.
Deerslayer did not come for our scalps, that is true; why
did he not come? Here they are, on our heads; the
war-locks
are ready to be taken hold of; a bold enemy ought to
stretch out his hand to seize them. The Iroquois are too
great a nation to punish men that take scalps. What they
do themselves, they like to see others do. Let my
daughter
look around her, and count my warriors. Had I as
many hands as four warriors, their fingers would be fewer
than my people, when they came into your hunting-grounds.
Now, a whole hand is missing. Where are the fingers?
Two have been cut off by this pale-face; my Hurons wish
to see if he did this by means of a stout heart, or by
treachery
;
like a skulking fox, or like a leaping panther.
You know yourself, Huron, how one of them fell. I
saw it, and you all saw it, too. 'T was too bloody to look
at; but it was not Deerslayer's fault. Your warrior sought
his life, and he defended himself. I don't know whether the
good book says that it was right, but all men will do that.
Come, if you want to know which of you can shoot best,
give Deerslayer a rifle, and then you will find how much
more expert he is, than any of your warriors; yes, than
all
of them together!
Could one have looked upon such a scene with
indifference
,
he would have been amused at the gravity with which
the savages listened to the translation of this unusual
request
.
No taunt, no smile mingled with their surprise; for
Hetty had a character and manner too saintly to subject her
infirmity to the mockings of the rude and ferocious. On
the contrary, she was answered with respectful attention.
My daughter does not always talk like a chief at a
council-fire, returned Rivenoak, or she would not have
said this. Two of my warriors have fallen by the blows of
our prisoner; their grave is too small to hold a third. The
Hurons do not like to crowd their dead. If there is another
spirit about to set out for the far-off world, it must not be
the spirit of a Huron; it must be the spirit of a pale-face.
Go, daughter, and sit by Sumach, who is in grief; let the
Huron warriors show how well they can shoot; let the
paleface
show how little he cares for their bullets.
Hetty's mind was unequal to a sustained discussion, and,
accustomed to defer to the directions of her seniors, she did
as told, seating herself passively on a log by the side of the
Sumach, and averting her face from the painful scene that
was occurring within the circle.
The warriors, as soon as this interruption had ceased,
resumed
their places, and again prepared to exhibit their skill,
as there was a double object in view, that of putting the
constancy
of the captive to the proof, and that of showing how
steady were the hands of the marksmen under circumstances
of excitement. The distance was small, and, in one sense,
safe. But in diminishing the distance taken by the
tormentors
,
the trial to the nerves of the captive was essentially
increased
.
The face of Deerslayer, indeed, was just removed
sufficiently from the ends of the guns to escape the effects
of the flash, and his steady eye was enabled to look directly
into their muzzles, as it might be, in anticipation of the fatal
messenger that was to issue from each. The cunning
Hurons
well knew this fact; and scarce one levelled his piece
without first causing it to point as near as possible at the
forehead of the prisoner, in the hope that his fortitude would
fail him, and that the band would enjoy the triumph of
seeing
a victim quail under their ingenious cruelty.
Nevertheless
,
each of the competitors was still careful not to
injure
,
the disgrace of striking prematurely being second only
to that of failing altogether in attaining the object. Shot
after shot was made; all the bullets coming in close proximity
to the Deerslayer's head, without touching it. Still no one
could detect even the twitching of a muscle on the part of
the captive, or the slightest winking of an eye. This
indomitable
resolution, which so much exceeded every thing
of its kind that any present had before witnessed, might be
referred to three distinct causes. The first was resignation
to his fate, blended with natural steadiness of deportment;
for our hero had calmly made up his mind that he must die,
and preferred this mode to any other; the second was his
great familiarity with this particular weapon, which deprived
it of all the terror that is usually connected with the mere
form of the danger; and the third was this familiarity
carried
out in practice, to a degree so nice as to enable the
intended
victim to tell, within an inch, the precise spot where
each bullet must strike, for he calculated its range by
looking
in at the bore of the piece. So exact was Deerslayer's
estimation of the line of fire, that his pride of feeling finally
got the better of his resignation, and, when five or six had
discharged their bullets into the tree, he could not refrain
from expressing his contempt at their want of hand and eye.
You may call this shooting, Mingos, he exclaimed,
but we've squaws among the Delawares, and I've known
Dutch gals on the Mohawk, that could outdo your greatest
indivours. Ondo these arms of mine, put a rifle into my
hands, and I'll pin the thinnest warlock in your party, to
any tree you can show me; and this at a hundred yards:
ay, or at two hundred, if the object can be seen, nineteen
shots in twenty: or, for that matter, twenty in twenty, if
the piece is creditable and trusty!
A low menacing murmur followed this cool taunt; the
ire of the warriors kindled at listening to such a reproach
from one who so far disdained their efforts as to refuse even
to wink, when a rifle was discharged as near his face as
could be done without burning it. Rivenoak perceived that
the moment was critical, and, still retaining his hope of
adopting so noted a hunter in his tribe, the politic old chief
interposed in time, probably, to prevent an immediate resort
to that portion of the torture which must necessarily have
produced death, through extreme bodily suffering, if in no
other manner. Moving into the centre of the irritated group,
he addressed them with his usual wily logic and plausible
manner, at once suppressing the fierce movement that had
commenced.
I see how it is, he said. We have been like the
pale-faces when they fasten their doors at night, out of fear
of the red-man. They use so many bars, that the fire
comes and burns them, before they can get out. We have
bound the Deerslayer too tight; the thongs keep his limbs
from shaking, and his eyes from shutting. Loosen him;
let us see what his own body is really made of.
It is often the case, when we are thwarted in a cherished
scheme, that any expedient, however unlikely to succeed, is
gladly resorted to, in preference to a total abandonment of
the project. So it was with the Hurons. The proposal of
the chief found instant favour; and several hands were
immediately
at work, cutting and tearing the ropes of bark
from the body of our hero. In half a minute, Deerslayer
stood as free from bonds, as when, an hour before, he had
commenced his flight on the side of the mountain. Some
little time was necessary that he should recover the use of
his limbs; the circulation of the blood having been checked
by the tightness of the ligatures; and this was accorded to
him by the politic Rivenoak, under the pretence that his
body would be more likely to submit to apprehension, if its
true tone were restored; though really with a view to give
time to the fierce passions which had been awakened in the
bosoms of his young men, to subside. This
ruse
succeeded
;
and Deerslayer, by rubbing his limbs, stamping his
feet, and moving about, soon regained the circulation;
recovering
all his physical powers, as effectually as if nothing
had occurred to disturb them.
It is seldom men think of death in the pride of their health
and strength. So it was with Deerslayer. Having been
helplessly bound, and, as he had every reason to suppose,
Vol. II.21
so lately on the very verge of the other world, to find
himself
so unexpectedly liberated, in possession of his strength,
and with a full command of limb, acted on him like a sudden
restoration to life, reanimating hopes that he had once
absolutely
abandoned. From that instant all his plans changed.
In this, he simply obeyed a law of nature; for while we
have wished to represent our hero as being resigned to his
fate, it has been far from our intention to represent him as
anxious to die. From the instant that his buoyancy of
feeling
revived, his thoughts were keenly bent on the various
projects that presented themselves as modes of evading the
designs of his enemies; and he again became the
quick-witted
,
ingenious, and determined woodsman, alive to all his
own powers and resources. The change was so great, that
his mind resumed its elasticity; and, no longer thinking
of submission, it dwelt only on the devices of the sort of
warfare in which he was engaged.
As soon as Deerslayer was released, the band divided
itself
in a circle around him, in order to hedge him in; and
the desire to break down his spirit grew in them, precisely as
they saw proofs of the difficulty there would be in subduing
it. The honour of the band was now involved in the
issue; and even the sex lost all its sympathy with suffering,
in the desire to save the reputation of the tribe. The voices
of the girls, soft and melodious as nature had made them,
were heard mingling with the menaces of the men; and the
wrongs of Sumach suddenly assumed the character of
injuries
inflicted on every Huron female. Yielding to this
rising tumult, the men drew back a little, signifying to the
females, that they left the captive, for a time, in their
hands; it being a common practice, on such occasions, for
the women to endeavour to throw the victim into a rage, by
their taunts and revilings, and then to turn him suddenly
over to the men, in a state of mind that was little favourable
to resisting the agony of bodily suffering. Nor was this
party without the proper instruments for effecting such a
purpose. Sumach had a notoriety as a scold; and one or
two crones, like the She Bear, had come out with the party,
most probably as the conservators of its decency and moral
discipline; such things occurring in savage as well as
civilized
life. It is unnecessary to repeat all that ferocity and
ignorance could invent for such a purpose; the only
difference
between this outbreaking of feminine anger, and a
similar scene among ourselves, consisting in the figures of
speech and the epithets; the Huron women calling their
prisoner by the names of the lower and least respected
animals
that were known to themselves.
But Deerslayer's mind was too much occupied, to permit
him to be disturbed by the abuse of excited hags; and their
rage necessarily increasing with his indifference, as his
indifference
increased with their rage, the furies soon rendered
themselves impotent by their own excesses. Perceiving that
the attempt was a complete failure, the warriors interfered to
put a stop to this scene; and this so much the more, because
preparations were now seriously making for the
commencement
of the real tortures, or that which would put the
fortitude
of the sufferer to the test of severe bodily pain. A
sudden
and unlooked-for announcement, that proceeded from
one of the look-outs, a boy of ten or twelve years old,
however
,
put a momentary check to the whole proceedings. As
this interruption has a close connection with the
dnouement
of our story, it shall be given in a separate chapter.
CHAPTER XV.
So deem'st thouso each mortal deems
Of that which is from that which seems;
But other harvest here
Than that which peasant's scythe demands,
Was gathered in by sterner hands,
With bayonet, blade, and spear.
Scott
.
It
exceeded Deerslayer's power to ascertain what had
produced the sudden pause in the movements of his enemies,
until the fact was revealed in the due course of events. He
perceived that much agitation prevailed among the women
in particular, while the warriors rested on their arms, in a
sort of dignified expectation. It was plain no alarm was
excited
,
though it was not equally apparent that a friendly
occurrence
produced the delay. Rivenoak was evidently
apprised of all, and by a gesture of his arm he appeared to
direct the circle to remain unbroken, and for each person to
await the issue in the situation he, or she, then occupied. It
required but a minute or two, to bring an explanation of this
singular and mysterious pause, which was soon terminated
by the appearance of Judith, on the exterior of the line of
bodies, and her ready admission within its circle.
If Deerslayer was startled by this unexpected arrival, well
knowing that the quick-witted girl could claim none of that
exemption from the penalties of captivity, that was so
cheerfully
accorded to her feeble-minded sister, he was equally
astonished at the guise in which she came. All her
ordinary
forest attire, neat and becoming as this usually was,
had been laid aside for the brocade, that has been already
mentioned, and which had once before wrought so great and
magical an effect in her appearance. Nor was this all.
Accustomed to see the ladies of the garrison, in the formal,
gala attire of the day, and familiar with the more critical
niceties of these matters, the girl had managed to complete
her dress, in a way to leave nothing strikingly defective in
its details, or even to betray an incongruity that would have
been detected by one practised in the mysteries of the toilet.
Head, feet, arms, hands, bust, and drapery, were all in
harmony
,
as female attire was then deemed attractive and
harmonious
;
and the end she aimed at, that of imposing on the
uninstructed senses of the savages, by causing them to
believe their guest was a woman of rank and importance,
might well have succeeded with those whose habits had
taught them to discriminate between persons. Judith, in
addition to her rare native beauty, had a singular grace of
person, and her mother had imparted enough of her own
deportment
,
to prevent any striking or offensive vulgarity of
manner; so that, sooth to say, the gorgeous dress might
have been worse bestowed in nearly every particular. Had
it been displayed in a capital, a thousand might have worn
it, before one could have been found to do more credit to its
gay colours, glossy satins, and rich laces, than the beautiful
creature whose person it now aided to adorn.
The effect of such an apparition had not been
miscalculated
.
The instant Judith found herself within the circle,
she was, in a degree, compensated for the fearful personal
risk she ran, by the unequivocal sensation of surprise and
admiration produced by her appearance. The grim old
warriors uttered their favourite exclamation Hugh! The
younger men were still more sensibly overcome, and even
the women were not backward in letting open manifestations
of pleasure escape them. It was seldom that these
untutored
children of the forest had ever seen any white female
above the commonest sort, and, as to dress, never before
had so much splendour shone before their eyes. The
gayest
uniforms of both French and English seemed dull
compared
with the lustre of the brocade; and while the rare
personal
beauty of the wearer added to the effect produced by
its hues, the attire did not fail to adorn that beauty in a way
which surpassed even the hopes of its wearer. Deerslayer
himself was astounded, and this quite as much by the
brilliant
picture the girl presented, as at the indifference to
consequences with which she had braved the danger of the
step she had taken. Under such circumstances, all waited
for the visiter to explain her object, which to most of the
spectators seemed as inexplicable as her appearance.
Which of these warriors is the principal chief?
demanded
Judith of Deerslayer, as soon as she found it was
expected that she should open the communication; my
errand is too important to be delivered to any of inferior
rank. First explain to the Hurons what I say; then give
an answer to the question I have put.
Deerslayer quietly complied, his auditors greedily
listening
to the interpretation of the first words that fell from so
extraordinary a vision. The demand seemed perfectly in
character for one who had every appearance of an exalted
rank herself. Rivenoak gave an appropriate reply, by
presenting
himself before his fair visiter in a way to leave no
doubt that he was entitled to all the consideration he claimed.
I can believe this, Huron, resumed Judith, enacting her
assumed part with a steadiness and dignity that did credit to
her powers of imitation, for she strove to impart to her
manner
the condescending courtesy she had once observed in
the wife of a general officer, at a similar though a more
21*
amicable scene: I can believe you to be the principal
person
of this party; I see in your countenance the marks of
thought and reflection. To you, then, I must make my
communication.
Let the Flower of the Woods speak, returned the old
chief, courteously, as soon as her address had been
translated
so that all might understand it. If her words are as
pleasant as her looks, they will never quit my ears; I shall
hear them long after the winter of Canada has killed the
flowers, and frozen all the speeches of summer.
This admiration was grateful to one constituted like
Judith
,
and it contributed to aid her self-possession, quite as
much as it fed her vanity. Smiling involuntarily, or in spite
of her wish to seem reserved, she proceeded in her plot.
Now, Huron, she continued, listen to my words.
Your eyes tell you that I am no common woman. I will
not say I am the queen of this country;
she
is afar off, in a
distant land; but under our gracious monarchs, there are
many degrees of rank; one of these I fill. What that rank
is precisely, it is unnecessary for me to say, since you would
not understand it. For that information you must trust your
eyes. You
see
what I am; you must
feel
that in listening
to my words, you listen to one who can be your friend, or
your enemy, as you treat her.
This was well uttered, with a due attention to manner,
and a steadiness of tone, that was really surprising,
considering
all the circumstances of the case. It was well, though
simply rendered into the Indian dialect, too, and it was
received
with a respect and gravity that augured favourably
for the girl's success. But Indian thought is not easily
traced to its sources. Judith waited with anxiety to hear
the answer, filled with hope even while she doubted.
Rivenoak
was a ready speaker, and he answered as promptly as
comported with the notions of Indian decorum; that peculiar
people seeming to think a short delay respectful, inasmuch
as it manifests that the words already heard, have been duly
weighed.
My daughter is handsomer than the wild roses of
Ontario
;
her voice is pleasant to the ear as the song of the
wren, answered the cautious and wily chief, who of all the
band stood alone in not being fully imposed on by the
magnificent
and unusual appearance of Judith; but who
distrusted
even while he wondered: the humming-bird is not
much larger than the bee; yet its feathers are as gay as
the tail of the peacock. The Great Spirit sometimes puts
very bright clothes on very little animals. Still, He covers
the moose with coarse hair. These things are beyond the
understanding of poor Indians, who can only comprehend
what they see and hear. No doubt my daughter has a very
large wigwam, somewhere about the lake; the Hurons have
not found it, on account of their ignorance?
I have told you, chief, that it would be useless to state
my rank and residence, inasmuch as you would not
comprehend
them. You must trust to your eyes for this
knowledge
;
what red-man is there who cannot see? This
blanket that I wear, is not the blanket of a common squaw;
these ornaments are such as the wives and daughters of
chiefs only appear in. Now, listen and hear why I have
come alone, among your people, and hearken to the errand
that has brought me here. The Yengeese have young men,
as well as the Hurons; and plenty of them, too; this you
well know.
The Yengeese are as plenty as the leaves on the trees!
This every Huron knows and feels.
I understand you, chief. Had I brought a party with
me, it might have caused trouble. My young men and your
young men, would have looked angrily at each other;
especially
had my young men seen that pale-face bound for
the tortures. He is a great hunter, and is much loved by
all the garrisons, far and near. There would have been
blows about him, and the trail of the Iroquois back to the
Canadas would have been marked with blood.
There is so much blood on it, now, returned the chief,
gloomily, that it blinds our eyes. My young men see that
it is all Huron.
No doubt; and more Huron blood would be spilt, had
I come surrounded with pale-faces. I have heard of
Rivenoak
,
and have thought it would be better to send him back
in peace to his village, that he might leave his women and
children behind him; if he then wished to come for our
scalps, we would meet him. He loves animals made of
ivory, and little rifles. See; I have brought some with me
to show him. I am his friend. When he has packed up
these things among his goods, he will start for his village,
before any of my young men can overtake him; and then
he will show his people in Canada what riches they can
come to seek, now that our great fathers, across the Salt
Lake, have sent each other the war-hatchet. I will lead
back with me, this great hunter, of whom I have need to
keep my house in venison.
Judith, who was sufficiently familiar with Indian
pharseology
,
endeavoured to express her ideas in the sententious
manner common to those people; and she succeeded even
beyond her own expectations. Deerslayer did her full
justice
in the translation, and this so much the more readily,
since the girl carefully abstained from uttering any direct
untruth; a homage she paid to the young man's known
aversion to falsehood, which he deemed a meanness
altogether
unworthy of a white man's gifts. The offering of the
two remaining elephants, and of the pistols already
mentioned
,
one of which was all the worse for the recent
accident
,
produced a lively sensation among the Hurons,
generally
,
though Rivenoak received it coldly, notwithstanding
the delight with which he had first discovered the probable
existence of a creature with two tails. In a word, this cool
and sagacious savage was not so easily imposed on, as his
followers; and with a sentiment of honour, that half the
civilized world would have deemed supererogatory, he
declined
the acceptance of a bribe that he felt no disposition
to earn by a compliance with the donor's wishes.
Let my daughter keep her two-tailed hog, to eat, when
venison is scarce, he drily answered; and the little gun,
which has two muzzles. The Hurons will kill deer when
they are hungry; and they have long rifles to fight with.
This hunter cannot quit my young men now; they wish to
know if he is as stout-hearted as he boasts himself to be.
That I deny, Huron, interrupted Deerslayer, with
warmth; yes, that I downright deny, as ag'in truth and
reason. No man has heard me
boast,
and no man shall,
though ye flay me alive, and then roast the quivering flesh,
with your own infarnal devices and cruelties! I may be
humble, and misfortunate, and your prisoner; but I'm no
boaster, by my very gifts.
My young pale-face
boasts
he is
no
boaster, returned
the crafty chief; he
must
be right. I hear a strange bird
singing. It has very rich feathers. No Huron ever before saw
such feathers! They will be ashamed to go back to their
village, and tell their people that they let their prisoner go
on account of the song of this strange bird, and not be able
to give the
name
of the bird. They do not know how to
say whether it is a wren, or a cat-bird. This would be a
great disgrace; my young men would not be allowed to
travel in the woods, without taking their mothers with them,
to tell them the name of the birds!
You can ask my name of your prisoner, returned the
girl. It is Judith; and there is a great deal of the history
of Judith in the pale-face's best book, the Bible. If I am a
bird of fine feathers, I have also my name.
No, answered the wily Huron, betraying the artifice
he had so long practised, by speaking in English, with
tolerable
accuracy; I not ask prisoner. He tired; want rest.
I ask my daughter, with feeble-mind. She speak truth.
Come here, daughter; you answer.
Your
name, Hetty?
Yes, that's what they call me, returned the girl;
though it's written Esther, in the Bible.
He write
him
in Bible, too! All write in Bible. No
matterwhat
her
name?
That's Judith, and it's so written in the Bible, though
father sometimes called her Jude. That's my sister Judith,
Thomas Hutter's daughterThomas Hutter, whom you
called the Muskrat; though he was
no
muskrat, but a man,
like yourselveshe lived in a house on the water, and that
was enough for
you!
A smile of triumph gleamed on the hard-wrinkled
countenance
of the chief, when he found how completely his
appeal
to the truth-loving Hetty had succeeded. As for Judith,
herself, the moment her sister was questioned, she saw that
all was lost; for no sign, or even entreaty, could have
induced
the right-feeling girl to utter a falsehood. To attempt
to impose a daughter of the Muskrat on the savages, as a
princess, or a great lady, she knew would be idle; and she
saw her bold and ingenious expedient for liberating the
captive
fail, through one of the simplest and most natural causes
that could be imagined. She turned her eye on Deerslayer,
therefore, as if imploring him to interfere, to save them
both.
It will not do, Judith, said the young man, in answer
to this appeal, which he understood, though he saw its
uselessness
;
it will not do. 'T was a bold idee, and fit for a
general's lady; but yonder Mingo Rivenoak had
withdrawn
to a little distance, and was out of ear-shotbut
yonder Mingo is an oncommon man, and not to be deceived
by any unnat'ral sarcumventions. Things must come afore
him in their right order, to draw a cloud afore
his
eyes!
'T was too much to attempt making him fancy that a queen,
or a great lady, lived in these mountains; and no doubt he
thinks the fine clothes you wear, are some of the plunder of
your own fatheror, at least, of him who once passed for
your father; as quite likely it was, if all they say is true.
At all events, Deerslayer, my presence here will save
you for a time. They will hardly attempt torturing you
before
my face!
Why not, Judith? Do you think they will treat a
woman
of the pale-faces, more tenderly than they treat their
own? It's true that your sex will most likely save you
from the torments, but it will not save your liberty, and may
not save your scalp. I wish you hadn't come, my good
Judith
;
it can do no good to me, while it may do great harm
to yourself.
I can share your fate, the girl answered, with
generous
enthusiasm. They shall not injure you, while I
stand by, if in my power to prevent itbesides
Besides what, Judith? What means have you to stop
Indian cruelty, or to avart Indian deviltries?
None, perhaps, Deerslayer, answered the girl, with
firmness; but I can suffer with my friendsdie with them
if necessary.
Ah! Judithsuffer you may; but die you will not
until
the Lord's time shall come. It's little likely that one of
your sex and beauty will meet with a harder fate than to
become the wife of a chief, if indeed your white inclinations
can stoop to match with an Indian. 'T would have been
better
had you staid in the ark, or the castle:but what has
been done, is done. You was about to say something, when
you stopped at `besides?'
It might not be safe to mention it here, Deerslayer,
the girl hurriedly answered, moving past him carelessly,
that she might speak in a low tone; half an hour is all
in all to us. None of your friends are idle.
The hunter replied merely by a grateful look. Then he
turned towards his enemies, as if ready again to face the
torments. A short consultation had passed among the
elders
of the band, and by this time they also were prepared
with their decision. The merciful purpose of Rivenoak had
been much weakened by the artifice of Judith, which,
failing
of its real object, was likely to produce results the very
opposite of those she had anticipated. This was natural;
the feeling being aided by the resentment of an Indian, who
found how near he had been to becoming the dupe of an
inexperienced
girl. By this time Judith's real character was
fully understoodthe wide-spread reputation of her beauty
contributing to the exposure. As for the unusual attire, it
was confounded with the profound mystery of the animals
with two tails, and, for the moment, lost its influence.
When Rivenoak, therefore, faced the captive again, it
was with an altered countenance. He had abandoned the
wish of saving him, and was no longer disposed to retard
the more serious part of the torture. This change of
sentiment
was, in effect, communicated to the young men, who
were already eagerly engaged in making their preparations
for the contemplated scene. Fragments of dried wood
were rapidly collected near the sapling, the splinters which
it was intended to thrust into the flesh of the victim,
previously
to lighting, were all collected, and the thongs were
already produced that were again to bind him to the tree.
All this was done in profound silence, Judith watching every
movement with breathless expectation, while Deerslayer
himself stood seemingly as unmoved, as one of the pines
of the hills. When the warriors advanced to bind him,
however, the young man glanced at Judith, as if to inquire
whether resistance or submission were most advisable. By
a significant gesture she counselled the last; and, in a
minute
,
he was once more fastened to the tree, a helpless object
of any insult, or wrong, that might be offered. So eagerly
did every one now act, that nothing was said. The fire was
immediately lighted in the pile, and the end of all was
anxiously
expected.
It was not the intention of the Hurons absolutely to
destroy
the life of their victim by means of fire. They
designed
merely to put his physical fortitude to the severest
proofs it could endure, short of that extremity. In the end,
they fully intended to carry his scalp with them into their
village, but it was their wish first to break down his
resolution
,
and to reduce him to the level of a complaining
sufferer
.
With this view, the pile of brush and branches had
been placed at a proper distance, or one at which it was
thought the heat would soon become intolerable, though it
might not be immediately dangerous. As often happened,
however, on these occasions, this distance had been
miscalculated
,
and the flames began to wave their forked tongues
in a proximity to the face of the victim that would have
proved fatal in another instant, had not Hetty rushed through
the crowd, armed with a stick, and scattered the blazing
pile in a dozen directions. More than one hand was raised
to strike the presumptuous intruder to the earth; but the
chiefs prevented the blows, by reminding their irritated
followers
of the state of her mind. Hetty, herself, was
insensible
to the risk she ran, but, as soon as she had performed
this bold act, she stood looking about her, in frowning
resentment
,
as if to rebuke the crowd of attentive savages for
their cruelty.
God bless you, dearest sister, for that brave and ready
act! murmured Judith, herself unnerved so much as to be
incapable of exertion; Heaven itself has sent you on its
holy errand.
'T was well-meant, Judith, rejoined the victim; 't was
excellently meant, and 't was timely, though it may prove
ontimely in the end! What is to come to pass must come
to pass soon, or 't will quickly be too late. Had I drawn in
one mouthful of that flame in breathing, the power of man
couldn't save my life; and you see that, this time, they've
so bound my forehead as not to leave my head the smallest
chance. 'T was well meant; but it might have been more
marciful to let the flames act their part.
Cruel, heartless Hurons! exclaimed the still indignant
Hetty; would you burn a man and a Christian, as you
would burn a log of wood! Do you never read your Bibles?
or do you think God will forget such things?
A gesture from Rivenoak caused the scattered brands to
be collected; fresh wood was brought, even the women and
children busying themselves eagerly, in the gathering of
dried sticks. The flame was just kindling a second time,
when an
Indian
female pushed through the circle, advanced
to the heap, and with her foot dashed aside the lighted twigs,
in time to prevent the conflagration. A yell followed this
second disappointment; but when the offender turned towards
the circle, and presented the countenance of Hist, it was
succeeded by a common exclamation of pleasure and
surprise
.
For a minute, all thought of pursuing the business
in hand was forgotten, and young and old crowded around
the girl, in haste to demand an explanation of her sudden
and unlooked-for return. It was at this critical instant
that Hist spoke to Judith in a low voice, placed some small
object, unseen, in her hand, and then turned to meet the
salutations of the Huron girls, with whom she was
personally
a great favourite. Judith recovered her self-possession,
and acted promptly. The small, keen-edged knife, that Hist
had given to the other, was passed by the latter into the hands
of Hetty, as the safest and least-suspected medium of
transferring
it to Deerslayer. But the feeble intellect of the last
defeated the well-grounded hopes of all three. Instead of
first cutting loose the hands of the victim, and then
concealing
the knife in his clothes, in readiness for action at the
most available instant, she went to work herself, with
earnestness
and simplicity, to cut the thongs that bound his
head, that he might not again be in danger of inhaling
flames. Of course this deliberate procedure was seen, and
the hands of Hetty were arrested, ere she had more than
liberated the upper portion of the captive's body, not
including
his arms, below the elbows. This discovery at once
pointed distrust towards Hist; and, to Judith's surprise,
when questioned on the subject, that spirited girl was not
disposed to deny her agency in what had passed.
Why should I not help the Deerslayer? the girl
demanded
,
in the tones of a firm-minded woman. He is the
brother of a Delaware chief; my heart is all Delaware.
Come forth, miserable Briarthorn, and wash the Iroquois
Vol. II.22
paint from your face; stand before the Hurons, the crow
that you are; you would eat the carrion of your own dead,
rather than starve. Put him face to face with Deerslayer,
chiefs and warriors; I will show you how great a knave
you have been keeping in your tribe.
This bold language, uttered in their own dialect, and with
a manner full of confidence, produced a deep sensation
among the Hurons. Treachery is always liable to distrust;
and, though the recreant Briarthorn had endeavoured to
serve the enemy well, his exertions and assiduities had
gained for him little more than toleration. His wish to
obtain
Hist for a wife had first induced him to betray her and
his own people; but serious rivals to his first project had
risen up among his new friends, weakening still more their
sympathies with treason. In a word, Briarthorn had been
barely permitted to remain in the Huron encampment, where
he was as closely and as jealously watched as Hist herself;
seldom appearing before the chiefs, and sedulously keeping
out of view of Deerslayer, who, until this moment, was
ignorant
even of his presence. Thus summoned, however, it was
impossible to remain in the background. Wash the
Iroquois
paint from his face, he did not; for when he stood in
the centre of the circle, he was so disguised in these new
colours, that, at first, the hunter did not recognise him. He
assumed an air of defiance, notwithstanding, and haughtily
demanded what any could say against Briarthorn.
Ask yourself that, continued Hist, with spirit, though
her manner grew less concentrated; and there was a slight
air of abstraction that became observable to Deerslayer and
Judith, if to no others. Ask that of your own heart,
sneaking wood-chuck of the Delawares; come not here
with the face of an innocent man. Go look in the spring;
see the colours of your enemies on your lying skin; then
come back and boast how you ran from your tribe, and took
the blanket of the French for your covering! Paint
yourself
as bright as the humming-bird, you will still be black
as the crow.
Hist had been so uniformly gentle, while living with the
Hurons, that they now listened to her language with
surprise
.
As for the delinquent, his blood boiled in his veins;
and it was well for the pretty speaker that it was not in his
power to execute the revenge he burned to inflict on her, in
spite of his pretended love.
Who wishes Briarthorn? he sternly asked. If this
pale-face is tired of life; if afraid of Indian torments, speak,
Rivenoak; I will send him after the warriors we have lost.
No, chief; no, Rivenoak, eagerly interrupted Hist.
The Deerslayer fears nothing; least of all, a crow!
Unbind
himcut his withesplace him face to face with this
cawing bird; then let us see which is tired of life.
Hist made a forward movement, as if to take a knife from
a young man, and perform the office she had mentioned, in
person; but an aged warrior interposed, at a sign from
Rivenoak. This chief watched all the girl did, with
distrust
;
for, even while speaking in her most boastful
language
,
and in the steadiest manner, there was an air of
uncertainty and expectation about her, that could not escape
so close an observer. She acted well; but two or three of
the old men were equally satisfied that it was merely acting.
Her proposal to release Deerslayer, therefore, was rejected;
and the disappointed Hist found herself driven back from
the sapling, at the very moment she fancied herself about
to be successful. At the same time, the circle, which
had got to be crowded and confused, was enlarged, and
brought once more into order. Rivenoak now announced
the intention of the old men again to proceed; the delay
having been continued long enough, and leading to no result.
Stop, Huron; stay, chiefs! exclaimed Judith, scarce
knowing what she said, or why she interposed, unless to
obtain time; for God's sake, a single minute longer
The words were cut short, by another and a still more
extraordinary interruption. A young Indian came bounding
through the Huron ranks, leaping into the very centre of the
circle, in a way to denote the utmost confidence, or a
temerity
bordering on fool-hardiness. Five or six sentinels were
still watching the lake, at different and distant points; and
it was the first impression of Rivenoak that one of these
had come in, with tidings of import. Still, the movements of
the stranger were so rapid, and his war-dress, which scarcely
left him more drapery than an antique statue, had so little
distinguishing about it, that, at the first moment, it was
impossible
to ascertain whether he were friend or foe. Three
leaps carried this warrior to the side of Deerslayer, whose
withes were cut in the twinkling of an eye, with a quickness
and precision that left the prisoner perfect master of his
limbs. Not till this was effected, did the stranger bestow a
glance on any other object; then he turned, and showed the
astonished Hurons, the noble brow, fine person, and eagle
eye, of a young warrior, in the paint and panoply of a
Delaware
.
He held a rifle in each hand, the butts of both,
resting on the earth, while from one dangled its proper pouch
and horn. This was Killdeer, which, even as he looked
boldly and in defiance on the crowd around him, he suffered
to fall back into the hands of its proper owner. The
presence
of two armed men, though it was in their midst,
startled
the Hurons. Their rifles were scattered about against
the different trees, and their only weapons were their knives
and tomahawks. Still, they had too much self-possession
to betray fear. It was little likely that so small a force
would assail so strong a band; and each man expected
some extraordinary proposition to succeed so decisive a step.
The stranger did not seem disposed to disappoint them; he
prepared to speak.
Hurons, he said, this earth is very big. The great
lakes are big, too; there is room beyond them for the
Iroquois
;
there is room for the Delawares on this side. I am
Chingachgook, the son of Uncas; the kinsman of
Tamenund
.
This is my betrothed; that pale-face is my friend.
My heart was heavy when I missed him; I followed him to
your camp, to see that no harm happened to him. All the
Delaware girls are waiting for Wah; they wonder that she
stays away so long. Come, let us say farewell, and go on
our path.
Hurons, this is your mortal enemy, the Great Serpent
of them you hate! cried Briarthorn. If he escape, blood
will be in your moccasin prints, from this spot to the
Canadas
.
I
am
all
Huron!
As the last words were uttered, the traitor cast his knife
at the naked breast of the Delaware. A quick movement
of the arm, on the part of Hist, who stood near, turned aside
the blow, the dangerous weapon burying its point in a pine.
At the next instant, a similar weapon glanced from the hand
of the Serpent, and quivered in the recreant's heart. A
minute had scarcely elapsed from the moment in which
Chingachgook bounded into the circle, and that in which
Briarthorn fell, like a log, dead in his tracks. The rapidity
of events had prevented the Hurons from acting; but this
catastrophe permitted no farther delay. A common
exclamation
followed, and the whole party was in motion. At
this instant, a sound unusual to the woods was heard, and
every Huron, male and female, paused to listen, with ears
erect and faces filled with expectation. The sound was
regular and heavy, as if the earth were struck with beetles.
Objects became visible among the trees of the back-ground,
and a body of troops was seen advancing with measured
tread. They came upon the charge, the scarlet of the
king's livery shining among the bright green foliage of the
forest.
The scene that followed, is not easily described. It was
one in which wild confusion, despair, and frenzied efforts,
were so blended, as to destroy the unity and distinctness of
the action. A general yell burst from the enclosed Hurons;
it was succeeded by the hearty cheers of England. Still,
not a musket or rifle was fired, though that steady,
measured
tramp continued, and the bayonet was seen gleaming
in advance of a line that counted nearly sixty men. The
Hurons
were taken at a fearful disadvantage. On three sides
was the water, while their formidable and trained foes cut
them off from flight on the fourth. Each warrior rushed for
his arms, and then all on the point, man, woman, and child,
eagerly sought the covers. In this scene of confusion and
dismay
,
however, nothing could surpass the discretion and
coolness
of Deerslayer. His first care was to place Judith and
Hist behind trees, and he looked for Hetty; but she had
been hurried away in a crowd of Huron women. This
effected, he threw himself on a flank of the retiring Hurons,
who were inclining off towards the southern margin of the
point, in the hope of escaping through the water.
Deerslayer
watched his opportunity, and finding two of his
recent
tormentors in a range, his rifle first broke the silence
of the terrific scene. The bullet brought both down at one
discharge. This drew a general fire from the Hurons, and
the rifle and war-cry of the Serpent were heard in the
clamour
.
Still the trained men returned no answering volley,
22*
the whoop and piece of Hurry alone being heard on their
side, if we except the short, prompt word of authority, and
that heavy, measured, and menacing tread. Presently,
however
,
the shrieks, groans, and denunciations that usually
accompany the use of the bayonet, followed. That terrible
and deadly weapon was glutted in vengeance. The scene
that succeeded was one of those, of which so many have
occurred in our own times, in which neither age nor sex
forms an exemption to the lot of a savage warfare.
CHAPTER XVI.
The flower that smiles to-day
To-morrow dies;
All that we wish to stay,
Tempts and then flies:
What is this world's delight?
Lightning that mocks the night,
Brief even as bright.
Shelley
.
The
picture next presented by the point of land that the
unfortunate Hurons had selected for their last place of
encampment
,
need scarcely be laid before the eyes of the
reader
.
Happily for the more tender-minded and the more timid,
the trunks of the trees, the leaves, and the smoke had
concealed
much of that which passed, and night shortly after
drew its veil over the lake, and the whole of that seemingly
interminable wilderness, which may be said to have then
stretched, with far and immaterial interruptions, from the
banks of the Hudson to the shores of the Pacific Ocean.
Our business carries us into the following day, when light
returned upon the earth, as sunny and as smiling, as if
nothing
extraordinary had occurred.
When the sun rose on the following morning, every sign
of hostility and alarm had vanished from the basin of the
Glimmerglass. The frightful event of the preceding
evening
had left no impression on the placid sheet, and the
untiring
hours pursued their course in the placid order
prescribed
by the powerful hand that set them in motion. The
birds were again skimming the water, or were seen poised
on the wing high above the tops of the tallest pines of the
mountains, ready to make their swoops, in obedience to the
irresistible laws of their nature. In a word, nothing was
changed but the air of movement and life that prevailed in
and around the castle. Here, indeed, was an alteration that
must have struck the least observant eye. A sentinel, who
wore the light-infantry uniform of a royal regiment, paced
the platform with measured tread, and some twenty men of
the same corps lounged about the place, or were seated in the
ark. Their arms were stacked under the eye of their
comrade
on post. Two officers stood examining the shore, with
the ship's glass so often mentioned. Their looks were
directed
to that fatal point, where scarlet coats were still to be
seen gliding among the trees, and where the magnifying
power of the instrument also showed spades at work, and
the sad duty of interment going on. Several of the
common
men bore proofs on their persons that their enemies had
not been overcome entirely without resistance; and the
youngest of the two officers on the platform, wore an
arm in a sling. His companion, who commanded the party,
had been more fortunate. He it was that used the glass, in
making the reconnoissances in which the two were engaged.
A sergeant approached to make a report. He addressed
the senior of these officers as Captain Warley, while the
other was alluded to as Mr., which was equivalent to
ensignThornton. The former, it will at once be seen,
was the officer who had been named with so much
feeling
,
in the parting dialogue between Judith and Hurry.
He was, in truth, the very individual with whom the
scandal
of the garrisons had most freely connected the name of
this beautiful but indiscreet girl. He was a hard-featured,
red-faced man, of about five-and-thirty, but of a military
carriage, and with an air of fashion that might easily
impose
on the imagination of one as ignorant of the world as
Judith.
Craig is covering us with benedictions, observed this
person to his young ensign, with an air of indifference, as
he shut the glass, and handed it to his servant; to say the
truth, not without reason; it is certainly more agreeable
to be here in attendance on Miss Judith Hutter, than to
be burying Indians on a point of the lake, however
romantic
the position, or brilliant the victory. By the way, Wright,
is Davis still living?
He died about ten minutes since, your honour,
returned
the sergeant to whom this question was addressed. I
knew how it would be, as soon as I found the bullet had
touched the stomach. I never knew a man who could hold
out long, if he had a hole in his stomach.
No; it is rather inconvenient for carrying away any
thing very nourishing, observed Warley, gaping. This
being up two nights
de suite,
Arthur, plays the devil
with a man's faculties! I'm as stupid as one of those
Dutch parsons on the MohawkI hope your arm is not
painful, my dear boy?
It draws a few grimaces from me, sir, as I suppose you
see, answered the youth, laughing at the very moment his
countenance was a little awry with pain. But it may be
borne. I suppose Graham can spare a few minutes, soon,
to look at my hurt.
She is a lovely creature, this Judith Hutter, after all,
Thornton; and it shall not be my fault, if she is not seen
and admired in the parks! resumed Warley, who thought
little of his companion's wound.Your arm, eh! Quite
true.Go into the ark, sergeant, and tell Dr. Graham I
desire
he would look at Mr. Thornton's injury, as soon as he
has done with the poor fellow with the broken leg. A lovely
creature! and she looked like a queen in that brocade dress
in which we met her. I find all changed here; father
and mother both gone, the sister dying, if not dead, and
none of the family left, but the beauty! This has been a
lucky expedition all round, and promises to terminate
better
than Indian skirmishes in general.
Am I to suppose, sir, that you are about to desert your
colours, in the great corps of bachelors, and close the
campaign
with matrimony?
I, Tom Warley, turn Benedict! Faith, my dear boy,
you little know the corps you speak of, if you fancy any
such thing. I do suppose there
are
women in the colonies,
that a captain of light-infantry need not disdain; but they
are not to be found up here, on a mountain lake; or even
down on the Dutch river where we are posted. It is true,
my uncle, the general, once did me the favour to choose a
wife for me, in Yorkshire; but she had no beautyand I
would not marry a princess, unless she were handsome.
If handsome, you would marry a beggar?
Ay, these are the notions of an ensign! Love in a
cottage
doorsand
windowsthe old story, for the
hundredth
time. The twentyth don't
marry
. We are not
a marrying corps, my dear boy. There's the colonel, old
Sir Edwin , now; though a full general, he has
never thought of a wife; and when a man gets as high as
a lieutenant-general, without matrimony, he is pretty safe.
Then the lieutenant-colonel is
confirmed,
as I tell my
cousin
,
the bishop. The major is a widower, having tried
matrimony
,
for twelve months, in his youth; and we look upon
him, now, as one of our most certain men. Out of ten
captains, but one is in the dilemma; and he, poor devil, is
always kept at regimental head-quarters, as a sort of
memento
mori
to the young men, as they join. As for the
subalterns, not one has ever yet had the audacity to speak
of introducing a wife into the regiment. But your arm is
troublesome, and we'll go ourselves, and see what has
become
of Graham.
The surgeon who had accompanied the party was
employed
very differently from what the captain supposed.
When the assault was over, and the dead and wounded
were collected, poor Hetty had been found among the latter.
A rifle-bullet had passed through her body, inflicting an
injury
that was known at a glance to be mortal. How this
wound was received, no one knew; it was probably one of
those casualties that ever accompany scenes like that related
in the previous chapter. The Sumach, all the elderly
women
,
and several of the Huron girls, had fallen by the
bayonet
;
either in the confusion of the
mle,
or from the
difficulty
of distinguishing the sexes, where the dress was so
simple. Much the greater portion of the warriors suffered
on the spot. A few had escaped, however, and two or three
had been taken unharmed. As for the wounded, the
bayonet
saved the surgeon much trouble. Rivenoak had escaped
with life and limb; but was injured and a prisoner. As
Captain Warley and his ensign went into the ark, they
passed him, seated, in dignified silence, in one end of the
scow, his head and leg bound, but betraying no visible signs
of despondency or despair. That he mourned the loss of
his tribe, is certain; still, he did it in the manner that best
became a warrior and a chief.
The two soldiers found their surgeon, in the principal
room of the ark. He was just quitting the pallet of Hetty,
with an expression of sorrowful regret, on his hard,
pock-marked
,
Scottish features, that it was not usual to see there.
All his assiduity had been useless, and he was compelled
reluctantly to abandon the expectation of seeing the girl
survive many hours. Dr. Graham was accustomed to
death-bed scenes, and ordinarily they produced but little
impression on him. In all that relates to religion, his was
one of those minds which, in consequence of reasoning much
on material things, logically and consecutively, and
overlooking
the total want of premises which such a theory must
ever possess, through its want of a primary agent, had
become
sceptical; leaving a vague opinion, concerning the
origin of things, that with high pretensions to philosophy,
failed in the first of all philosophical principles, a cause. To
him religious dependence appeared a weakness; but when he
found one gentle and young like Hetty, with a mind beneath
the level of her race, sustained at such a moment by these
pious sentiments, and that too, in a way that many a sturdy
warrior, and reputed hero, might have looked upon with
envy, he found himself affected by the sight, to a degree
that he would have been ashamed to confess. Edinburgh
and Aberdeen, then as now, supplied no small portion of the
medical men of the British service; and Dr. Graham, as
indeed
his name and countenance equally indicated, was, by
birth, a North Briton.
Here is an extraordinary exhibition for a forest, and one
but half-gifted with reason, he observed, with a decided
Scotch accent, as Warley and the ensign entered; I just
hope, gentlemen, that when we three shall be called on to quit
the twentyth, we may be found as resigned to go on the
half-pay of another existence, as this poor demented chiel!
Is there no hope that she can survive the hurt?
demanded
Warley, turning his eyes towards the pallid Judith,
on whose cheeks, however, two large spots of red had
settled
,
as soon as he came into the cabin.
No more than there is for Charlie Stuart! Approach
and judge for yourselves, gentlemen; ye'll see faith
exemplified
in an exceeding and wonderful manner. There is a
sort of
arbitrium
between life and death, in actual conflict
in the poor girl's mind, that renders her an interesting study
to a philosopher. Mr. Thornton, I'm at your service, now;
we can just look at the arm, in the next room, while we
speculate as much as we please, on the operations and
sinuosities
of the human mind.
The surgeon and ensign retired, and Warley had an
opportunity
of looking about him, more at leisure, and with a
better understanding of the nature and feelings of the group
collected in the cabin. Poor Hetty had been placed on her
own simple bed, and was reclining in a half-seated attitude,
with the approaches of death on her countenance, though
they were singularly dimmed by the lustre of an expression,
in which all the intelligence of her entire being appeared to
be concentrated. Judith and Hist were near her; the former
seated in deep grief; the latter standing, in readiness to offer
any of the gentle attentions of feminine care. Deerslayer
stood at the end of the pallet, leaning on Killdeer, unharmed
in person; all the fine martial ardour that had so lately
glowed in his countenance, having given place to the usual
look of honesty and benevolence; qualities of which the
expression
was now softened by manly regret and pity. The
Serpent was in the back-ground of the picture, erect and
motionless as a statue; but so observant, that not a look of
the eye escaped his own keen glance. Hurry completed
the group; being seated on a stool near the door, like one
who felt himself out of place in such a scene; but who was
ashamed to quit it, unbidden.
Who is that in scarlet? asked Hetty, as soon as the
captain's uniform caught her eye. Tell me, Judith, is it
the friend of Hurry?
'T is the officer who commands the troops, that have
rescued us all from the hands of the Hurons, was the low
answer of the sister.
Am I rescued, too?I thought they said I was shot,
and about to die. Mother is dead, and so is father; but
you are living, Judith, and so is Hurry. I was afraid
Hurry would be killed, when I heard him shouting among
the soldiers.
Never mindnever mind, dear Hettyinterrupted
Judith, sensitively alive to the preservation of her sister's
secret, more, perhaps at such a moment, than at another.
Hurry is well, and Deerslayer is well, and the Delaware
is well, too.
How came they to shoot a poor girl like me, and let so
many men go unharmed? I didn't know that the Hurons
were so wicked, Judith!
'T was an accident, poor Hetty; a sad accident it has
been! No one would willingly have injured
you
.
I'm glad of that!I thought it strange; I am
feeble-minded
,
and the red men have never harmed me before. I
should be sorry to think that they had changed their minds.
I am glad, too, Judith, that they haven't hurt Hurry.
Deerslayer
,
I don't think God will suffer any one to harm. It
was very fortunate the soldiers came as they did though,
for fire
will
burn!
It was, indeed, fortunate, my sister; God's holy name
be for ever blessed for the mercy!
I dare say, Judith, you know some of the officers; you
used to know so many!
Judith made no reply; she hid her face in her hands and
groaned. Hetty gazed at her in wonder; but naturally
supposing
her own situation was the cause of this grief, she
kindly offered to console her sister.
Don't mind me, dear Judith, said the affectionate and
pure-hearted creatureI don't suffer, if I do die; why
father and mother are both dead, and what happens to
them,
may well happen to
me
. You know I am of less account
than any of the family; therefore few will think of me after
I'm in the lake.
No, no, nopoor, dear, dear Hetty! exclaimed Judith,
in an uncontrollable burst of sorrowI, at least, will ever
think of you; and gladly, oh! how gladly would I exchange
places with you, to be the pure, excellent, sinless creature
you are!
Until now, Captain Warley had stood leaning against the
door of the cabin; when this outbreak of feeling, and
perchance
of penitence, escaped the beautiful girl, he walked
slowly and thoughtfully away; even passing the ensign,
then suffering under the surgeon's care, without noticing
him.
I have got my Bible here, Judith! returned her sister,
in a voice of triumph. It's true, I can't read any longer;
there's something the matter with my eyes
you
look dim
and distantand so does Hurry, now I look at him;well,
I never could have believed that Henry March would have
so dull a look! What can be the reason, Judith, that I see
so badly, to-day? I, whom mother always said had the
best eyes of the whole family. Yes, that was it; my mind
was feeblewhat people call half-wittedbut my eyes were
so
good!
Again Judith groaned; this time no feeling of self, no
retrospect of the past, caused the pain. It was the pure,
heart-felt sorrow of sisterly love, heightened by a sense of
the meek humility and perfect truth of the being before her.
At that moment, she would gladly have given up her own
life to save that of Hetty. As the last, however, was
beyond the reach of human power, she felt there was
nothing
left her but sorrow. At this moment Warley returned
to the cabin, drawn by a secret impulse he could not
withstand
,
though he felt, just then, as if he would gladly
abandon
the American continent for ever, were it practicable.
Instead of pausing at the door, he now advanced so near the
pallet of the sufferer as to come more plainly within her
gaze. Hetty could still distinguish large objects, and her look
soon fastened on him.
Are you the officer that came with Hurry? she asked.
If you are, we ought all to thank you; for, though I am
hurt, the rest have saved their lives. Did Harry March tell
you where to find us, and how much need there was for
your services?
The news of the party reached us by means of a friendly
runner, returned the captain, glad to relieve his feelings by
this appearance of a friendly communication; and I was
immediately sent out to cut it off. It was fortunate,
certainly
,
that we met Hurry Harry, as you call him, for he
acted as a guide; and it was not less fortunate that we heard
a firing, which I now understand was merely a shooting at
Vol. II.23
the mark, for it not only quickened our march, but called
us to the right side of the lake. The Delaware saw us on
the shore, with the glass, it would seem; and he and Hist,
as I find his squaw is named, did us excellent service. It
was, really, altogether a fortunate concurrence of
circumstances
,
Judith.
Talk not to me of any thing fortunate, sir, returned
the girl, huskily, again concealing her face. To me, the
world is full of misery. I wish never to hear of marks, or
rifles, or soldiers, or
men,
again!
Do you know my sister? asked Hetty, ere the rebuked
soldier had time to rally for an answer. How came you
to know that her name is Judith? You are right, for that
is
her name; and I am Hetty, Thomas Hutter's daughters.
For heaven's sake, dearest sister; for
my
sake, beloved
Hetty, interposed Judith, imploringly, say no more of
this.
Hetty looked surprised; but, accustomed to comply, she
ceased her awkward and painful interrogatories of Warley,
bending her eyes towards the Bible, which she still held
between
her hands, as one would cling to a casket of precious
stones, in a shipwreck, or a conflagration. Her mind now
reverted to the future, losing sight, in a great measure, of
the scenes of the past.
We shall not long be parted, Judith, she said; when
you
die, you must be brought and buried in the lake, by the
side of mother, too.
Would to God, Hetty, that I lay there at this moment!
No; that cannot be, Judith; people must die before they
have any right to be buried. 'Twould be wicked to bury
you, or for you to bury yourself, while living. Once I
thought of burying myself;God kept me from that sin.
You!you, Hetty Hutter, think of such an act!
exclaimed
Judith, looking up in uncontrollable surprise, for
she well knew nothing passed the lips of her conscientious
sister, that was not religiously true.
Yes, I did, Judith; but God has forgottenno he
forgets
nothingbut he has
forgiven
it, returned the dying
girl, with the subdued manner of a repentant child.  'Twas
mother's death; I felt I had lost the best friend I had
on earth, if not the
only
friend. 'Tis true, you and father
were kind to me, Judith, but I was so feeble-minded, I
knew I should only give you trouble; and then you were
so often ashamed of such a sister and daughter; and 'tis
hard to live in a world where all look upon you as below
them. I thought then, if I could bury myself by the side
of mother, I should be happier in the lake, than in the hut.
Forgive mepardon me, dearest Hetty; on my bended
knees, I beg you to pardon me, sweet sister, if any word
or act of mine drove you to so maddening and cruel a
thought!
Get up, Judith; kneel to Goddon't kneel to me. Just
so I felt, when mother was dying. I remembered every thing
I had said and done to vex her, and could have kissed her
feet for forgiveness. I think it must be so with all dying
people; though, now I think of it, I don't remember to have
had such feelings on account of father.
Judith arose, hid her face in her apron, and wept. A
long pauseone of more than two hourssucceeded, during
which, Warley entered and left the cabin several times;
apparently
uneasy when absent, and yet unable to remain.
He issued various orders, which his men proceeded to
execute
;
and there was an air of movement in the party, more
especially as Mr. Craig, the lieutenant, had got through with
the unpleasant duty of burying the dead, and had sent for
instructions from the shore, desiring to know what he was
to do with his detachment. During this interval, Hetty
slept a little, and Deerslayer and Chingachgook left the ark
to confer together. But, at the end of the time mentioned,
the surgeon passed upon the platform; and with a degree
of feeling his comrades had never before observed in one of
his habits, he announced that the patient was rapidly
drawing
near her end. On receiving this intelligence, the group
collected again; curiosity to witness such a deathor a
better feelingdrawing to the spot, men who had so lately
been actors in a scene seemingly of so much greater
interest
and moment. By this time, Judith had got to be
inactive
,
through grief; and Hist alone was performing the
little offices of feminine attention that are so appropriate to
the sick bed. Hetty herself had undergone no other
apparent
change, than the general failing that indicated the
near approach of dissolution. All that she possessed of
mind was as clear as ever; and, in some respects, her
intellect
,
perhaps, was more than usually active.
Don't grieve for me so much, Judith, said the gentle
sufferer, after a pause in her remarks; I shall soon see
mother: I think I see her
now;
her face is just as sweet
and smiling as it used to be! Perhaps when I'm dead, God
will give me all my mind, and I shall become a more fitting
companion for mother than I ever was before.
You will be an angel in heaven, Hetty, sobbed the
sister
;
no spirit there will be more worthy of its holy
residence
!
I don't understand it quite; still I know it must be all
true; I've read it in the Bible. How dark it's becoming!
Can it be night so soon? I can hardly see you at all;
where is Hist?
I here, poor girl; why you no see me?
I do see you; but I couldn't tell whether 't was you or
Judith. I believe I sha'n't see you much longer, Hist.
Sorry for that, poor Hetty. Never mind; pale-face got
a heaven for girl, as well as for warrior.
Where's the Serpent? Let me speak to him; give me
his hand; so; I feel it. Delaware, you will love and
cherish
this young Indian woman; I know how fond she is of
you;
and you must be fond of
her
. Don't treat her as
some of your people treat their wives; be a real husband to
her. Now, bring Deerslayer near me; give me
his
hand.
This request was complied with, and the hunter stood by
the side of the pallet, submitting to the wishes of the girl
with the docility of a child.
I feel, Deerslayer, she resumed, though I couldn't
tell whybut I feel that you and I are not going to part
for ever. 'T is a strange feeling! I never had it before; I
wonder what it comes from!
'T is God encouraging you in extremity, Hetty; as such
it ought to be harboured and respected. Yes, we
shall
meet
ag'in, though it may be a long time first, and in a far
distant
land.
Do you mean to be buried in the lake, too? If so, that
may account for the feeling.
'T is little likely, gal; 't is little likely: but there's a
region for Christian souls, where there's no lakes nor
woods, they say; though why there should be none of the
last,
is more than I can account for; seeing that
pleasantness
and peace is the object in view. My grave will be
found in the forest, most likely, but I hope my spirit will
not be far from your'n.
So it must be, then. I am too weak-minded to
understand
these things, but I
feel
that you and I will meet again.
Sister, where are you? I can't see, now, any thing but
darkness. It must be night, surely!
Oh! Hetty, I am here; at your side; these are my
arms that are round you, sobbed Judith. Speak,
dearest
;
is there any thing you wish to say, or have done, in
this awful moment?
By this time Hetty's sight had entirely failed her.
Nevertheless
,
death approached with less than usual of its
horrors
,
as if in tenderness to one of her half-endowed faculties.
She was pale as a corpse, but her breathing was easy and
unbroken; while her voice, though lowered almost to a
whisper, remained clear and distinct. When her sister put
this question, however, a blush diffused itself over the features
of the dying girl; so faint, however, as to be nearly
imperceptible
;
resembling that hue of the rose which is thought to
portray the tint of modesty, rather than the dye of the
flower in its richer bloom. No one but Judith detected this
expression of feeling, one of the gentle expressions of
womanly
sensibility, even in death. On her, however, it was
not lost, nor did she conceal from herself the cause.
Hurry is here, dearest Hetty, whispered the sister, with
her face so near the sufferer as to keep the words from other
ears. Shall I tell him to come and receive your good
wishes?
A gentle pressure of the hand answered in the affirmative,
and then Hurry was brought to the side of the pallet. It is
probable that this handsome but rude woodsman had never
before found himself so awkwardly placed, though the
inclination
which Hetty felt for him (a sort of secret yielding
to the instincts of nature, rather than any unbecoming
impulse of an ill-regulated imagination) was too pure and
unobtrusive to have created the slightest suspicion of the
circumstance
in his mind. He allowed Judith to put his hard
23*
colossal hand between those of Hetty, and stood waiting the
result in awkward silence.
This is Hurry, dearest, whispered Judith, bending over
her sister, ashamed to utter the words so as to be audible to
herself; speak to him, and let him go.
What shall I say, Judith?
Nay, whatever your own pure spirit teaches, my love.
Trust to that, and you need fear nothing.
Good bye, Hurrymurmured the girl, with a gentle
pressure of his handI wish you would try and be more
like Deerslayer.
These words were uttered with difficulty; a faint flush
succeeded them for a single instant, then the hand was
relinquished
,
and Hetty turned her face aside, as if done with
the world. The mysterious feeling that had bound her to
the young man, a sentiment so gentle as to be almost
imperceptible
to herself, and which could never have existed
at all, had her reason possessed more command over her
senses, was for ever lost in thoughts of a more elevated,
though scarcely of a purer character.
Of what are you thinking, my sweet sister?
whispered
Judith,tell me, that I may aid you at this moment.
MotherI see mother, now, and bright beings around
her in the lake. Why isn't father there?It's odd, that I
can see mother, when I can't see
you!
Farewell, Judith.
The last words were uttered after a pause, and her sister
had hung over her some time, in anxious watchfulness,
before
she perceived that the gentle spirit had departed. Thus
died Hetty Hutter, one of those mysterious links between
the material and immaterial world, which, while they
appear
to be deprived of so much that is esteemed and
necessary
for this state of being, draw so near to, and offer so
beautiful an illustration of the truth, purity, and simplicity
of another.
CHAPTER XVII.
A baron's chylde to be begylde! it were a cursed dede:
To be felawe with an outlawe! Almighty God forbede!
Yea, better were, the poor squyre, alone to forest yede,
Than ye sholde say, another day, that by my cursed dede
Ye were betrayed: wherefore, good mayde, the best rede that I can
Is, that I to the grene wode go, alone, a banyshed man.
Notbrowne Mayde
.
The
day that followed proved to be melancholy, though
one of much activity. The soldiers, who had so lately been
employed in interring their victims, were now called on to
bury their own dead. The scene of the morning had left
a saddened feeling on all the gentlemen of the party; and
the rest felt the influence of a similar sensation, in a
variety
of ways, and from many causes. Hour dragged on after
hour, until evening arrived, and then came the last
melancholy
offices in honour of poor Hetty Hutter. Her body
was laid in the lake, by the side of that of the mother she
had so loved and reverenced; the surgeon, though actually
an unbeliever, so far complying with the received decencies
of life as to read the funeral service over her grave, as he had
previously done over those of the other
Christian
slain. It
mattered not;that all-seeing eye which reads the heart,
could not fail to discriminate between the living and the
dead, and the gentle soul of the unfortunate girl was
already
far removed beyond the errors or deceptions of any
human
ritual. These simple rites, however, were not wholly
wanting in suitable accompaniments. The tears of Judith
and Hist flowed freely, and Deerslayer gazed upon the
limpid
water that now flowed over one whose spirit was even
purer than its own mountain springs, with glistening eyes.
Even the Delaware turned aside to conceal his weakness,
while the common men gazed on the ceremony with
wondering
eyes and chastened feelings.
The business of the day closed with this pious office. By
order of the commanding officer, all retired early to rest,
for it was intended to begin the march homeward with the
return of light. One party, indeed, bearing the wounded,
the prisoners, and the trophies, had left the castle in the
middle of the day, under the guidance of Hurry, intending
to reach the fort by shorter marches. It had been landed
on the point so often mentioned, or that described in our
opening pages; and, when the sun set, was already
encamped
on the brow of the long, broken, and ridgy hills that fell
away towards the valley of the Mohawk. The departure
of this detachment had greatly simplified the duty of the
succeeding day, disencumbering its march of its baggage
and wounded, and otherwise leaving him who had issued
the order greater liberty of action.
Judith held no communications with any but Hist, after
the death of her sister, until she retired for the night. Her
sorrow had been respected, and both the females had been
left with the body, unintruded on, to the last moment. The
rattling
of the drum broke the silence of that tranquil water, and
the echoes of the tattoo were heard among the mountains, so
soon after the ceremony was over, as to preclude the danger
of interruption. That star which had been the guide of Hist,
rose on a scene as silent as if the quiet of nature had never
yet been disturbed, by the labours or passions of man. One
solitary sentinel, with his relief, paced the platform
throughout
the night; and morning was ushered in, as usual, by the
martial beat of the reveill.
Military precision had now succeeded to the desultory
proceedings
of border-men, and when a hasty and frugal
breakfast
was taken, the party began its movement towards the
shore, with a regularity and order, that prevented noise or
confusion. Of all the officers, Warley alone remained.
Craig headed the detachment in advance, Thornton was with
the wounded, and Graham had accompanied his patients, as
a matter of course. Even the chest of Hutter, with all the
more valuable of his effects, had been borne away; leaving
nothing behind that was worth the labour of a removal.
Judith
was not sorry to see that the captain respected her
feelings
,
and that he occupied himself entirely with the duty of
his command, leaving her to her own discretion and feelings.
It was understood by all, that the place was to be totally
abandoned; but beyond this, no explanations were asked
or given.
The soldiers embarked in the ark, with the captain at
their head. He had inquired of Judith in what way she
chose to proceed, and understanding her wish to remain with
Hist to the last moment, he neither molested her with
requests
,
nor offended her with advice. There was but one
safe and familiar trail to the Mohawk; and on that, at the
proper hour, he doubted not that they should meet in amity,
if not in renewed intercourse.
When all were on board, the sweeps were manned, and
the ark moved in its sluggish manner, towards the distant
point. Deerslayer and Chingachgook now lifted two of the
canoes from the water, and placed them in the castle. The
windows and door were then barred, and the house was left
by means of the trap, in the manner already described. On
quitting the palisades, Hist was seen in the remaining canoe,
where the Delaware immediately joined her, and paddled
away, leaving Judith standing alone on the platform.
Owing
to this prompt proceeding, Deerslayer found himself
alone with the beautiful, and still weeping mourner. Too
simple to suspect any thing, the young man swept the light
boat round, and received its mistress in it, when he
followed
the course already taken by his friend.
The direction to the point, led diagonally past, and at
no great distance from, the graves of the dead. As the
canoe glided by, Judith, for the first time that morning, spoke
to her companion. She said but little; merely uttering a
simple request to stop, for a minute or two, ere she left the
place.
I may never see this spot again, Deerslayer, she said,
and it contains the bodies of my mother and sister! Is it
not possible, think you, that the innocence of one of these
beings, may answer, in the eyes of God, for the salvation
of both?
I don't understand it so, Judith; though I'm no
missionary
,
and am but poorly taught. Each spirit answers
for its own backslidings; though a hearty repentance will
satisfy God's laws.
Then
must
my poor, poor mother, be in heaven!
Bitterly
bitterlyhas
she repented of her sins; and surely
her sufferings in this life, ought to count as something against
her sufferings in the next!
All this goes beyond me, Judith.I strive to do right,
here, as the surest means of keeping all right, hereafter.
Hetty was oncommon, as all that know'd her must allow;
and her soul was as fit to consort with angels, the hour it
left its body, as that of any saint in the Bible!
I do believe you only do her justice! Alas!Alas!
that there should be so great differences between those who
were nursed at the same breast, slept in the same bed, and
dwelt under the same roof! But, no matter,move the
canoe a little farther east, Deerslayer;the sun so dazzles
my eyes that I cannot see the graves. This is Hetty's,
on the right of mother's?
Sartainyou ask'd that of us; and all are glad to do
as you wish, Judith, when you do that which is right.
The girl gazed at him near a minute, in silent attention;
then she turned her eyes backward, at the castle.
This lake will soon be entirely deserted, she said,
and this, too, at a moment when it will be a more secure
dwelling-place than ever. What has so lately happened
will prevent the Iroquois from venturing again to visit it,
for a long time to come.
That it will!yes, that may be set down as settled. I
do not mean to pass this-a-way, ag'in, so long as the war
lasts; for, to my mind, no Huron moccasin will leave its
print on the leaves of this forest, until their traditions have
forgotten to tell their young men of their disgrace and
rout.
And do you so delight in violence and bloodshed? I had
thought better of
you,
Deerslayerbelieved you one, who
could find his happiness in a quiet domestic home, with an
attached and loving wife, ready to study your wishes, and
healthy and dutiful children, anxious to follow in your
foot-steps
,
and to become as honest and just as yourself.
Lord, Judith, what a tongue you're mistress of! Speech
and looks go hand in hand, like; and what one can't do,
the other is pretty sartain to perform! Such a gal, in a
month, might spoil the stoutest warrior in the Colony.
And am I then so mistaken?Do you really love war,
Deerslayer, better than the hearth, and the affections?
I understand your meaning, gal; yes, I do understand
what you mean, I believe, though I don't think you
altogether
understand
me
. Warrior I may now call myself, I
suppose
,
for I've both fou't and conquered, which is sufficient
for the name; neither will I deny that I've feelin's for the
callin', which is both manful and honourable, when carried
on accordin' to nat'ral giftsbut I've no relish for blood.
Youth is youth, howsever, and a Mingo is a Mingo. If the
young men of this region stood by, and suffered the
vagabonds
to overrun the land, why, we might as well all turn
Frenchers at once, and give up country and kin. I'm no
fire-eater, Judith, or one that likes fightin' for fightin's sake;
but I can see no great difference atween
givin' up territory
afore a war, out of a dread of war, and givin' it up
after a war, because we can't help itonless it be that the
last is the most manful and honourable
.
No woman would ever wish to see her husband, or
brother, stand by, and submit to insult and wrong,
Deerslayer
,
however she might mourn the necessity of his
running
into the dangers of battle. But you've done enough
already, in clearing this region of the Hurons; since to
you is principally owing the credit of our late victory. Now,
listen to me patiently, and answer me with that native
honesty, which it is as pleasant to regard in one of your sex,
as it is unusual to meet with.
Judith paused; for, now that she was on the very point of
explaining herself, native modesty asserted its power,
notwithstanding
the encouragement and confidence she derived
from the great simplicity of her companion's character.
Her cheeks, which had so lately been pale, flushed, and her
eyes lighted with some of their former brilliancy. Feeling
gave expression to her countenance and softness to her
voice, rendering her who was always beautiful, trebly
seductive
and winning.
Deerslayer, she said, after a considerable pause, this
is not a moment for affectation, deception, or a want of
frankness
of any sort. Here, over my mother's grave, and over
the grave of truth-loving, truth-telling Hetty, every thing
like unfair dealing seems to be out of place. I will,
therefore
,
speak to you without any reserve, and without any dread
of being misunderstood. You are not an acquaintance of a
week, but it appears to me as if I had known you for years.
So much, and so much that is important, has taken place
within that short time, that the sorrows, and dangers, and
escapes of a whole life have been crowded into a few days;
and they who have suffered and acted together in such
scenes, ought not to feel like strangers. I know that what
I am about to say might be misunderstood by most men, but
I hope for a generous construction of my course from you.
We are not here, dwelling among the arts and deceptions
of the settlements, but young people who have no occasion
to deceive each other, in any manner or form.I hope I
make myself understood?
Sartain, Judith; few convarse better than yourself, and
none more agreeable, like. Your words are as pleasant as
your looks.
It is the manner in which you have so often praised
those looks, that gives me courage to proceed. Still,
Deerslayer
,
it is not easy for one of my sex and years, to forget
all her lessons of infancy, all her habits, and her natural
diffidence, and say openly what her heart feels!
Why not, Judith? Why shouldn't women as well as
men deal fairly and honestly by their fellow-creatur's? I
see no reason why you should not speak as plainly as
myself
,
when there is any thing ra'ally important to be said.
This indomitable diffidence, which still prevented the
young man from suspecting the truth, would have
completely
discouraged the girl, had not her whole soul, as well
as her whole heart, been set upon making a desperate effort
to rescue herself from a future that she dreaded with a
horror
as vivid, as the distinctness with which she fancied she
foresaw it. This motive, however, raised her above all
common considerations, and she persevered even to her
own surprise, if not to her great confusion.
I willI
must
deal as plainly with you, as I would with
poor, dear Hetty, were that sweet child living! she
continued
,
turning pale, instead of blushing, the high resolution
by which she was prompted reversing the effect that such a
procedure would ordinarily produce on one of her sex;
yes, I will smother all other feelings, in the one that is
now uppermost! You love the woods and the life that we
pass, here, in the wilderness, away from the dwellings and
towns of the whites.
As I loved my parents, Judith, when they was living!
This very spot would be all creation to me, could this war
be fairly over, once; and the settlers kept at a distance.
Why quit it, then? It has no ownerat least none
who can claim a better right than mine, and
that
I freely
give to you. Were it a kingdom, Deerslayer, I think I
should delight to say the same. Let us then return to it,
after we have seen the priest at the fort, and never quit it
again, until God calls us away to that world where we shall
find the spirits of my poor mother and sister.
A long, thoughtful pause succeeded; Judith having covered
her face with both her hands, after forcing herself to utter
so plain a proposal, and Deerslayer musing equally in
sorrow
and surprise, on the meaning of the language he had just
heard. At length the hunter broke the silence, speaking in
a tone that was softened to gentleness by his desire not to
offend.
You haven't thought well of this, Judith, he said
no, your feelin's are awakened by all that has lately
happened
,
and believin' yourself to be without kindred in the
world, you are in too great haste to find some to fill the
places of them that's lost.
Were I living in a crowd of friends, Deerslayer, I should
still think, as I think,say as I now say, returned Judith,
speaking with her hands still shading her lovely face.
Thank you, galthank you, from the bottom of my
heart. Howsever, I am not one to take advantage of a
weak moment, when you're forgetful of your own great
advantages
,
and fancy 'arth and all it holds, is in this little
canoe. NonoJudith, 't would be onginerous in me;
what you've offered can never come to pass!
It all may be, and that without leaving cause of
repentance
to any, answered Judith, with an impetuosity of
feeling and manner, that at once unveiled her eyes. We
can cause the soldiers to leave our goods on the road, till we
return, when they can easily be brought back to the house;
the lake will be no more visited by the enemy, this war at
least; all your skins may be readily sold at the garrison;
There
you
can buy the few necessaries we shall want, for I
wish never to see the spot, again; and Deerslayer, added
the girl, smiling with a sweetness and nature that the young
man found it hard to resist; as a proof how wholly I am
Vol. II.24
and wish to be yourshow completely I desire to be nothing
but your wife, the very first fire that we kindle, after our
return, shall be lighted with the brocade dress, and fed by
every article I have that you may think unfit for the woman
you wish to live with!
Ah's! meyou're a winning and a lovely creatur',
Judith
;
yes, you
are
all that; and no one can deny it, and
speak truth. These pictur's are pleasant to the thoughts,
but they mightn't prove so happy as you now think 'em.
Forget it all, therefore, and let us paddle after the Sarpent
and Hist, as if nothing had been said on the subject.
Judith was deeply mortified; and, what is more, she was
profoundly grieved. Still there was a steadiness and quiet
in the manner of Deerslayer, that completely smothered her
hopes; and told her that for once, her exceeding beauty had
failed to excite the admiration and homage it was wont to
receive. Women are said seldom to forgive those who slight
their advances; but this high-spirited and impetuous girl
entertained
no shadow of resentment, then or ever, against the
fair-dealing and ingenuous hunter. At the moment, the
prevailing
feeling was the wish to be certain that there was no
misunderstanding. After another painful pause, therefore,
she brought the matter to an issue, by a question too direct
to admit of equivocation.
God forbid, that we lay up regrets, in after life, through
any want of sincerity now, she said. I hope we
understand
each other, at least. You will not accept me for a
wife, Deerslayer?
'T is better for both that I shouldn't take advantage of
your own forgetfulness, Judith. We can never marry.
You do not love me,cannot find it in your heart,
perhaps
,
to esteem me, Deerslayer!
Every thing in the way of fri'ndship, Judithevery
thing, even to sarvices and life itself. Yes, I'd risk as much
for you, at this moment, as I would risk in behalf of Hist;
and that is sayin' as much as I can say in favour of any
darter of woman. I do not think I feel towards either
mind, I say
either,
Judithas if I wished to quit father and
motherif father and mother was livin'; which, however,
neither isbut if both was livin', I do not feel towards any
woman as if I wish'd to quit 'em in order to cleave unto
her
.
This is enough! answered Judith, in a rebuked and
smothered voice; I understand all that you mean. Marry
you cannot, without loving; and that love you do not feel
for me. Make no answer, if I am right; for I shall
understand
your silence.
That
will be painful enough of
itself.
Deerslayer obeyed her, and he made no reply. For
more than a minute, the girl riveted her bright eyes on him,
as if to read his soul; while he sat playing with the water,
like a corrected school-boy. Then Judith herself, dropped
the end of her paddle, and urged the canoe away from the
spot, with a movement as reluctant as the feelings which
controlled it. Deerslayer quietly aided the effort, however;
and they were soon on the trackless line taken by the
Delaware
.
In their way to the point, not another syllable was
exchanged
between Deerslayer and his fair companion. As
Judith sat in the bow of the canoe, her back was turned
towards
him, else it is probable its expression might have
induced
him to venture some soothing terms of friendship and
regard. Contrary to what would have been expected,
resentment
was still absent, though the colour frequently changed
from the deep flush of mortification to the paleness of
disappointment
.
Sorrow, deep, heart-felt sorrow, however, was
the predominant emotion, and this was betrayed in a
manner
not to be mistaken.
As neither laboured hard at the paddle, the ark had
already
arrived, and the soldiers had disembarked, before the
canoe of the two loiterers reached the point. Chingachgook
had preceded it, and was already some distance in the wood,
at a spot where the two trails, that to the garrison, and that
to the villages of the Delawares, separated. The soldiers,
too, had taken up their line of march; first setting the ark
adrift again, with a reckless disregard of its fate. All this,
Judith saw; but she heeded it not. The Glimmerglass had
no longer any charms for her; and when she put her foot
on the strand, she immediately proceeded on the trail of the
soldiers, without casting a single glance behind her. Even
Hist was passed unnoticed; that modest young creature
shrinking from the averted face of Judith, as if guilty
herself
of some wrong doing.
Wait you here, Sarpent, said Deerslayer, as he
followed
in the footsteps of the dejected beauty, while passing his
friend. I will just see Judith among her party, and come
and j'ine you.
A hundred yards had hid the couple from those in front,
as well as those in their rear, when Judith turned and spoke.
This will do, Deerslayer, she said, sadly. I
understand
your kindness, but shall not need it. In a few
minutes
,
I shall reach the soldiers. As you cannot go with
me on the journey of life, I do not wish you to go further
on this. But, stop; before we part, I would ask you a
single
question. And I require of you, as you fear God, and
reverence the truth, not to deceive me in your answer. I
know you do not love another; and I can see but one
reason
,
why you cannot,
will
not love me. Tell me, then,
Deerslayer, The girl paused, the words she was about
to utter, seeming to choke her. Then, rallying all her
resolution
,
with a face that flushed and paled at every breath
she drew, she continued: Tell me, then, Deerslayer, if
any thing light of me, that Henry March has said, may not
have influenced your feelings?
Truth was the Deerslayer's polar-star. He ever kept it
in view; and it was nearly impossible for him to avoid
uttering
it, even when prudence demanded silence. Judith
read his answer in his countenance; and with a heart nearly
broken by the consciousness of undeserving, she signed to
him an adieu, and buried herself in the woods. For some
time Deerslayer was irresolute as to his course; but, in the
end, he retraced his steps, and joined the Delaware. That
night, the three camped on the head waters of their own
river, and the succeeding evening they entered the village
of the tribe; Chingachgook and his betrothed, in triumph;
their companion honoured and admired, but in a sorrow that
it required months of activity to remove.
The war that then had its rise was stirring and bloody.
The Delaware chief rose among his people, until his name
was never mentioned without eulogiums; while another
Uncas
,
the last of his race, was added to the long line of
warriors
who bore that distinguished appellation. As for the
Deerslayer, under the
sobriquet
of Hawkeye, he made his
fame spread far and near, until the crack of his rifle became
as terrible to the ears of the Mingos, as the thunders of the
Manitou. His services were soon required by the officers
of the crown, and he especially attached himself, in the
field, to one in particular, with whose after-life he had a
close and important connection.
Fifteen years had passed away, ere it was in the power
of the Deerslayer to revisit the Glimmerglass. A peace had
intervened, and it was on the eve of another and a still more
important war, when he and his constant friend,
Chingachgook
,
were hastening to the forts to join their allies. A
stripling accompanied them, for Hist already slumbered
beneath
the pines of the Delawares, and the three survivors
had now become inseparable. They reached the lake just
as the sun was setting. Here all was unchanged; the river
still rushed through its bower of trees; the little rock was
wasting away, by the slow action of the waves, in the
course of centuries; the mountains stood in their native
dress, dark, rich and mysterious; while the sheet glistened
in its solitude, a beautiful gem of the forest.
The following morning, the youth discovered one of the
canoes
drifted on the shore, in a state of decay. A little labour
put it in a state for service, and they all embarked, with a
desire to examine the place. All the points were passed,
and Chingachgook pointed out to his son, the spot where the
Hurons had first encamped, and the point whence he had
succeeded in stealing his bride. Here they even landed;
but all traces of the former visit had disappeared. Next
they proceeded to the scene of the battle, and there they
found a few of the signs that linger around such localities.
Wild beasts had disinterred many of the bodies, and human
bones were bleaching in the rains of summer. Uncas
regarded
all with reverence and pity, though traditions were
already rousing his young mind to the ambition and
sternness
of a warrior.
From the point, the canoe took its way toward the shoal,
where the remains of the castle were still visible, a
picturesque
ruin. The storms of winter had long since unroofed
the house, and decay had eaten into the logs. All the
fastenings
were untouched, but the seasons rioted in the place,
24*
as if in mockery at the attempt to exclude them. The
palisades
were rotting, as were the piles; and it was evident that a
few more recurrences of winter, a few more gales and
tempests
,
would sweep all into the lake, and blot the building
from the face of that magnificent solitude. The graves
could not be found. Either the elements had obliterated
their traces, or time had caused those who looked for them
to forget their position.
The ark was discovered, stranded on the eastern shore,
where it had long before been driven, with the prevalent
northwest winds. It lay on the sandy extremity of a long
low point, that is situated about two miles from the outlet,
and which is itself fast disappearing before the action of the
elements. The scow was filled with water, the cabin
unroofed
,
and the logs were decaying. Some of its coarser
furniture still remained, and the heart of Deerslayer beat
quick, as he found a ribbon of Judith's, fluttering from a log.
It recalled all her beauty, and, we may add, all her failings.
Although the girl had never touched his heart, the
Hawkeye
,
for so we ought now to call him, still retained a kind
and sincere interest in her welfare. He tore away the
ribbon
,
and knotted it to the stock of Killdeer, which had been
the gift of the girl herself.
A few miles farther up the lake, another of the canoes
was discovered; and, on the point where the party finally
landed, were found those which had been left there upon the
shore. That in which the present navigation was made,
and the one discovered on the eastern shore, had dropped
through the decayed floor of the castle, drifted past the
falling
palisades, and had been thrown as waifs upon the beach.
From all these signs, it was probable the lake had not
been visited since the occurrence of the final scene of our
tale. Accident, or tradition, had rendered it again a spot
sacred to nature; the frequent wars, and the feeble
population
of the colonies, still confining the settlements within
narrow
boundaries. Chingachgook and his friend left the spot
with melancholy feelings. It had been the region of their First
War-Path, and it carried back the minds of both to scenes of
tenderness, as well as to hours of triumph. They held their
way towards the Mohawk in silence, however, to rush into
new adventures, as stirring and as remarkable as those
which had attended their opening career, on this lovely lake
At a later day, they returned to the place, where the Indian
found a grave.
Time and circumstances have drawn an impenetrable
mystery around all else connected with the Hutters. They
lived, erred, died, and are forgotten. None connected have
felt sufficient interest in the disgraced and disgracing, to
withdraw the veil; and a century is about to erase even the
recollection of their names. The history of crime is ever
revolting, and it is fortunate that few love to dwell on its
incidents. The sins of the family have long since been
arraigned at the judgment-seat of God, or are registered for
the terrible settlement of the last great day.
The same fate attended Judith. When Hawkeye
reached
the garrison on the Mohawk, he inquired anxiously after
that lovely but misguided creature. None knew her
even her person was no longer remembered. Other
officers
had, again and again, succeeded the Warleys and
Craigs and Grahams; though an old sergeant of the
garrison
,
who had lately come from England, was enabled to
tell our hero, that Sir Robert Warley lived on his paternal
estates, and that there was a lady of rare beauty in the
lodge, who had great influence over him, though she did
not bear his name. Whether this was Judith, relapsed into
her early failing, or some other victim of the soldier's,
Hawkeye never knew, nor would it be pleasant or profitable
to inquire. We live in a world of transgressions and
selfishness
,
and no pictures that represent us otherwise can be
true; though, happily for human nature, gleamings of that
pure Spirit in whose likeness man has been fashioned, are
to be seen relieving its deformities, and mitigating, if not
excusing, its crimes.
THE END.